

https://www.quora.com/If-WWI-hadnt-happened-would-the-1917-Revolution-have-happened-in-Russia

tell me who profits?

galvanizing public opinion against the tsar:

http://alphahistory.com/worldwar1/russian-revolution/


creating anti-government sentiment around the world


giving germans pretext to fund bolsheviks


tying up nations who would otherwise intervene in Bolshevik revolution

war weariness



https://encyclopedia.1914-1918-online.net/article/international_responses_to_the_russian_civil_war_russian_empire


brent-levosk tied up central powers, allies, on Western front


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/sep/06.htm
	September 6 (19), 1917 

Lenin: FAKE NEWS, LAME STREAM MEDIA giving Bolsheviks a raw deal, capitalists fault

	...The people want peace. Yet the revolutionary government of free Russia has resumed the war of conquest on the basis of those very same secret treaties which ex-Tsar Nicholas II concluded with the British and French capitalists so that the Russian capitalists might plunder other nations. Those secret treaties remain unpublished. The government of free Russia resorted to subterfuges, and to this day has not proposed a just peace to all nations. 


written a few months after end of provisional government, shortly before October revolution--Lenin blaming his own government for being warmongers? also apparently blames tsarist government for intentionally scheming to start a war


	There is no bread. Famine is again drawing near. Everybody sees that the capitalists and the rich are unscrupulously cheating the treasury on war deliveries (the war is now costing the nation fifty million rubles daily), that they are raking in fabulous profits through high prices, while nothing whatsoever has been done to establish effective control by the workers over the production and distribution of goods. The capitalists are becoming more brazen every day; they are throwing workers out into the street, and this at a time when the people are suffering from shortages. 


railing against the war, blame capitalists (one possibility--prepping for Brest-Litovsk?). Would have known war was unpopular

	... As to land, wait until the Constituent Assembly. As to the Constituent Assembly, wait until the end of the war. As to the end of the war, wait until complete victory. That is what it comes to. The capitalists and landowners, having a majority in the government, are plainly mocking at the peasants. 


Lenin trying to argue for October revolution during war?

	...Having obtained state power, the Cadets made every effort to continue the predatory war of conquest begun by Tsar Nicholas II, who had concluded secret predatory treaties with the British and French capitalists. Under these treaties, the Russian capitalists were promised, in the event of victory, the seizure of Constantinople, Galicia, Armenia, etc. As to the people, the government of the Cadets put them off with empty subterfuges and promises, deferring the decision of all matters of vital and essential importance to the workers and peasants until the Constituent Assembly met, without appointing the date of its convocation.


again hinting at tsarist plot to use war to seize territory

	... The Mensheviks and Socialist-Revolutionaries have compromised with the capitalists in one way or another at every stage of the Russian revolution. 

yet they signed Brest-Litovsk months later




https://www.marxists.org/history/etol/newspape/ni/vol02/no01/lenin2.htm
	“Reproaches have been made against me because of the Ultimatum. I put it forward only in the extremest case. When our CC members talk about an international civil war, that is a mockery. We have the civil war in Russia, but not in Germany. Our agitation is going further, but we are not agitating with words but with the revolution. And that remains. Stalin is wrong when he says that we do not need to sign. We must sign these conditions. If you do not do this, then you will sign the death warrant of the Soviet power in three weeks. These conditions do not infringe upon the Soviet power. I do not waver in the slightest. I do not put the ultimatum in order to withdraw it again. I want no revolutionary phrase. The German revolution has not yet matured. That requires months. The conditions must be accepted. If a new ultimatum then comes, we shall have a new situation.” (Lenin, Sämtliche Werke, Vol. XXII, p. 297.)


"a matter of expediency" Brest-Litovsk said to have made Bolsheviks unpopular with some, Lenin pushed for it, claimed Soviets over if not signed. Also, an empty promise of a "revolution in Germany?"

Another question: would Germany have signed Brest-Litovsk if not for the war in the Western front? seems there would have been little reason to otherwise (or excuse to). Important, since central powers the greatest foreign intervention in Russian civil war.



https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/sep/06.htm
	Revolution enlightens all classes with a rapidity and thoroughness unknown in normal, peaceful times. The capitalists, better organised and more experienced than anybody else in matters of class struggle and politics, learnt their lesson quicker than the others. Realising that the government’s position was hopeless, they resorted to a method which for many decades, ever since 1848, has been practised   by the capitalists of other countries in order to fool, divide and weaken the workers. This method is known as a “coalition” government, i.e., a joint cabinet formed of members of the bourgeoisie and turncoats from socialism.

	In countries where freedom and democracy have long existed side by side with a revolutionary labour movement, in Britain and France, the capitalists have repeatedly and very successfully resorted to this method. When the “socialist” leaders entered a bourgeois cabinet, they invariably proved to be figureheads, puppets, screens for the capitalists, instruments for deceiving the workers. The "democratic and republican" capitalists of Russia resorted to this very method. The Socialist-Revolutionaries and Mensheviks let themselves be fooled at once, and the “coalition” cabinet, joined by Chernov, Tsereteli and Co., became a fact on May 6. 


might be easy for some of his "comrades" to believe this if they use the same trick

	...Meanwhile, at the front, the counter-revolutionary, imperialist task of resuming the imperialist, predatory war, a task which Guchkov, so hated by the people, had been unable to accomplish, was being accomplished successfully and brilliantly by the "revolutionary democrat" Kerensky, that new-baked member of the Socialist-Revolutionary Party. 

kind of reminds me of Chechen war. Blame the war on people in government you don't like

	...He revelled in his own eloquence, incense was burned to him by the imperialists, who were using him as a pawn, he was flattered and worshipped – all because he served the capitalists faithfully, trying to talk the "revolutionary troops" into agreeing to resume the war being waged in pursuance of the treaties concluded by Tsar Nicholas II with the capitalists of Britain and France, a war waged so that Russian capitalists might secure Constantinople and Lvov, Erzurum and Trebizond. 


Lenin thinking of Brest-Litovsk ahead of time in this speech? wouldn't want to make idea of "compromise with capitalists" acceptable for his purposes, but would want a reason to use to justify. Calling the war a capitalist, imperialist plot would be one way.

	...Owing to the resumption of the predatory war, the bitterness of the people naturally grew even more rapidly and intensely. July 3–4 witnessed an outburst of their anger which the Bolsheviks attempted to restrain and which, of course, they had to endeavour to make as organised as possible. 

using public opinion against war to their advantage?

	...The experience of the Russian revolution from February to July 1917, when events developed with unusual rapidity, particularly under the influence of the imperialist war and the deep-going crisis brought about by it, has most strikingly and palpably confirmed the old Marxist truth that the position of the petty bourgeoisie is unstable. 



------



https://encyclopedia.1914-1918-online.net/article/eastern_front
	The Impact of the Eastern Front

	This unopposed advance was the last action of World War I, the Great War, on the Eastern Front. On 3 March 1918, the Bolshevik government signed the Treaty of Brest-Litovsk, ceding control of Ukraine, Galicia, Finland, the Baltic States, and the Caucasus. Violence continued almost unabated for the next four years, however, as the various states and populations fought for power. Russia devolved into civil war, with parties of all stripes (including socialist) trying to moderate or overthrow the Bolshevik regime. A three-way struggle evolved in the Ukraine, with Russians fighting Ukrainian nationalists, and anarchists under Nestor Makhno (1888-1934) fighting both. 

	The Allies perpetuated the chaos and violence of the Eastern Front as well, as they refused to accept the Bolshevik withdrawal. The United States sent 5,000 soldiers to Arkhangelsk (and a further 8,000 to Siberia), while the British sent a Royal Navy Squadron to the Baltic along with a small British Empire land force. Italy, Romania, Greece, and Serbia also provided small troop contingents, while France supplied funding for Russian forces fighting the Bolsheviks. The Allies also hoped to deny, at least, the vast resources of Ukraine and central Russia to the Germans. Thus while Hindenburg and Ludendorff transferred forty divisions to the Western Front they also, significantly, left almost as many to manage the occupation and exploit the resources of the areas gained.

	The war on the Eastern Front thus continued to influence developments in the West to a degree that, even today remains generally unrecognized. It may be, as scholars generally agree, that the war was and only could have been decided in the West; however, without the East that decision might have been very different. The sheer weight and surprising ability of the Russian Army to sustain military operations and inflict damage upon the Central Powers siphoned valuable resources from the German war effort. In January 1916, near the height of the German commitment to the Eastern Front, there were fifty-five German infantry divisions and nine German cavalry divisions operating against Russia. As late as November 1918, at the close of the war, there were still twenty-seven German infantry divisions deployed in the East. More than 1.5 million German soldiers were killed, wounded, or captured on the Eastern Front.

	While those numbers represent roughly only a quarter of the German forces deployed and the same proportion of casualties, they are not insignificant. The timing and nature of German deployments was also critical. The Brusilov Offensive, for instance, drew as many as eight German divisions from the Western Front that might well have been used at Verdun. The occupation of Ukraine tied down thirty or forty divisions that might have enabled the Spring (Ludendorff) Offensives of 1918 to find success. The Gorlice-Tarnów Offensive, on the other hand, provided materials and foodstuffs without which Germany might have succumbed to the Allied blockade. All of these aspects, along with the development of the creeping barrage, the experiments with poison gas, and many others, may not have been decisive for the conflict as a whole, but they certainly contributed to the decision. 


Eastern front tipping war against Germany in Western front, so Brest-Litovsk would have made sense to them.

says Germany might have done better in Verdun if not for eastern front


-------

https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1918/jun/29b.htm
	Nobody, thank God, believes in miracles nowadays. Miraculous prophecy is a fairy-tale. But scientific prophecy is a fact. And in these days, when we so very often encounter shameful despondency and even despair around us, it is useful to recall one scientific prophecy which has come true. 

wat

	Frederick Engels had occasion in 1887 to write of the coming world war in a preface to a pamphlet by Sigismund Borkheim, In Memory of the German Arch-Patriots of 1806-1807 (Zur Erinnerung für die deutschen Mordspatrioten 1806-1807 ). (This pamphlet is No. XXIV of the Social-Democratic Library published in Göttingen-Zürich in 1888.)

	This is how Frederick Engels spoke over thirty years ago of the future world war: 

Lenin sounds like a fake news site

	...“This is the prospect when the system of mutual outbidding in armaments, taken to the final extreme, at last bears its inevitable fruits. This, my lords, princes and statesmen, is where in your wisdom you have brought old Europe. And when nothing more remains to you but to open the last great war dance—that will suit us all right (uns kann es recht sein ). The war may perhaps push us temporarily into the background, may wrench from us many a position already conquered. But when you have unfettered forces which you will then no longer be able again to control, things may go as they will: at the end of the tragedy you will be ruined and the victory of the proletariat will either be already achieved or at any rate (doch ) inevitable. 


huh

	“. . . Crowns will roll by dozens. . . .” Several crowns have already fallen. And one of them is worth dozens of others—the crown of the autocrat of all the Russias, Nicholas Romanov.

	...“. . . Hopeless confusion of our artificial machinery in trade, industry and credit. . . .” At the end of the fourth year of war this has been fully borne out in the case of one of the biggest and most backward of the states drawn into the war by the capitalists—Russia. But do not the growing starvation in Gerrnany and Austria, the shortage of clothing and raw material and the wearing out of the means of production show that a similar state of affairs is very rapidly overtaking other countries as well? 


so like what were they planning this shit or something

	...What stupidity, what spinelessness—not to say mercenary service to the bourgeoisie—is displayed by those who, like our Novaya Zhizn group, Mensheviks, Right Socialist-Revolutionaries, etc., while continuing to call themselves “socialists”, maliciously point to the manifestation of this “hopeless confusion” and lay the blame for everything on the revolutionary proletariat, the Soviet power, the “utopia” of the transition to socialism.


what did the Mensheviks blame the Bolsheviks for causing WW1? or is he talking about Menshiviks, others blaming them for causing the civil war?

	...Travail may be light or severe. Marx and Engels, the founders of scientific socialism, always said that the transition from capitalism to socialism would be inevitably accompanied by prolonged birth pangs.

heh

	...Clearly realising this, Engels speaks with great caution of socialism being brought to birth by a capitalist socicty which is perishing in a world war. “Only one result [of a world war],” he says, “is absolutely certain: general exhaustion and the establishment of the conditions for the ultimate victory of the working class.” 


Did Lenin think of WW1 as "giving birth" to the Bolshevik revolution?

	...“. . . At the end of the tragedy you (the capitalists and landowners, the kings and statesmen of the bourgeoisie) will be ruined and the victory of the proletariat will either be already achieved or at any rate inevitable.” 


Engels angsty

	...The war has not yet ended. General exhaustion has already set in. As regards the two direct results of war predicted by Engels conditionally (either the victory of the working class already achieved, or the establishment of conditions which will make this inevitable, despite all difficulties ) as regards these two conditions, now, in the middle of 1918, we find both in evidence. 

Lenin understood war as demoralizing the world

	...In one, the least developed, of the capitalist countries, the victory of the working class is already achieved. In the others, with unparalleled pain and effort, the conditions are being established which will make this victory “at any rate inevitable”. 


what conditions did he have in mind?


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1918/aug/28.htm
	The Russian revolution has shown that the war is inevitably leading to the disintegration of capitalist society in general, that it is being converted into a war of the working people against the exploiters. Therein lies the significance of the Russian revolution.

	...No matter how loudly certain groups cry that the Bolsheviks are backed by a minority, they have to admit they cannot find the forces inside Russia to fight the Bolsheviks, and are compelled to resort to foreign intervention. The working class of France and Britain is thus being forced to take part in a blatant war of conquest, whose purpose is to crush the Russian revolution. That means that British and French, and, consequently, world imperialism is at its last gasp.


I guess the intervention had propaganda value for them


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1918/aug/23.htm
	In those days many were uncertain about the connection between the imperialist war and socialism; even many socialists thought that this war, like any other, would end by the conclusion of peace.

	But four years of war have taught people a lot. It is now becoming clearer and clearer that there is no other way out. The Russian revolution is being followed by the growth of revolution in all the belligerent countries. Why is this so? To answer that question we must explain the attitude of Communists towards war, give our appraisal of it. We regard all wars which are the result of the rapacious ambitions of kings and capitalists as criminal, because they are fatal to the labouring classes and bring rich spoils to the ruling bourgeoisie.

	...French and German soldiers are beginning to realise they must reverse their front and turn their guns against their own governments, as it is impossible to end this bloody war under the capitalist system. Hence the realisation that the workers of the world must take up the struggle against the capitalists of the world.

did they think of the war as a way to spread their revolution?

	...Capitalism is an international force, and it can therefore be completely destroyed only through victory in all countries, not in one alone. The war against the Czechs is a war against the capitalists of the whole world.

laying out his plans for global conquest

------

https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1915/jul/26.htm
	July 26, 1915

	To desire Russia’s defeat, Trotsky writes, is “an uncalled-for and absolutely unjustifiable concession to the political methodology of social-patriotism, which would replace the revolutionary struggle against the war and the conditions causing it, with an orientation—highly arbitrary in the present conditions—towards the lesser evil” (Nashe Slovo No. 105). 

Trotsky saying wanting to use the war as a tool for revolution too cynical?

	...A “revolutionary struggle against the war” is merely an empty and meaning less exclamation

didn't Lenin himself say it was an "imperialist war" and the symbol of all things evil with capitalism?

	...unless it means revolutionary action against one’s own government even in wartime.

Is even Lenin confused about what Trotsky means? seems to me like Trotsky saying he's anti-war

	One has only to do some thinking in order to understand this. Wartime revolutionary action against one’s own government indubitably means, not only desiring its defeat, but really facilitating such a defeat. ("Discerning reader”: note that this does not mean “blowing up bridges”, organising unsuccessful strikes in the war industries, and ·in general helping the government defeat the revolutionaries.) 

"real talk" from Lenin. Says attacking your own government during a war is the thing to do, but Lenin says he's not so bad, wouldn't blow up bridges or "conduct an unsuccessful strike"

Context of this is Russia, Russian people were taking a beating during the war, Comrades likely realized their actions were hurting the war effort and by extension their people, themselves

	The phrase-bandying Trotsky has completely lost his bearings on a simple issue. It seems to him that to desire   Russia’s defeat means desiring the victory of Germany. (Bukvoyed and Semkovsky give more direct expression to the “thought”, or rather want of thought, which they share with Trotsky.) But Trotsky regards this as the “methodology of social-patriotism"!

Lenin putting words in Trotsky's mouth

	To help people that are unable to think for themselves, the Berne resolution (Sotsial Demokrat No. 40)[1] made it clear, that in all imperialist countries the proletariat must now desire the defeat of its own government. Bukvoyed and Trotsky preferred to avoid this truth

Lenin, Mr. "for us it is a matter of expediency," suddenly insists you follow the rules that *all* socialists must strive to overthrow their governments at all times

or you know could wait for a time to overthrow government where doing so wouldn't contribute to the slaughter of your people...

a few paragraphs after talking about the defeat of the Russian government:

	...A revolution in wartime means civil war; the conversion of a war between governments into a civil war is, on the one hand, facilitated by military reverses ("defeats") of governments; on the other hand, one cannot actually strive for such a conversion without thereby facilitating defeat.

but why would you want to do that in the first place...

you'd think he'd get that starting a civil war in the middle of a deadly crisis is a bad idea, but apparently he doesn't:

	Anyone who would in all earnest refute the “slogan” of defeat for one’s own government in the imperialist war should prove one of three things: (1) that the war of 1914-15 is not reactionary, or (2) that a revolution stemming from that war is impossible, or (3) that co-ordination and mutual aid are possible between revolutionary movements in all the   belligerent countries.

this the crux of Lenin's argument?

	...The third point is particularly important to Russia, a most backward country, where an immediate socialist revolution is impossible.

	...Ask any Social-Democrat who calls himself an internationalist whether or not he approves of an understanding between the Social-Democrats of the various belligerent countries on joint revolutionary action against all belligerent governments. Many of them will reply that it is impossible, as Kautsky has done (Die Neue Zeit, October 2, 1914), thereby *fully proving* his social-chauvinism.

were they thinking of weakening the world with war while launching power-grabs around the world? plays out in China, attempts in other countries, clearly in Russia. Second world war ended-up a socialist power-grab.

	...An understanding on revolutionary action even in a single country, to say nothing of a number of countries, can be achieved only by the force of the example of serious revolutionary action, by launching such action and developing it. However, such action cannot be launched without desiring the defeat of the government, and without contributing to such a defeat.

another point to his argument? that Russian revolution during war-time would be example to other countries, so worth the cost to Russia

	...What are the main currents of these turbulent sentiments? They are: (1) Horror and despair. Hence, a growth of religious feeling. Again the churches are crowded, the reactionaries joyfully declare. “Wherever there is suffering there is religion," says the arch-reactionary Barr s. He is right, too. (2) Hatred of the “enemy”, a sentiment that is carefully fostered by the bourgeoisie (not so much by the priests), arid is of economic and political value only to the bourgeoisie. (3) Hatred of one’s own government and one’s own bourgeoisie—the sentiment of all class-conscious workers who understand, on the one hand, that war is a “continuation of the politics” of imperialism, which they counter by a “continuation” of their hatred of their class enemy, and, on the other hand, that “a war against war” is a banal phrase unless it means a revolution against their own government. Hatred of one’s own government and one’s own bourgeoisie cannot be aroused unless their defeat is desired; one cannot be a sincere opponent of a civil (i.e., class) truce without arousing hatred of one’s own government and bourgeoisie! 


of the mind that fomenting hate is the thing to do, a strategy to use


seems like Lenin coming out openly that he wanted to exploit WW1 for the socialist revolution.


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1914/sep/00.htm

weird

says might be related to this:

https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1914/sep/28.htm
	We must, however, say that if there is anything that, under certain conditions, can delay the downfall of tsarism, anything that can help tsarism in its struggle against the whole of Russia’s democracy, then that is the present war, which has placed the purses of the British, the French and the Russian bourgeois at the disposal of tsarism, to further the latter’s reactionary aims.

saying war involves British and French futhering aims of tsarism?

	...But to us Russian Social-Democrats there cannot be the slightest doubt that, from the standpoint of the working class and of the toiling masses of all the nations of Russia, the defeat of the tsarist   monarchy, the most reactionary and barbarous of governments, which is oppressing the largest number of nations and the greatest mass of the population of Europe and Asia, would be the lesser evil. 

this was supposed to be important:


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/apr/04.htm


calling for civil war


from fall of dynasties book:

	“War between Austria and Russia would be very useful to the cause of the revolution in Western Europe,” Lenin had written a year earlier to one of the most incorrigible of the revolutionary romantics, the Russian writer, Maxim Gorky. “But it is hard to believe that Francis Joseph and Nicholas will give us this pleasure.”

	Taylor, Edmond. The Fall Of The Dynasties: The Collapse Of The Old Order, 1905-1922 [Illustrated Edition] (Kindle Locations 463-465). Verdun Press. Kindle Edition. 


Lenin was also hob-nobbing with Austrian intel:

	There is a strong suspicion, however, that in the service of his dream he deliberately allowed himself to be exploited for a while as a weapon in the Austrian secret-service duel with Russia. To that degree he bears some modest share of responsibility—along with the autocrats and the gun merchants—for World War I.



------

https://www.nytimes.com/2017/06/19/opinion/was-lenin-a-german-agent.html
	Was Lenin a German Agent?

	Sean Mcmeekin

	...In a sense, there was nothing particularly new about a German plot to undermine an enemy government in wartime. For centuries, great powers had played at this game. During the Napoleonic wars, France aided Irish rebels to undermine Britain, and Polish nationalists against Russia. Britain, in turn, backed Spanish guerrillas fighting French occupation forces. The Germans, though latecomers to the arena, were quick learners after Germany’s unification in 1871. They even coined a word for this specific type of influence operation: “Revolutionierungspolitik,” or policy of revolutionizing.

	Had the British or French governments been weaker in World War I, they might have been undermined by other Lenins. In fact, Germany did target them, too, though German support for Irish nationalists and French pacifists never amounted to much.

did this happen during great time? the idea of doing these sorts of things maybe developed over a long time, refined by Okhrana

McMeekin points out that "other Lenins" could have tried something in Britain and France if they were "weaker," appears to assume Germany would have backed these "Lenins"


Kerensky drops charges against Lenin, re-arms Bolsheviks, in addition to refusing American aid

https://books.google.com/books?id=D0E_AQAAMAAJ&pg=PA292&lpg=PA292&dq=soviet+versailles+treaty&source=bl&ots=KqIGq9bRJd&sig=U8cDzhe6Vmg8M8fBZQSJDAdVCfg&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwjAr6m_sczWAhVJySYKHdUCBYE4ChDoAQhOMAs#v=onepage&q=soviet%20versailles%20treaty&f=false

says soviets didn't recognize treaty of Versailles


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/06/19/opinion/was-lenin-a-german-agent.html
	Before panic sets in, it is well to be reminded of the difference in degree, and kind, of today’s foreign influence-peddling compared with past episodes. Disinformation spread by state media, online bots and Twitter trolls is a serious nuisance, taking advantage of the openness of Western societies to undermine confidence in democratic institutions; cyberattacks and hacking are more serious still. For their part, Mr. Putin and his defenders denounce outside political interference in places like Ukraine, claiming that Russian moves there are mere reactions to Western meddling.


what Mcmeekin is saying sounds like Russian propaganda. the "Lenin was a german agent" narrative also seems to be in Russian propaganda. Is he a Russian propagandist?

plausible, understandible for him to suspect Lenin of being a German agent.

But how does he miss the Okhrana entirely? they barely appear in his book, even as others point out that Rachkovsky prolonged world-war one, Okhrana agents joined socialists, and soft-power and influence operations, which they specialize in (and Mcmeecan certainly aware of) would be an important tool in fomenting war.

Likewise, nothing on book on Foch, Spanish Flu, Russian funding of Black Hand.

On the other hand, seems to mostly have good points, well-researched as far as I can tell, book written pretty well (not amazing), and would make what KGB doing today look bad. If he is a propagandist, he would be the kind employed in a forward-thinking way, in order to grab control of a narrative damaging to their goals ahead of time (basically beat the others to writing the book on the subject, establish himself as "the expert")


...


http://www.world-news-research.com/7july2013.html
	The Real Russian Origins of the First World War

	With a similar title as above, Sean Mcmeekin, received some well informed criticism.

	McMeekin, not only greatly exaggerated the significance of the preparatory period of war, he also ignored, as we shall see, that responsibility for the outbreak of war rests overwhelmingly on the shoulders of Berlin and Vienna.

weird

the last chapter of his book made it sound like he suspected the Bolsheviks, I think?

subtly blamed "Marxists" for the "structural" interpretation of the war


but he did put out the "germany did it" theory in his book:

	The western Allies responded in kind. In retaliation for the Bolshevik repudiation of tsarist bond holdings, Britain and France froze tsarist assets sets and deneid credit to the Bolsheviks. Lenin's unilateral request for a ceasefire, sent en clair (without encryption) and without precondition to German military headquarters on 25 November 1917, simply confirmed the belief held by western Allied leaders that his was a German puppet regime. In light of what we know today about how much money Berlin invested in Bolshevik propaganda

	Sean McMeekin. The Russian Origins of the First World War (Kindle Locations 2823-2826). Kindle Edition. 


https://www.amazon.com/Russian-Revolution-New-History/dp/0465039901/ref=pd_sim_14_3/144-1432211-1950768?_encoding=UTF8&psc=1&refRID=T1ZSAWRZMWMZ5D3GG6AA

apparently this book was all about that


------

https://forum.axishistory.com/viewtopic.php?f=31&t=207431&sid=e053c662064cc31e0f23b8a7234f54ee

should read up, but apparently someone in Russia thought starting a war would help them get constantinople

------

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Japan_during_World_War_I
	Following the Bolshevik Revolution in Russia, Japan and the United States sent forces to Siberia in 1918 to bolster the armies of the White movement leader Admiral Alexander Kolchak against the Bolshevik Red Army. In this Siberian Intervention, the Imperial Japanese Army initially planned to send more than 70,000 troops to occupy Siberia as far west as Lake Baikal. The plan was scaled back considerably due to opposition from the United States.

SoS Robert Lansing "delivered a sharp protest" over Japanese expansion in Siberia

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Robert_Lansing

Lansing advocated intervention on Western front but opposed intervention in Siberia


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1918/may/12.htm
	Although we do not ill general reject military agreements with one of the imperialist coalitions against the other ill those cases in which such an agreement could, without undermining the basis of Soviet power, strengthen its position and paralyze the attacks of any imperialist power, we cannot at the present moment enter into a military agreement with the Anglo-French coalition. For them, the importance of such an agreement would be the diversion of German troops from the West, i.e., by means of the advance of many Japanese army corps into the interior of European Russia, which is an unacceptable condition since it would mean the complete collapse of Soviet power. If the Anglo-French coalition were to present us with an ultimatum of this kind we should reject it, because the danger of the Japanese advance can more easily be paralysed (or can be delayed for a longer time) than the threat of the Germans occupying Petrograd, Moscow and a large part of European Russia. 


saying treaty with Germany makes more sense for Soviets because if they made treaty with allies, Japan would come into attack Germany on Eastern front in "European Russia." Says holding off Japan easier than holding of Germany.

	... The fact of the matter is that the extreme elements in the war parties of both these countries favour an immediate general offensive against Russia for the purpose of occupying all her territory and overthrowing Soviet power. At any moment these extreme elements may gain the upper hand.

	On the other hand, however, it is an undoubted fact that the majority of the imperialist bourgeoisie in Germany are against such a policy and at the present moment prefer the annexationist peace with Russia to a continuation of the war for the simple reason that war would divert forces from the West and increase the instability of the internal situation in Germany that is already making itself felt; it would also make it difficult to obtain raw materials from places involved in insurrection or that are suffering from damage to railways, from failure to plant sufficient crops, etc., etc.


according to Lenin, Germany wanted treaty to free up fighting on Western front, exploiting territories Lenin handed them for supplies

	The Japanese urge to attack Russia is being held back, first, by the danger of the movement and of revolts in China, and secondly, there is a certain antagonism on the part of America, the latter fearing the strengthening of Japan and hoping to obtain raw materials from Russia more easily under peaceful conditions.

says Chinese instability and some sort of American plot holding back Japan in Siberia.

	Guiltiest of all of a complete lack of understanding of this truth are the Left Socialist-Revolutionary and anarchist elements with their screaming about “insurrectionary committees” and their howls of “to arms”, etc. Such screams and howls are the quintessence of stupidity and are nothing but pitiful, despicable and disgusting phrase-making; it is ridiculous to talk about “insurrection” and “insurrectionary committees” when Soviet central power is doing its utmost to persuade the people to start military training and arm themselves, when we have more weapons than we can count and distribute, when it is precisely the economic ruin and the lack of discipline that prevent us from using the weapons available and compel us to lose valuable time that could be used for training. 

Lenin accusing anarchists of undermining war effort?


...

did Lenin admit the war helped his revolution?

Said the war was the detriment to the capitalists, wore them out, and "gave birth" to the socialist revolution.

Also said Germany and Japan being tied up in war was to the advantage of the Soviets.

------

https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1919/mar/x04.htm
	The Second International existed from 1889 to 1914, up to the war. This was the period of the most calm and peaceful development of capitalism, a period without great revolutions. During this period the working-class movement gained strength and matured in a number of countries. But the workers' leaders in most of the parties had become accustomed to peaceful conditions and had lost the ability to wage a revolutionary struggle. When, in 1914, there began the war, that drenched the earth with blood for four years, the war between the capitalists over the division of profits, the war for supremacy over small and weak nations, these leaders deserted to the side of their respective governments. They betrayed the workers, they helped to prolong the slaughter, they became enemies of socialism, they went over to the side of the capitalists.

	The masses of workers turned their backs on these traitors to socialism. All over the world there was a turn towards the revolutionary struggle. The war proved that capitalism was doomed. A new system is coming to take its place. The old word socialism had been desecrated by the traitors to socialism.

------

https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1919/jul/15.htm
	After the conclusion of the Treaty of Versailles the Bolsheviks were proved to have been right—the Treaty of Versailles was worse than the Treaty of Brest that Soviet Russia had at one time concluded with moribund German imperialism.

trashing Brest-Livost after Lenin threatened to resign if it wasn't signed?

	...Immediately the Treaty had been signed the imperialists became busy dividing up the colonies; Britain had taken Persia; Syria arid Turkey were being carved up, and the eyes of the workers in capitalist countries had been opened to the fact that the war had been a war between predators. Strange as it might have seemed, information had been received to the effect that Prince Lvov, a former member of Kerensky’s Provisional Government who was then in Paris, was demanding that the Allies give Constantinople and the Straits to Russia on the grounds that Russia had fought in the war only for their sake-naturally this naïve demand received an answer to the effect that they would be given only to old, powerful Russia.

interesting, McMeekan I think talked about some plot where tsarist Russia hoped to gain constantinople from the war--referring to this?

Is Lenin saying this?

https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1919/nov/22.htm
	Furthermore, the experience of the Civil War in Russia has shown us and the Communists of all countries that, in the crucible of civil war, the development of revolutionary enthusiasm is accompanied by a powerful inner cohesion. ...The past two years have shown, on the one hand, that a revolutionary war can be developed, and, on the other, that the Soviet system is growing stronger under the heavy blows of the foreign invasion, the aim of which is to destroy quickly the revolutionary centre, the republic of workers and peasants who have dared to declare war on international imperialism. But instead of destroying the workers and peasants of Russia, these heavy blows have served to harden them.

	That is the chief lesson, the chief content of the present period.


Lenin pro-war? I guess Lenin gets that he needs an enemy.


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1919/nov/22.htm
	Yet when it came to the Treaty of Versailles, everyone saw that it was a hundred times more rapacious than the Treaty of B rest which the German robbers forced upon us,

are you kidding me

	...The internal struggle among these predators is developing so swiftly that we may rejoice in the knowledge that the Treaty of Versailles is only a seeming victory for the jubilant imperialists, and that in reality it signifies the bankruptcy of the entire imperialist world and the resolute abandonment by the working people of those socialists who during the war allied themselves with the representatives of decaying imperialism and defended one of the groups of belligerent predators.

Lenin: never mind all the people (including proletariat) Versailles treaty fucked over, we should rejoice because it makes "the imperialists" look bad

	...The eyes of the working people have been opened because the Treaty of Versailles was a rapacious peace and showed that France and Britain had actually fought Germany in order to strengthen their rule over the colonies and to enhance their imperialist might. That internal struggle grows broader as time goes on. Today I saw a wireless message from London dated November 21, in which American journalists—men who cannot be suspected of sympathising with revolutionaries—say that in France an unprecedented outburst of hatred towards the Americans is to be observed, because the Americans refuse to ratify the Treaty of Versailles.

endorsing divide and conquer?

	...Our victory over Kolchak and Yudenich, those lackeys of international capital, is a big one; but far bigger, though not so evident, is the victory we are gaining on an international scale. That victory consists in the internal decay of imperialism, which is unable to send its troops against us.

a reference to influence ops? Lansing?

	That victory consists in the internal decay of imperialism, which is unable to send its troops against us. The Entente tried it, but to no purpose, because its troops become demoralised when they contact our troops and acquaint themselves with our Russian Soviet Constitution, translated into their languages. Despite the influence of the leaders of putrid socialism, our Constitution will always win the sympathy of the working people. The word “Soviet” is now understood by everybody, and the Soviet Constitution has been translated into all languages and is known to every worker. He knows that it is the constitution of working people, the political system of working people who are calling for victory over international capital, that it is a triumph we have achieved over the international imperialists. This victory of ours has had its repercussions in all imperialist countries, since we have deprived them of their own troops, won them over, deprived them of the possibility of using those troops against Soviet Russia.

claiming a soft-power victory


------


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/may/09.htm
	We are told that an armistice has been established only on one front, and therefore there is a danger of a separate peace. But this argument does not hold water. If neither the Russian Government nor the Russian workers and peas ants want a separate peace with the German capitalists (our Party, as we know, through Pravda and in the resolution passed at our Conference,[1] which spoke in the name of the   Party as a whole, has repeatedly protested against such a peace)—if no one in Russia wants a separate peace with separate capitalists, how then, by what miracle, can such a peace come? Who can impose it?

Lenin claims he didn't want a separate peace

	...Fraternisation on one front can and should lead to fraternisation on all fronts. A virtual armistice on one front can and should lead to a virtual armistice on all fronts.

or you know it wold lead to Germany moving divisions to the Western front which is what happened...

	...We may be told that a virtual armistice today on all fronts would help the German capitalists, who have snatched more loot than anybody else. This is not true. For one thing, the British capitalists have grabbed more (the German colonies in Africa, German islands in the Pacific, Mesopotamia, part of Syria, etc.) and, unlike the German capitalists, have lost nothing. Secondly, if the German capitalists had shown greater obstinacy than the British capitalists, the growth of the revolution in Germany would have only been accelerated. The revolution in Germany is obviously mounting. An offensive by the Russian troops would check this growth.

the "revolution just around corner in Germany" card again


https://books.google.com/books?id=AjFBAAAAIAAJ&pg=PA25&lpg=PA25&dq=Russia+public+support+for+%22separate+peace%22&source=bl&ots=yMjwg_S4Pj&sig=DQ4RHCGqxYRl1jm3uW7_DH7kHJA&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwji54f51tDWAhUPzWMKHbp5AJgQ6AEIJjAA#v=onepage&q=Russia%20public%20support%20for%20%22separate%20peace%22&f=false
	To resume: there seems at present to be no likelihood at all of any serious section of Russian public opinion really supporting the idea of a separate peace.



https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/may/09.htm
	The Russian people have two programmes to choose from. One is the programme of the capitalists, adopted by the Chernovs and Tseretelis. This is the programme of offensive, the programme for dragging out the imperialist war, dragging out the carnage.

	The other programme is that of the world’s revolutionary workers, advocated in Russia by our Party. This programme says: stimulate fraternisation (but do not permit the Germans to deceive the Russians); fraternise by means of proclamations; extend fraternisation and a virtual armistice to all fronts; help to spread these in every possible way, thereby hastening the proletarian revolution in all the countries, giving at least a temporary respite to the soldiers of all the belligerent countries; hasten in Russia the transfer of power to the Soviets of Workers’, Soldiers’, and Peasants’ Deputies, and thereby hasten the conclusion of a really just, really universal peace in the interests of the working people, and not in the interests of the capitalists.

	Our government, with the Chernovs and Tseretelis, the Narodniks and the Mensheviks, is for the first programme.

	The majority of the Russian nation and of all the nations within Russia (and outside Russia), i.e., the majority of the workers and poor peasants, undoubtedly stand for the second programme.

	The victory of this second programme is drawing nearer every day.


Lenin says his government is better because it calls for fraternization with the Germans


------

https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/jul/07.htm
	Speech On The War June 9 (22) 

	Comrades, allow me, by way of an introduction to an analysis of the war issue, to remind you of two passages in the Manifesto to all countries published by the Petrograd Soviet of Workers’ and Soldiers’ Deputies on March 14. "The time has come," said the Manifesto, "to begin a resolute struggle against the predatory designs of the governments of all countries. The time has come for the people to take the decision on war and peace into their own hands." Another passage in the Manifesto, addressed to the workers of the Austro-German coalition, reads: "Refuse to serve as tools of conquest and violence in the hands of kings, landowners and bankers." These are the two passages that have been repeated in different wordings in dozens, hundreds and, I should even imagine, thousands of resolutions by Russia’s workers and peasants.

	...You are coming into conflict with the masses you represent, because these masses will never adopt the capitalist point of view, openly expressed by Milyukov, Maklakov and others, who say: "No idea could be more criminal than that the war is being waged in the interests of capital.”

	I wonder whether that idea is criminal. I have no doubt that from the point of view of those who half-exist today and will perhaps no longer exist tomorrow, the idea actually is criminal. But it is the only correct idea. It alone expresses our conception of this war. It alone expresses the interests of the oppressed classes as a struggle against their oppressors. And when we say the war is capitalist and predatory, we must have no illusions—there is not the slightest hint that the crimes of individuals, of individual kings, could have provoked this kind of war. 


blames war on capitalists


	...Prove that you are liberating the Armenian republic and reaching agreement with the Soviets of Workers’ and Peasants’ Deputies in every country, that you are for a free republic, and then the Russian revolution’s foreign policy will become really revolutionary and really democratic.


then says "democracy is dead" like he's happy

	...Recently we read in our Moscow Party newspaper a letter from a peasant commenting on our programme. I should like to bring my speech to a close with a brief quotation from that letter, showing what a peasant makes of our programme. The letter was printed in No. 59 of Sotsial-Demokrat,our Moscow Party newspaper, and was reprinted in Pravda No. 68.

	“We must," says the letter, "press the bourgeoisie harder to make them burst at the seams. Then the war will be over. But things will turn out badly if we don’t press the bourgeoisie hard enough." (Applause.) 



https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/aug/22.htm
	V. I. Lenin

	Letter Over the Publication of “Leaflet on the Capture of Riga”

	Written after August 22 (September 4), 1917

	This leaflet cannot, of course, be published legally, but everything must be done to have it published illegally.

	... I am aware that the sluggishness of our Bolsheviks is   great and that it will take a great deal of effort to secure the publication of illegal leaflets. But I shall go on insisting because those are the demands of life, the demands of the movement.

	We must issue illegally free leaflets and handbills which are not curtailed and which speak out at the top of their voice. They should be signed: “A group of persecuted Bolsheviks”.

		Workers, soldiers and all working people!

		The enemy troops have taken Riga. We have suffered another heavy defeat. The incredible calamities inflicted on the people by the war are being aggravated and dragged out.

		Why is the war being dragged out? The reason is still a division of the spoils between the capitalist brigands ...The Kerensky government, with the participation and support of the Mensheviks and the S.R.s, has been brazenly cheating the people, lulling them with empty talk about their desire for peace, talk which is not binding in any way, while actually dragging out the predatory war

		...Tens and hundreds of thousands of people have died in the offensive, which the Kerensky, Menshevik, and S.R. government started in June. Tens and hundreds of thousands will die in the protracted war, so long as the people continue to tolerate such a government.

		Only a workers’ government can save the country. It alone will not cheat the people, but will immediately offer to all countries precise, clear-cut and fair peace terms.

		The bourgeoisie has been trying to intimidate the people and create a panic, in an effort to get the ignorant people to believe that peace cannot be offered right away, as this would mean “losing Riga” and so on. That is cheating the people.

		...Down with the war! Down with the Kerensky, Menshevik and S.R. government, which is cheating the people, protracting the war, safeguarding the predatory interests of the capitalists, putting off the elections to the Constituent Assembly!

		Only a workers’ government supported by the poor peasants will offer peace, putting an end to the capitalist plunder, and give the working people bread and freedom. Let every worker and soldier explain to the people the need to overthrow the Kerensky government and set up a workers’ government. 


------

https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/aug/30.htm

Lenin calls for a change in tactics after Kornilov, insists not supporting Kerensky government


------

https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/aug/01.htm
In a farewell talk to members of the Committee of Journalists under the Provisional Government, Prince G. Y. Lvov, former head of the Provisional Government, made some valuable admissions for which the workers will certainly be grateful.

    “What strengthens my optimism above all else,” Lvov said. “are the events of the past few days inside the country. I am convinced that our ’deep breach’ in the Lenin front is incomparably more significant for Russia than the German breach in our South-Western Front.”

How can the workers not be grateful to the prince for this sober appraisal of the class struggle? They will be more than grateful, they will take a lesson from Lvov.

What an endless flow of fine words and infinite hypocrisy all the bourgeois people and landowners, as well as the Socialist-Revolutionaries and Mensheviks trailing after them, pour out while orating against “civil war”! But look at Prince Lvov’s valuable admission and you will see that he very calmly appraises Russia’s internal situation from the point of view of civil war.


seems like Lenin acting like a German spy would help convince prov government that opposing Lenin goes hand-in-hand with winning war. Like could just see him as an extension of the German war effort, and so they would be more inclined to crack down on the Bolsheviks, just as the Germans would be more inclined to fund them.

Should the Germans have believed Lenin was a loyal agent, they also would have been inclined not to sue for peace but instead press for concessions and continue their offensive. The German agression eventually contributed to the collapse of the provisional Government.

interesting that Ludendorff, who secured Lenin's passage to Germany, was also bold about pushing for war. Maybe he professed faith in his "agent"?


http://www.history.com/this-day-in-history/lenin-returns-to-russia-from-exile
	After the outbreak of the February Revolution, German authorities allowed Lenin and his lieutenants to cross Germany en route from Switzerland to Sweden in a sealed railway car. Berlin hoped, correctly, that the return of the anti-war socialists to Russia would undermine the Russian war effort, which was continuing under the provisional government. Lenin called for the overthrow of the provisional government by the soviets; he was subsequently condemned as a “German agent” by the government’s leaders. In July, he was forced to flee to Finland, but his call for “peace, land, and bread” met with increasing popular support, and the Bolsheviks won a majority in the Petrograd soviet. In October, Lenin secretly returned to Petrograd, and on November 7, the Bolshevik-led Red Guards deposed the Provisional Government and proclaimed soviet rule.


German military command might have thought it would be better to wait for someone more pliable to come in power

-----


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/aug/17bcca.htm

Lenin against Stockholm Conference


------


https://www.reddit.com/r/history/comments/5uaf49/were_there_conspiracies_regarding_the_killing_of/
	There were, in fact, a number of conspiracies where the same people overlapped membership. The actual assassins were members of the Young Bosnians (who believed they were in charge), but they received weapons from Apis/Dimetrovitch's faction of Union or Death (which Austrian propaganda called "The Black Hand") - Apis thought he was in charge. They received shelter and transport from People's Will - who thought they were in charge. There is the conspiracy with Life and Death, of whom we know next nothing but who seem to have thought they were in charge. Then there is the strange story told by Karl Radek at the Moscow Show Trials which indicates yet another conspiracy, with other people in charge. Then there is the case of the Russian embassy in Belgrade where the assassins' cyanide capsules came from. Also, as many historians have commented, The Serbian government warned the Austrians about an assassination but it suited many in the Austrian government to have the Archduke dead. So they OK'd a provocative tour of Bosnia and removed the Archduke's bodyguard.


wow there was a lot going on here


http://www.telegraph.co.uk/history/world-war-one/10930829/The-lie-that-started-the-First-World-War.html
	Princip was caught within seconds of firing his pistol, his bid for martyrdom doomed when the dose of cyanide he stuffed down his throat failed to kill him. 


telling of the Russian embassy supplied the capsules


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Danilo_Ili%C4%87
	On Sunday, 28 June 1914, Franz Ferdinand and Sophie von Chotkow were assassinated by Gavrilo Princip. Princip and Nedeljko Čabrinović were captured and interrogated by the police. They held out, but Ilić, who was picked up on a routine check, eventually broke down under pressure and named his fellow conspirators.


https://books.google.com/books?id=HggqAAAAYAAJ&pg=PA92&lpg=PA92&dq=%22Danilo+Ili%C4%87%22+cyanide&source=bl&ots=yKc0nOCY8i&sig=5QpSguW4lbZvcBUElO7kZ-B9LNA&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwico4OZic7WAhVBWGMKHSxLBr8Q6AEIXTAN#v=onepage&q=%22Danilo%20Ili%C4%87%22%20cyanide&f=false
	He also admitted *that they were supplied with a sufficient dose of cyanide potassium to enable them to commit suicide. They had been admonished not to give away either Major Tankosic, who was a leading officer of the Serbian General Staff, or anybody connected with the Narodna Odbrana.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Dragutin_Dimitrijevi%C4%87
	Unknown to Dimitrijević, Major Vojislav Tankosić was informing Nikola Pašić, the prime minister of Serbia about the plot. Although Pašić supported the main objectives of the Black Hand group, he did not want the assassination to take place, as he feared it would lead to a war with Austria-Hungary.


https://encyclopedia.1914-1918-online.net/article/july_crisis_1914
	Princip succeeded in murdering the royal couple, but failed to kill himself and was arrested before the outraged crowd could lynch him. The assassins did not reveal any of the details of the planning or the links to the “Black Hand”. 


seems like they revealed a lot though

------


https://ww1live.wordpress.com/tag/wladimir-giesl-von-gieslingen/
	From Vienna, Ambassador Tschirschky reports back to Berlin that the Austro-Hungarians are readying for action against Serbia and that Tisza’s opposition is being overcome.

	In Belgrade, Austro-Hungarian ambassador Wladimir Giesl von Gieslingen returns after a long stay in Vienna. That evening, the Russian ambassador, Nikolai Hartwig, calls to the Austrian embassy to formally offer condolences on the death of Franz Ferdinand. Without prompting, Hartwig also urges Giesl to ignore rumours suggesting that he had hosted a bridge party on the night of the Archduke’s murder. Hartwig goes on to deny that the Russian embassy had declined to fly its flag at half mast during Franz Ferdinand’s funeral. Giesl diplomatically accepts his guest’s assurances.

	Hartwig then has a sudden heart attack and collapses. Giesl sends a carriage to fetch Ludmilla Hartwig, the ambassador’s daughter and next of kin. Doctors arrive but are unable to revive the Russian. When Ludmilla Hartwig arrives, she makes clear that she suspects foul play. A policeman is attracted by the commotion, but the embassy staff invoke their extra-territorial rights and send him on his way, further fuelling suspicions that they have something to hide.



https://ww1live.wordpress.com/tag/wladimir-giesl-von-gieslingen/
	It is Sunday. Serbian newspapers are full of lurid speculation about Friday’s death of Nikolai Hartwig in the Austro-Hungarian embassy. The Russian ambassador was a hero to Serbian nationalists for his staunch support of Serbia in the recent Balkan Wars. Now demonstrations against Austria-Hungary erupt in Belgrade, giving vent to popular anger over Hartwig’s death.

	But Giesl, the Austro-Hungarian ambassador to Belgrade, learns from his Italian counterpart that Hartwig lied to him on Friday. The Russian ambassador did indeed host a bridge party on the night of Franz Ferdinand’s murder and the Russian embassy kept its flag at full mast during the Archduke’s funeral.


was this the extent of the indictment of Hartwig?


Hartwig called up Giesl and said he had more to tell him, then dies, rumors mill says it was murder and pins blame on Giesl, some Serbs buy it and this increases Serbian resentment of Vienna

Possibly, Hartwig wanted to tell Giesl of Black Hand's involvement

French also said to know, but for whatever reason didn't tell Vienna

from Taylor:

	Hartwig had inside knowledge of the Serbian Black Hand and its methods (the Austrians were strangely uninformed on the subject, though the alert French Minister in Belgrade had already been able to ferret out for his government the Black Hand’s role in the Sarajevo assassinations).


https://books.google.com/books?id=9p5cAwAAQBAJ&pg=PA49&lpg=PA49&dq=%22French+minister%22+belgrade+july+crisis&source=bl&ots=goyIR6qrU6&sig=-5FsSBjxZOFC3XYLc73HJ1c0lqQ&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwjy34Lpmc7WAhVkF2MKHdOeAH4Q6AEIPzAF#v=onepage&q=%22French%20minister%22%20belgrade%20july%20crisis&f=false

French Minister in Belgrade didn't like Hartwig?

https://books.google.com/books?id=g2QWDAAAQBAJ&pg=PA60&lpg=PA60&dq=%22French+minister%22+belgrade+july+crisis&source=bl&ots=H6YGvS9ED0&sig=zdfqTg8ZSyfoevRnYkhc_wLSfwE&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwjy34Lpmc7WAhVkF2MKHdOeAH4Q6AEIQTAG#v=onepage&q=%22French%20minister%22%20belgrade%20july%20crisis&f=false


said Hartig was a mastermind and Pasic did nothing without him

seems to be playing into the rumors around Hartwig? the "he lied about playing bridge thing" being one of the more stupid ones


------

https://encyclopedia.1914-1918-online.net/article/july_crisis_1914
	A general European war would need a trigger, and this was provided by the murder of the heir to the Austro-Hungarian throne, Franz Ferdinand, Archduke of Austria-Este (1863-1914) and his wife Sophie, Archduchess of Austria (1868-1914) in the Bosnian capital Sarajevo on 28 June 1914. The assassination, carried out by Bosnian Serb nationalists, has often been described as the spark that would set light to a continent that was riddled with international tensions. However, a European war was not inevitable. Right until the last moment, some European statesmen were desperately trying to avoid an escalation of the crisis by advocating mediation, while others did everything in their power to ensure that a localised war would break out whose escalation into a European conflict they were willing to risk.


agrees with Taylor's account

	Rumours soon began to circulate that Serbia’s Prime Minister, Nicola Pašić (1845-1926), had had prior warning about the planned assassination which he had passed on to the Austrian envoy in Belgrade, though Pašić would deny any prior knowledge of the plot.[8] His warning, in turn, had not been taken seriously in Vienna, particularly by Leon Ritter von Biliński (1846-1923), the finance minister who was also governor of Bosnia-Herzegovina. This fact was uncomfortable for both Pašić and Biliński, who in the following weeks wanted to downplay that a warning had been received. In the aftermath of the assassination, all they could do was to wait for the official reaction to this murder in Vienna.


Why didn't Bilinski take the warning seriously? said to be done in a vague way, and so in a way that neither the deliverer or the recipient of the message can be fully assigned blame. End result is that Pasic's foreknowledge of the plot looks more damming than it would have been.



------



http://webcache.googleusercontent.com/search?q=cache:-4-y3seivL4J:www.huffingtonpost.com/joseph-v-micallef/post_8012_b_5582734.html+&cd=20&hl=en&ct=clnk&gl=us
	If only the Austrian government had been less vengeful, if only the German government had acted to constrain its Austrian ally, if only Serbia had been more willing to support the Austrian investigation into the assassination, or had initiated its own investigation and moved to arrest the conspirators. If only Russia had been less adamant in its support of Serbia, if only diplomacy had been given more time to craft a peaceful solution. The list of “if only(s)” is endless. But would any of these “if only(s)” have made a difference in the end? To answer that question we need to consider the underlying factors that shaped the actions and positions of the principal actors in the July crisis


Serbia didn't want investigation?


	...It was generally accepted by everyone, including Serbia’s Russian and French allies, that the Serbian government had been complicit in the assassination plot. The weapons used by the six conspirators had all come from a Serbian military depot in Belgrade. Five of the conspirators were 19 years of age or younger and had been recruited and assisted by a number of Serbian military officers and government officials.


a bit more nuanced than that--iirc gov officials involved, but government as a whole didn't want the assassination

	...Why then did the Serbian government refuse all requests by Austrian authorities to assist with their investigation or to launch their own investigation into the assassination and move to arrest any of the conspirators? Why did the Serbian government make no attempt to clear itself of the charges that it had been complicit in the plot to assassinate the Archduke? The answer was politics. Serbia was scheduled to hold a general election on August 14. The death of the Archduke had been met by wide spread rejoicing in Serbia, notwithstanding the fact he had been considered sympathetic to the aspirations of the Bosnian Serbs. Any action that would have been seen as bowing to Austrian pressure would have been political suicide for the Serbian government.


a theory into why they didn't have an investigation



http://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/vladimir-putin-the-art-of-the-bluff_us_58b6fb33e4b0ddf65424625b

http://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/the-final-collapse-of-oba_b_12400772.html


seems like a Russian propagandist


------


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sykes%E2%80%93Picot_Agreement

Sazonov involved in Sykes-Picot

https://www.chathamhouse.org/expert/comment/fresh-look-sykes-picot

McMeekin says Sazonov the "mastermind"


https://books.google.com/books?id=iIy5CgAAQBAJ&pg=PT349&lpg=PT349&dq=Sergey+Sazonov+Bolsheviks&source=bl&ots=NlmVtW7Yii&sig=c_cWHnTDYDIgMRQy5ehQpIwUQd8&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwjvh-D_w87WAhWM8CYKHVq-CPoQ6AEIZTAQ#v=onepage&q=Sergey%20Sazonov%20Bolsheviks&f=false

	The Islamic State claims one of the goals of its insurgency is to reverse the Sykes-Picot Agreement.


https://www.wikitree.com/wiki/Von_Zarnekau-2

one tie between Sazonov and the Okhrana


-------

https://books.google.com/books?id=DBwTBQAAQBAJ&pg=PA871&lpg=PA871&dq=%22Kerensky+Offensive%22&source=bl&ots=5sqsQwolc5&sig=U7uGXV7K4UoZIKYBFhVrdnmLHRo&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwiiz5rdq9DWAhUFzmMKHX34DFk4HhDoAQgnMAE#v=onepage&q=%22Kerensky%20Offensive%22&f=false



https://quizlet.com/115110938/sps-how-does-lenin-seize-power-flash-cards/


https://books.google.com/books?id=KTq2BQAAQBAJ&pg=PA403&lpg=PA403&dq=Bolshevik+%22truth+squads%22+-Obama&source=bl&ots=ke77dagamh&sig=L2luAIs9LxTnbXOeJ_mw5z4bDkk&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwidruqKsNDWAhVU7GMKHevmC9AQ6AEILjAD#v=onepage&q=Bolshevik%20%22truth%20squads%22%20-Obama&f=false


Bolshevik truth-squads follow around Kerensky and tell soldiers not to fight



http://scholarship.richmond.edu/cgi/viewcontent.cgi?article=1701&context=honors-theses

Kerensky decision to prolong war perplexing, author points to influence of allies


------

https://encyclopedia.1914-1918-online.net/article/peace_initiatives
	The Russians campaigned for a general peace along two separate but inter-related tracks. On one, the Provisional Government tried to convince the Allies to join in an inter-Allied conference to revise war aims. The Russians specifically wanted their partners to join them in working for an end to the war on the basis of the “Petrograd formula” – a peace “without annexations or indemnities...based on the rights of nations to decide their own affairs.” In addition to this governmental effort at war aims revision, the Petrograd Soviet on 15 May 1917 called for a negotiated peace and for socialists in the belligerent states to force their governments to end the war on the basis of the Petrograd formula. It urged all socialists to send representatives to Stockholm for a conference on how to achieve this goal.

	...Most basically, the Russian people’s desire for peace was a primary cause of the revolution; no revolutionary leadership could ignore that sentiment and expect to stay in power. At the same time, neither the Provisional Government nor the Soviet wanted peace at any price and all leading political parties opposed a separate peace with the Central Powers. Russian leaders thought that a separate settlement with Germany would have devastating results for their country. It would probably allow Germany to win the war in the west, leaving Russia with a powerful enemy right on its border; turn Russia into a virtual German colony; and perhaps lead to a restoration of the Tsar.


Although it didn't lead to Germany winning in the West. Did they really think that? how did American involvement figure in to this?





	The dual-track peace program, in contrast, maximized chances for a quick negotiated end to the entire war. The Stockholm conference would hopefully spur socialist and liberal elements in the Allied nations to pressure their governments into formally embracing the Petrograd formula. Once that happened, the governments of the Central Powers would see that negotiations were possible and, pressured by their own leftist groups at home, they would embrace talks to stop the fighting.

	Neither the Stockholm conference nor Allied war aims revision got very far.

looks like it was just some socialist pow-wow? https://ww1live.wordpress.com/2017/09/12/stockholm/


	The Allies saw little reason to negotiate with the Provisional Government over war aims when Russia’s contribution to the Allied war effort was lagging. They also feared an open discussion of war aims would undermine their public’s will to fight. They therefore largely ignored the Provisional Government’s attempt to get them to hold an inter-Allied meeting on peace terms. The Allies also had little difficulty sabotaging the Stockholm conference. Even socialists within the Allied nations were divided over the wisdom of the conference and hesitated to endorse it. The British government was at first willing to allow Labour Party members to attend, but only as a gesture to encourage Russia to stay in the war. Once the United States, Italy, and France undercut Stockholm by refusing to issue passports to socialists who wanted to go, Britain did the same thing. As for Germany, Erzberger and the Center Party, the Progressives, and the SPD joined together to pass a “peace resolution” in the Reichstag in July 1917 that vaguely echoed the Petrograd formula. It sharpened Germany’s domestic political divisions over war aims, but it had little practical impact on German foreign policy. While German leaders did allow the SPD to go to Stockholm, they only did so to keep the party loyal to the war effort. Seeing their peace program in trouble, the Russians attempted a military offensive in early July 1917, hoping to enhance their diplomatic influence abroad. The offensive failed badly, however, fatally undermining the Russian peace effort.

	The Bolsheviks and Peace by Capitulation

	Within months of the collapse of the July 1917 offensive, the Bolsheviks led by Vladimir I. Lenin (1870-1924) took power in Russia. From November 1917 to early January 1918, they repudiated traditional diplomacy, concluded an armistice with the Central Powers, and tried to use peace negotiations at Brest-Litovsk as a propaganda platform to spark socialist revolutions in all the belligerents. No revolutions occurred, however. The Allies moderated their publicly stated war aims to a minimal degree to rally their publics to the war effort and refused to join in the peace talks between the Central Powers and the Russians. At the Brest-Litovsk negotiations, the Germans at first put forward a program designed to “stage-manage” the self-determination of Russia’s borderlands in a way that assured German domination of them. When the Bolsheviks balked at accepting these terms, the Germans resumed their military advance into Russia, which convinced the Bolshevik government to give up the war. Led by Lenin, the Bolsheviks decided that continued fighting was fruitless and would undermine their hold on power. On 3 March 1918, they signed the Treaty of Brest-Litovsk with the Central Powers, yielding sovereignty over a vast area containing some 55 million people. A few weeks later, the Central Powers imposed a similarly onerous peace treaty on Romania.



------

https://weaponsandwarfare.com/2016/02/25/the-battle-of-riga-september-1917/

on campaign for Riga

	Later details of the fall indicated that although some Russian detachments had fled before the oncoming enemy, others of the Russian troops behaved with great gallantry. They fought well, but were finally compelled to retreat owing to the superior numbers of the enemy’s forces, and his preponderance in artillery. The Petrograd reports mentioned that the fortifications and bridges of the town were blown up before the retirement.



https://archive.org/stream/withrussianarmy101knoxuoft/withrussianarmy101knoxuoft_djvu.txt
	Chapters XII.-XVI. describe the fighting in 1916, with many hither- 
to unpublished details of Brusilov's offensive and the subsequent opera- 
tions. Chapter XVII. deals with the political unrest preceding the 
Revolution. Chapters XIX.-XXV. give an eye-witness's account of 
the Revolution of March I2th, 1917, and of the rapid decline of the 
Russian army, culminating in the Bolshevik coup d'etat of November 7th 
and the negotiations for the separate peace. 


	...The day before we left the Embassy in Petrograd on 
January 6th, 1918 he came to me to say good-bye, and broke 
down, confessing that he had never imagined that things would 
go as far as they had and that his country would stoop to the 
negotiation of a separate peace. In the autumn of the following 
year he came out to Siberia by the northern route to join Admiral 
Kolchak at Omsk, and he told me there that he had no longer 
cause for shame on Russia's behalf in talking to an ally, for the 
Allies had abandoned his country. His theory was that Bol- 
shevism, being a German war-product, the Allies were in duty 
bound to destroy it. He was captured by the Bolsheviks at 
Krasnoyarsk. He was a fine fellow and a patriot. 


thought after all the fighting there would just be more war

the "bolshevism is german front" thing would have helped divide the country more, some thinking they are for the people others thinking they are sinister foreign power.



not sure about Knox tho


https://encyclopedia.1914-1918-online.net/article/eastern_front#1917__Russia_E2_80_99s_Dying_Gasp
	When the tsar did abdicate, on 15 March (new style), many of Russia’s generals and leading politicians hoped that the country would rally behind its new, quasi-democratic government and drive the invader from the country, as the French had in 1792.

	Most also insisted on maintaining military discipline — with some easing of the draconian punishments so infamous in the Russian Army, but even this clashed with the revolutionary sentiment of the day. The Petrograd Soviet of Workers, Soldiers, and Sailors—the leading revolutionary political body in the city, though technically it shared power with the Duma—issued both “Order Number One” and “The Declaration of the Rights of the Soldier.” These called for equality among the soldiers, with no insignia of rank to be used, an end to saluting, and unit votes on any proposed military action, among other things. Many commanders resigned, recognizing that it was impossible to conduct affairs in this manner. 

	...On 19 July, the Germans counter-attacked toward Tarnopol; the Russian formations opposing them simply vanished. The Central Powers advanced twelve kilometers on the first day of the offensive and captured Tarnopol on 25 July. By early August, the Russians had evacuated both Galicia and the Bukovina, surrendering all of the gains of 1916. In the chaotic flight to the rear, soldiers shot their officers and simply began walking home. For all intents and purposes, Russia disposed of no organized military force south of the Pripet Marshes. The counter-offensive nonetheless ground to a halt at the Galician border. Austria-Hungary had no further reserves to dedicate to the attack, and the Germans needed every available man on the Western Front. For the moment, Russia was spared. 





https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Maria_Bochkareva#United_States_and_Britain
	While in New York, Bochkareva dictated her memoirs, Yashka: My Life As Peasant, Exile, and Soldier to a Russian emigre journalist named Isaac Don Levine.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Isaac_Don_Levine
	Isaac Don Levine (January 19, 1892 – February 15, 1981) was a 20t-Century Russian-born American journalist and anticommust writer, involved with Soviet ex-spies Walter Krivitsky and Whittaker Chambers and also Lee Harvey Oswald.


suspicious




https://books.google.com/books?id=zxpXAAAAMAAJ&pg=PA64&dq=diary+of+Russian+soldier+1917&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwictMeG_9DWAhWC4SYKHYEbBjwQ6AEIJjAA#v=onepage&q=diary%20of%20Russian%20soldier%201917&f=false

Diary of english guy in Russia


https://archive.org/stream/russianrevolutio011007mbp/russianrevolutio011007mbp_djvu.txt
	Full text of "The Russian Revolution 1917 Eyewitness Account Volume"


http://www.archive.org/stream/documentsofrussi027937mbp/documentsofrussi027937mbp_djvu.txt
	Full text of "Documents Of Russian History 1914 1917" 

------


https://books.google.com/books?id=g4SbP95FkT0C&pg=PA430&dq=Russia+war+1917+%22personal+account%22&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwj_96qb-dDWAhWD0iYKHX4aD0wQ6AEIJjAA#v=onepage&q=Russia%20war%201917%20%22personal%20account%22&f=false


annotated bibliography on Russian revolution and civil war


https://books.google.com/books?id=A574mjoDCSoC&pg=PA158&dq=Riga+1917+%22Russian+soldier%22&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwi2n93U_NDWAhVFVyYKHQHEAkcQ6AEIQjAF#v=onepage&q=%22Russian%20soldier%22&f=false

dicitonary on WW1



https://books.google.com/books?id=I1LtBAAAQBAJ&pg=PT125&dq=Eastern+Front+1917+%22Russian+soldier%22&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwiu9Yr4-dDWAhWH4yYKHepoCdkQ6AEITTAH#v=onepage&q=Eastern%20Front%201917%20%22Russian%20soldier%22&f=false

on Germans using gas shells in Riga


------

https://forum.axishistory.com//viewtopic.php?t=29985

On battle of Riga



------

https://archive.org/stream/russianrevolutio011007mbp/russianrevolutio011007mbp_djvu.txt
	It was as patriots that the Mamelukes were shaken, but the 
Opposition was well aware that a defeat at the front would free 
the hands of internal reaction still more. After all, no matter 
how well aware Kerensky was that a wretched ending to his 
enterprise was inevitable, he blamed the Bolsheviks and the July 
uprising for it, both to himself and aloud. Of the Mamelukes, 
the yellow press, and the petty-bourgeois mass, there is no need 
to speak. For them the Tarnopol defeat and the collapse of the 
whole longed-for offensive was the work of Bolshevik hands 
from beginning to end. And indeed, in the official communiques 
from Headquarters Bolshevik agitation was directly blamed for 
the defeat. 

well there's one perspective

	...Even before the Kornilov mutiny, before the fall of Riga and 
after the Moscow Conference, the entire bourgeois press had 
sounded the alarm about the Bolshevik peril, in connexion with 
'reliable reports' about forthcoming 'demonstrations' by the 
Bolsheviks. But that was a false alarm, with the object of putting 
public opinion on to a false scent and covering up the conspiracy 
of Headquarters. 


	...But a group of Kornilovite officers who had left the train 
refused to allow the delegation to see the echelons. After long 
and stormy arguments the delegates had to go back, since it was 
already after 9 o'clock. But they had already done enough to 
undermine the morale of the detachment: the 'Savages' had 
been informed of the real state of affairs. Later they told of 
how they had been lured to Petersburg: first they had been told 
they were being taken north of Riga to repel the Germans ; 
after Dno they were assured that the Bolsheviks were slaughter- 
ing people in Petersburg, and that these traitors had to be 
repressed. To make things more convincing a provocateur 
threw a bomb at the echelon not far from Dno, which 
heightened morale. But simple information made it fall again. 


paid protestors???



http://www.archive.org/stream/documentsofrussi027937mbp/documentsofrussi027937mbp_djvu.txt
	Yesterday the Central Executive Committee learned that in a 
certain printing office Black Hundred proclamations were being pre- 
pared ... [a search was made,] and the following appeal was 
found set up in type : 

"Misfortune has come upon us. The Germans have broken 
through our front ; they have seized Tarnopol ; they have captured 
our cannons, the same which the English gave us. Russia is faced 
with defeat and humiliation. There are cowards in the army who 
desert their posts and thereby help the enemy. Formerly the Rus- 
sian soldier fought like a hero; now he runs. Think it over, and 
honestly answer to yourself the question : What is the cause of all 
this misery? 

"The army and the rear are one. The restlessness in the rear has 
made itself felt at the front. At the present time we have no govern- 
ment; some one has stolen it. Who is the thief, who is it that betrays 
and ruins Russia ? The power has been seized by the Central Com- 
mittee of the Soviet of Workers' and Soldiers' Deputies. It is this 
body that appoints ministers. Who are these ministers ? The greater 
number of them have been in prison. Among these are Tseretelli, 
Shingarev, Chernov, and Nekrasov. They selected Kerenski as their 
chief. He is a good orator, and brave, but after all he is chief of 
convicts, and agrees with them. . . ."


black hundreds blaming Kerenski for losses? Bolsheviks?

	TELEGRAM OF GENERAL KORNILOV B 

Having received a report from the commander of the XI Army 
that the soldiers under him, in retreating from Tarnopol, robbed the 
inhabitants, violated women and children, killed peaceful citizens, 
and murdered one another, I gave orders to shoot such scoundrels 
without trial. In obedience to this order, fourteen caught in the act 
were shot. In announcing this to the armies on the front entrusted 
to me, I wish to add that I have given orders to shoot without trial 
all those who rob, use force on, or kill peaceful citizens or fellow 
soldiers, and all those who refuse to carry out war orders at this 
minute when the very existence of the country, freedom, and the 
revolution is at stake, I will stop at nothing to save the country from 
destruction due to the despicable behavior of traitors, betrayers, 
and cowards. This order is to be read in all companies, etc. 

GENERAL KORNILOV 

Kornilov shooting those who retreat, or he says caught looting and raping


	These shameful pogroms are due to the widespread discontent 
of the masses with their condition. Peace did not arrive as quickly 
as they expected, bread did not become cheaper, there is now just 
as great a shortage of clothing, shoes, and agricultural tools as before. 
The revolution, which in its first days gave the impression of a holi- 
day, an easy way to peace, happiness, food, and freedom, has now 
shown its stern and worried face. Alongside of this news comes other, 
of the disorganization of the army, of the shameful flight of whole 
army corps, of bestial acts such as at Tarnopol. 9 

* # * Jj 

The attention of the Government is taken up with lawlessness in 
the country. At its last meeting the question of the anarchy in the 
Donetz Basin was- discussed. Production [of coal] has fallen so 
low that the railroads may be forced to stop running. Another bit of 
sad news was from Kaluga, where a pogrom has been going on four 
days and, unfortunately, some of the troops are involved. Freight 
handlers -at Moscow are on strike and freight is not moving. 10 

talking about pogroms, country deteriorating



https://archive.org/stream/ArthurRansomedispatchesFromRussia1917-1924.Vol.I/ArthurRansomeDipatchesFromRussia1917-1924.Vol.I._djvu.txt
Russia's Effort At Recovery. 

Welding Of Diverse Parties. 

Council Of Ten. 

Petrograd, July 27. 

Petrograd a week ago was congratulating itself on the liquidation of the 
Extremist plot to overthrow the Government and undermine the authority of 
the Council by armed force. Order was restored in the town and the hope was 
expressed that the new order in the capital would be reflected on the front. 
That may yet come. We had forgotten that the disorders would be reflected 
there first, since they preceded the establishment of order. This actually 
happened. The troops on the front, full of rumors of the overthrow of the 
Government and anarchy, fell completely under the influence of the extremist, 
whose party they supposed were now masters of the situation. 

The result was that first one regiment and then another, without orders and 
not pressed by the enemy, walked away from the front, leaving a gap which 
the enemy speedily turned into a breach and then into a wide thrust, and 
compelling a general retreat of the three armies of the south-west. The retreat 
of the 11th Army on and beyond Tarnopol became an elemental movement 
eastwards. 

The better disciplined and more conscientious troops, like the bicyclists, the 
cavalry, and the artillery, behaved admirably, but were rendered helpless by 
the dislocation of their communications by the floods of infantry towards the 
East. The enemy crossed General Brussiloffs old-line west of Tarnopol and 
pushed on to the Serath River. Meanwhile they extended southwards driving 


248 



DISPATCHES FROM RUSSIA 1917-1924. 


the Seventh Army south-eastwards on to the communications of the Eighth 
Army, which are driven far west beyond Halitch, and is now retiring east of 
Tluman and Nijnlow. 

The stiffening and unification of parties in the capital after last week's bloody 
disorders were increased by the news from the front, which momentarily 
welded all parties in a firm determination to save Russia and hold up the 
retreat. The death penalty was reestablished for treason, disobedience, or 
instigation to such acts in face of the enemy. But this alone could not alter 
events. The future will depend on whether the disorganization has gone too far 
for events in Petrograd to have their influence. 

I believe this not so. I believe that the easterly movement of the troops will 
stop and the soldiers, realizing that they had been tricked by the Germans, and 
realizing as it is realized here, that the Germans and the Extremist were 
working together, will hold the German advanced before it reaches the Russian 
frontier. It is probable that the German commanders had found themselves 
forced by the Russian retreat into an advance on a far bigger scale than they 
themselves are prepared for. With insufficient troops they may themselves be 
in difficulties if the Russians succeed, as they may, in reaffirming disciplined 
resistance. 

Events on the front have hurried the crystallization here. A Government of Ten 
has been formed, which is a sort of Council of National Safety, and has 
dictatorial powers, although it reports twice weekly to the Executive 
Committees. A meeting of all the representative bodies, including, besides the 
Government, the Executive Committees and Members of the Duma, and of the 
Municipalities and District Councils, etc., will take place at Moscow. The 
Government will ask for and be given full support, and will have the sanction 
of the assembly in the policy it will then pursue. 

Meanwhile the Extremist are having a very bad time. The Baltic Fleet and the 
Army Committees of the Northern front, the Moscow Council, and the 
Sevastopol Council, and others all express full confidence in the Council of 
Ten. Many Extremist and alleged German agents have been arrested. 


chaos in army after july days


...


DN. August 2, 1917. 

Army’s Recovery 

Discipline Restored in Agony of Retreat. 

Petrograd, Tuesday. 

News from the front is by no means wholly bad. The Russians are once again 
accomplishing the impossible in reestablishing the spirit and discipline of the 
Army while that army is still in the agonies of retreat. The extent to which this 
has already been accomplished may be judged from the fact that one of the 
disgraced regiments ordered to be disbanded was forced to submit to this 
indignity by faithful troops within a mile of the front trenches and while still 
under fire from the enemy. 

East of Tarnopol the enemy has only been able to advance fifteen miles in six 
days, and is now meeting with a sturdy resistance. It also should be 
remembered that the Russian Army as a whole is not to blame for the disaster 
brought upon it by the failure of the few battalions, who themselves owe their 
disgrace more to their own ignorance, which left them a prey to unscrupulous 
agitation, then to any conscious disloyalty. 

Innumerable Heroes. 

Further against the shameful episodes that marked the beginning of the retreat 
must be set innumerable examples of individual gallantry, equal to those of 
any soldiers in the world. Hundreds of the youth in Russia have gone knowingly 
to their death in the desperate hope that their example would recall others to 
their duty. Let me give one example. Sailors from Rebel who went to the front 
received orders to break through two lines of the enemy trenches. They took 
four lines. Then wishing to consolidate their gains they asked for support. 
Instead, absolutely under the influence of agitators, Russian troops in the rear 
fired upon them. Under this double fire they at last were compelled to retire to 
their original positions. Three officers killed themselves rather than go back, 
and of 350 soldiers only 15 were unwounded. 

This and many other such incidents have had a tremendous effect upon the 
remaining troops. Men of disbanded regiments beg to be allowed to return to 
the front to rehabilitate themselves, in many cases pointing to the fact that 
they are wearers of the Cross of Saint George for previous bravery as proof of 
their actions were due to evil councils, and not to cowardice. On the southwest front General Korniloff has forbidden meetings of any kind within the area of 
active operations.  


bravery and treachery in Tarnpol, August


...

DN. July 25, 1917. 

Dictatorial Powers Granted To Russian Government: German "Poisoning The 
Springs." 

Petrograd, Monday. 

Yesterday's communique is the saddest ever issued by any General Staff. It is 
issued by the Staff who have firm trust in the future and pride in the past, and 
know that Russia's Allies well remember that the soldiers who weakened and 
yielded before German agitation are the same who with empty rifles, sticks, 
and spades fought yard by yard and finally brought to a standstill the whole 
weight of Mackensen's advance two years ago. It is no shame for the Army 
when it faints after drinking at the poisoned wells, and the Germans seeing 


243 



DISPATCHES FROM RUSSIA 1917-1924. 


the Russians eagerly drinking after long centuries of thirst poured their vile 
bacteria into the newly opened spring of freedom. 

The truth is not that democracy means weakness, but that the enemies of 
democracy, fearing its strength, have need of the vilest of all methods against 
it. It is now clear enough that the events of the last week were not isolated 
and independent phenomena. German agents working in Finland and Austrian 
agents working in Ukraine have in each case been turning to the advantage of 
Germany perfectly honorable and natural national instincts. 

"Fanatic Enthusiast." 

Hand-in-hand with the fanatic enthusiasts these false comrades have profited 
by the simplicity of the Russian soldiers and Russian workmen to sow phrases 
and to reap, at the moment they recognized it, the whirlwind. The time was 
well chosen, the first step was to throw Petrograd into an uproar, the next to 
let the simple soldiers on the front feel that the power behind them was being 
tossed from hand to hand. 

Many of those who, under Extremist influence, refused to obey orders at the 
front, did so believing that the authority behind these orders had already 
passed to the Extremist, who would not wish them obeyed. It must be 
remembered that for two days here Petrograd seemed to be in Extremist 
hands. Is it not curious that practically simultaneously with this were the 
disorders in Kieff behind the south-west front, and the disorders in Nijai- 
Norgored in the center of Russia, followed immediately by the German blow on 
a front which can hardly have been prepared without the fullest knowledge of 
the particularly favorable conditions maturing for its delivery? 

Complete Exposure. 

In each case the history of the disorders exactly corresponds with a history of 
those in Petrograd. In Nijni, as in the capital, the success of the mutineers 
seemed complete. The town was at their disposal. What the Petrograd 
mutineers did not dare to do they did in arresting existing and establishing 
new authority. In each case good sense reasserted itself and the mutineers 
were disarmed after that had seemed quite impossible. 

What happened here will happen on the front also. Korniloff's gallant advance 
in Galicia may be liquidated by the Germans, but they have paid for this by a 
complete exposal of the alliance between German militarism and Russian 


244 



DISPATCHES FROM RUSSIA 1917-1924. 


Extremism. The ??? which Hindenburg handed to Michaelis may have cost him 
too dear. It has cost him already this, All Russia knows now who was poisoning 
the wells. She will not forgive. She has arrested a retreat before. She will do 
so again. 


believes "extremism" a German plot, attests to bravery of soldiers despite some succumbing to their influence



https://archive.org/stream/russianturmoilme00deniuoft/russianturmoilme00deniuoft_djvu.txt
	Apart from this undesirable element, units were rilled with 
the late inmates of convict prisons, owing to the broad amnestv 
granted by the Government to criminals, who were to expiate 
their crimes by military service. My efforts to combat this 
measure were unavailing, and resulted in the formation of a special 
regiment of convicts — a present from Moscow — and in the forma- 
tion of solid anarchist cadres in the Reserve Battalions. The 
naif and insincere argument of the Legislator that crimes were 
committed because of the Czarist Regime, and that a free country 
would convert the criminal into a self-sacrificing hero, did not 
come true. In the garrisons, where amnestied criminals were for 
some reason or other more numerous, they became a menace to 
the population before they ever saw the Front. Thus, in June, 
in the units quartered at Tomsk, there was an intense propaganda 
of wholesale plunder and of the suppression of all authority. 
Soldiers formed large robber bands and terrorized the population. 
The Commissar, the Chief of the garrison, and all the local 
Revolutionary Organisations started a campaign against the plun- 
derers; after much fighting, no less than 2,300 amnestied criminals 
were turned out of the garrison. 


why did they do that

	
	Reforms were intended to affect the entire administration of 
the Army and of the Fleet, but the above-mentioned Committees 
of Polivanov and Savitch failed to carry them out, as they were 
abolished by Kerensky, who recognised at last all the evil they 
had wrought. The Committees merely prepared the Democratisa- 
tion of the War and Naval Councils by introducing elected 
soldiers into them. This circumstance is the more curious 
because, according to the Legislator's intention, these Councils 
were to consist of men of experience and knowledge, capable of 
solving questions of organisation, service, and routine, of military and naval legislation, and of making financial estimates of the cost 
of the armed forces of Russia. This yearning of the uncultured 
portion of Democracy for spheres of activity foreign to it was 
subsequently developed on an extensive scale. Thus, for example, 
many military colleges were, to a certain extent, managed by 
Committees of servants, most of whom were illiterate. Under 
the Bolshevik Regime, University Councils numbered not only 
Professors and students, but also hall-porters. 


comes across as sabotage of the military


------


https://archive.org/stream/russianturmoilme00deniuoft/russianturmoilme00deniuoft_djvu.txt
CHAPTER XXII. 
The Condition of the Army at the July Advance. 

HAVING outlined a whole series of conditions which exer- 
cised an influence on the life, spirit, and military efficiency 
of the once famous Russian Army, I shall now pass to the sorrow- 
ful tale of its fall. 

I was born in the family of an officer of the line, and for twenty- 
two years (including the two years of the Russo-Japanese War) 
before the European War served in the ranks of modest line units 
and in small Army Staffs. I shared the life, the joys and the sorrows 
of the officer and the soldier, and devoted many pages in the 
Military Press to their life which was my own. From 1914 to 1920, 
almost without interval, I stood at the head of the troops and led 
them into battle on the fields of White Russia, Volynia, Galicia, 
in the mountains of Hungary, in Roumania, and then — then in the 
bitter internecine war which, with bloody share, ploughed up our 
native land. 

I have more grounds and more right to speak of the Army and 
in the name of the Army than all those strangers of the Socialist 
Camp, who, in their haughty self-conceit, as soon as they touched 
the Army, began breaking down its foundations, judging its 
leaders and fighters and diagnosing its serious disease, who even 
now, after grievous experiments and experiences, have not given 
up the hope of transforming this mighty and terrible weapon of 
national self-preservation into a means for satisfying party and 
social appetites. For me, the Army is not only an historical, 
social, national phenomenon, but nearly the whole of my life, in 
which lie many memories, precious and not to be forgotten, in 
which all is bound up and interlaced into one general mass of 
swiftly passing days of sadness and of joy, in which there are 
hundreds of cherished graves, of buried dreams and unextinguish- 
able faith. 

The Army should be approached cautiously, never forgetting 
that not only its historical foundations, but even such details of its 
life as may, perhaps, seem strange and absurd, have their meaning 
and significance. 

When the Revolution began that old veteran, beloved by 
both officers and soldiers, General P. I. Mishtchenko, being 
unable to put up with the new regime, retired from the Army. He 
lived at Temir-Han Shoura, never went outside his garden fence, 
and always wore his General's uniform and his crosses of St. 
George, even in the days of Bolshevik power. One day the 
Bolsheviks came to search his house, and, among other things, 
wanted to deprive him of his shoulder straps and decorations. The 
old General retired to a neighbouring room and shot himself. 


why would they do that


...

Then came a torrent of newspapers, appeals, resolutions, 
orders, from some unknown authority, and with them a whole 
series of new ideas, which the soldier masses were unable to digest 
and assimilate. New people appeared, with a new speech, so 
fascinating and promising, liberating the soldiers from obedience 
and inspiring hope that they would be saved from deadly danger 
immediately. When one Regimental Commander naively inquired 
whether these people might not be tried by Field Court-Martial 
and shot, his telegram, after passing through all official stages, 
called forth the reply from Petrograd that these people were 
inviolable, and had been sent by the Soviet to the troops for the 
very purpose of explaining to them the true meaning of current 
events. 

When such leaders of the Revolutionary Democracy, as have 
not yet lost their feeling of responsibility for crucified Russia, now 
say that the movement, caused by the deep class differences between 
the officers and the soldiers and by " the enslavement " of the 
latter, was of an elemental nature, which they could not resist, this 
is deeply untrue. 

All the fundamental slogans, all the programmes, tactics, 
instructions and text-books, forming the foundation of the 
' democratisation " of the Army, had been drawn up by the 
military sections of the secret Socialist parties long before the 
War, outside of " elemental " pressure, on the grounds of clear, 
cold calculation, as a product of " Socialist reasoning and 
conscience." 

True, the officers strove to persuade the men not to believe 
the " new words " and to do their duty. But from the very 
beginning the Soviets had declared the officers to be foes of the 
Revolution; in many towns they had been subjected to cruel torture 
and death, and this with impunity. Evidently not without some 
reason, when even the " Bourgeois " Duma issued such a strange 
and unexpected " announcement " as the following: " This first 
day of March, rumours were spread among the soldiers of the 
garrison of Petrograd to the effect that the officers in the regi- 
ments were disarming the soldiers. These rumours were 
investigated and found to be false. As President of tl 
Military Commission of the Provisional Committee of the State 

02 



212 The Russian Turmoil 

Duma, I declare that the most decided measures will be taken to 
prevent such action on the part of the officers, up to the shooting 
of those guilty of it. Signed, Colonel Engelhardt." 

Next came Order No. I., the Declaration and so forth. 


suspects "Bourgeois" in Duma of sabotaging army?


...

Perhaps, however, it might have been possible to combat all 
this verbal ocean of lies and hypocrisy which flowed from 
Petrograd and from the local Soviets and was echoed by the local 
demagogues had it not been for a circumstance which paralysed all 
the efforts of the Commanders, viz., the animal feeling of self- 
preservation which had flooded the whole mass of the soldiers. 
This feeling had always existed. But it had been kept under 
and restrained by examples of duty fulfilled, by flashes of national 
self-consciousness, by shame, fear and pressure. When all these 
elements had disappeared, when for the soothing of a drowsy 
conscience there was a whole arsenal of new conceptions, which 
justified the care for one's own hide and furnished it with an ideal 
basis, then the Army could exist no longer. This feeling upset 
all the efforts of the Commanders, all moral principles and the 
whole regiment of the Army. 


this guy thought a lot about bolshevik propaganda targetting the army


...


Nine a.m. The first Company gradually begins to awaken. 
The trenches are incredibly defiled; in the narrow communication 
trenches and those of the second line the air is thick and close. 
The parapet is crumbling away. No one troubles to repair it; no 
one feels inclined to do so, and there are not enough men in the 
Company. There is a large number of deserters; more than fifty 
have been allowed to go. Old soldiers have been demobilised, 
others have gone on leave with the arbitrary permission of the 
Committee. Others, again, have been elected members of 
numerous Committees, or gone away as delegates; a while ago, 
for instance, the Division sent a numerous delegation to " Com- 
rade " Kerensky to verify whether he had really given orders 
for an advance. Finally, by threats and violence, the soldiers have 
so terrorised the regimental surgeons that the latter have been 
issuing medical certicates even to the " thoroughly fit." 

In the trenches the hours pass slowly and wearily, in dullness 
and idleness. In one corner men are playing cards, in another a 
soldier returned from leave is lazily and listlessly telling a story; 
the air is full of obscene swearing. Someone reads aloud from 
the Russian Messenger the following : 

" The English want the Russians to shed the last drop of their 
blood for the greater glory of England, who seeks her profit in 
everything. . . . Dear soldiers, you must know that Russia 
would have concluded peace long ago had not England prevented 
her. . . . We must turn away from her — the Russian people 
demand it; such is their sacred will." 

Someone or other swears. 

' Don't you wish for peace. They make peace, the ; 

we shall die here, without getting our freedom ! " 

Along the trenches came Lieutenant Albov, the Company 
Commander. He said to the groups of soldiers, somewhat 
irresolutely and entreatingly : 

" Comrades, get to work quickly. In three days we have 
not made a single communication trench to the firing line." 

The card players did not even look round; someone said in a 
low voice, " All right." The man reading the newspaper rose 
and reported, in a free and easy manner : 

* Generally speaking, the special services, and especially the artillery, retained 
their likeness to human beings, as well as a certain amount of discipline, much 
longer than the infantry. 



214 The Russian Turmoil 

" The Company does not want to dig, because that would 
be preparation for an advance, and the Committee has 
resolved. . . * l 

" Look here, you understand nothing at all about it, and, 
moreover, why do you speak for the whole Company ? Even if we 
remain on the defensive we are lost in case of an alarm; the whole 
Company cannot get out to the firing line along a single 
trench." 

He said this, and with a gesture of despair went on his way. 
Matters were hopeless. Every time he tried to speak with them 
for a time, and in a friendly way, they would listen to him atten- 
tively; they liked to talk to him, and, on the whole, his Company 
looked on him favourably in their own way. But he felt that 
between him and them a wall had sprung up, against which all his 
good impulses were shattered. He had lost the path to their soul — 
lost it in the impassable jungle of darkness, roughness, and that 
wave of distrust and suspicion which had overwhelmed the soldiers. 
Was it, perhaps, that he used the wrong words, or was not 
able to say what he meant ? Scarcely that. But a little while 
before the War, when he was a student and was carried away by 
the popular movement, he had visited villages and factories and 
had found " real words " which were clear and comprehensible 
to all. But, most of all, with what words can one move men to 
face death when all their feelings are veiled by one feeling — that 
of self-preservation ? 


Order Number One messed up army command, probably made soldiers vulnerable


...

In the green field, among the barbed wire, a regular bazaar was 
going on. A group of Germans and of our men were bartering 
vodka, tobacco, lard, bread. Some way off a German officer 
reclined on the grass — red-faced, sturdy, with an arrogant look on 
his face — and carried on a conversation with a soldier named 
Soloveytchick; and, strange to say, the familiar and insolent 
Soloveytchick stood before the Lieutenant respectfully. 

The Colonel pushed the observer aside and, taking his rifle 
from him, put it through the loop-hole. A murmur was heard 



The Condition of the Army at the July Advance 215 

among the soldiers. They began to ask him not to shoot. One 
of them, in a low voice, as if speaking to himself, remarked: 

" This is provocation." 

The Colonel, crimson with fury, turned to him for a moment 
and shouted : 

" Silence! " 

All grew silent and pressed to the loop-hole. A shot was heard, 
and the German officer convulsively stretched himself out and was 
still; blood was running from his head. The haggling soldiers 
scattered. 

The Colonel threw the rifle down and, muttering through his 
teeth "Scoundrels! " strode further along the trenches. The 
" truce " was infringed. 


soldiers "fraternizing with enemy," but officers not happy


...

The Sergeant-Major was preparing to leave. The Lieutenant 
stopped him. 

" Matters are bad, Petrovitch. They do not trust us." 

" God alone knows whom they trust; only last week the Sixth 
Company elected their Sergeant-Major themselves, and now they 
are making a mock of him; they won't let him say a word." 

" What will things be afterwards? " 

The Sergeant-Major blushed, and said softly : 

Then the Soloveytchicks will rule over us, and we shall be, 
so to speak, dumb animals before them — that is how matters will 
be, your honour." 


electing army officials not working well


...


The relief came at last. Captain Bouravin, the Commander 
of the Fifth Company, came into the hut. Albov offered to show 
him the section and explain the disposition of the enemy. 

" Very well, though that does not matter, because I am not 
really in command of the Company — I am boycotted." 

" How? " 

" Just so. They have elected the 2nd Lieutenant, my subaltern, 
as Company Commander, and degraded me as a supporter of the 
old regime, because, you see, I had drill twice a day — you know 
that the marching contingents come up here absolutely untrained. 
Indeed, the 2nd Lieutenant was the first to vote for my removal. 
' We have been slave-driven long enough/ said he. ' Now we are 
free. We must clean out everyone, beginning with the head. A 
young man can manage the regiment just as well, so long as he 
is a true Democrat and supports the freedom of the soldier.' I 
would have left, but the Colonel flatly refused to allow it, and 
forbids me to hand over the company. So now, you see, we have 
two commanders. I have stood the situation lor five days. Look 
here, Albov, you are not in a hurry, are you ? Very good, then ; 
let us have a chat. I am feeling depressed. Albov, have you not 
yet thought of suicide? " 

" Not as yet." 

Bouravin rose to his feet. 

" Understand me, they have desecrated my soul, outraged 
my human dignity, and so every day, every hour, in every word, 
glance or gesture one sees a constant outrage. What have I 
done to them ? I have been in the service for eight years ; I have 
no family, no house or home. All this I have found in the regi- 
ment, my own regiment. Twice I have been badly wounded, 
and before my wounds were healed have rushed back to the regi- 



The Condition of the Army at the July Advance 217 

men t — so there you are ! And I loved the soldier— I am ashamed 
to speak of it myself, but they must remember how, more than 
once, I have crept out under the barbed wire to drag in 
the wounded. And now ! Well, yes, I reverence the regimental 
flag and hate their crimson rags. I accept the Revolution. 
But to me Russia is infinitely dearer than the Revolution. All 
these Committees and meetings, all this adventitious rubbish 
which has been sown in the Army I am organically unable to 
swallow and digest. But, after all, I interfere with no one; I 
say nothing of this to anyone, I strive to convince no one. If 
only the War could be ended honourably, and then I am ready to 
break stones on the highway, only not to remain in an Army 
democratised in such a manner."


army sabotaged by order #1


------

https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/lfafar/first.htm
	Though leadership of the Soviet was in the hands of compromising elements, the pressure of the militant workers and soldiers compelled it to take a number of revolutionary measures—the arrest of tsarist officials, release of political prisoners, etc.

	On March 1 (14), the Soviet issued its “Order No. 1 to the Petrograd Garrison”. It played a very big part in revolutionising the army. Henceforth all military units were to be guided in their political actions solely by the Soviet, all weapons were to be placed at the disposal and under the control of company and battalion soldiers’ committees, orders issued by the Provisional Committee of the State Duma were to be obeyed only if they did not conflict with the orders of the Soviet, etc. 



https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/jun/03.htm
	V. I.   Lenin
	Bolshevism and “Demoralisation” of the Army

	...They need a pretext for saying: “The Bolsheviks are demoralising the army” and then shutting the Bolsheviks’ mouths.

	To dispose once for all of “enemy” slander and the ridiculous distortions of Bolshevism, we quote the concluding part of a leaflet distributed in the army by one of our delegates on the eve of the All-Russia Congress.

	Here it is: 

    	“Comrades, you must have your say.

    	“Do not let us have any agreements with the bourgeoisie?

    	“All power to the Soviet of Workers’ and Soldiers’ Deputies! 

    	...“Comrades! Only by the transfer of power to the democracy in Russia, Germany, and France, only by the overthrow of the bourgeois governments in all countries, can the war be ended. 

    	“Our revolution lies started this, and it is our task now to give a further impetus to the world revolution by having a fully authorised popular Russian government make an order of peace to all the governments of Europe and by strengthening our alliance with the revolutionary democrats of Western Europe. 

    	“Woe betide the bourgeois government that will persist in continuing the war after this.

		“Together with Its people we shall make revolutionary war upon that government. 


https://www.marxists.org/history/ussr/government/1917/03/01.htm



https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/sep/03b.htm
	12. The Kornilov revolt fully revealed that the entire army hates the General Staff. This had to be admitted even by those Mensheviks and S.R.s who through months of effort had proved their hatred for the Bolsheviks and their defence of the policy of agreement between the workers and peasants, on the one hand, and the landowners and the bourgeoisie, on the other. The hatred of the army for the General Staff will not die down but will become stronger now that Kerensky’s government has confined itself to substituting Alexeyev for Kornilov, leaving Klembovsky and other Kornilov generals, and has done absolutely nothing substantial to democratise the armed forces and remove the counter-revolutionary commanders. Soviets, which tolerate and support this weak, wavering, unprincipled policy of Kerensky and missed another opportunity to take all power peacefully when the Kornilov revolt was being liquidated, become guilty not only of conciliation but even of criminal conciliation.

	The army, which hates the General Staff and does not want to fight a war it now knows to be a war of conquest, is inevitably doomed to new catastrophes.



https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/7thconf/24c.htm
	Now things have gone still farther. We now have mass strikes, we have fraternisation at the front. To attempt prophecy in this respect would be a great mistake, but we cannot get away from the fact that sympathy for the International is growing, that revolutionary unrest is beginning in the German army. This is a fact which shows that the revolution in Germany is mounting. 


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/apr/28e.htm
	The capitalists either sneer at the fraternisation of the soldiers at the front or savagely attack it. By lies and slander they try to make out that the whole thing is “deception” of the Russians by the Germans, and threaten—through their generals and officers—punishment for fraternisation.

	From the point of view of safeguarding the “sacred right of property” in capital and the profits on capital, such a policy of the capitalists is quite correct. Indeed, if the proletarian socialist revolution is to be suppressed at its inception it is essential that fraternisation be regarded the way the capitalists regard it.

	The class-conscious workers, followed by the mass of semi-proletarians and poor peasants guided by the true instinct of oppressed classes, regard fraternisation with pro found sympathy. Clearly, fraternisation is a path to peace. Clearly, this path does not run through the capitalist governments, through an alliance with them, but runs against them. Clearly, this path tends to develop, strengthen, and consolidate fraternal confidence between the workers of different countries. Clearly, this path is beginning to wreck the hateful discipline of the barrack prisons, the discipline of blind obedience of the soldier to “his” officers and generals, to his capitalists (for most of the officers and generals either belong to the capitalist class or protect its interests). Clearly, fraternisation is the revolutionary initiative of the masses, it is the awakening of the conscience, the mind, the courage of the oppressed classes; in other words, it is a rung in the ladder leading up to the socialist proletarian revolution. 

	...We have always recommended that fraternisation be conducted in the most organised manner, taking care—with the help of the intelligence, experience and observation of the soldiers themselves—that there should be no catch in it, and that the officers and generals, who for the most part spread vicious slander against fraternisation, be kept away from the meetings. 


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/apr/x02.htm#s12
	12) SHOULD OFFICERS BE ELECTED BY THE SOLDIERS?

		A. (to the right oi the C.D.) and B. (C.D.). No. That would be detrimental to the landowners and capitalists. If the soldiers cannot be pacified otherwise, they must be temporarily promised this reform, but it must be withdrawn at the earliest possible moment.

		C. (S.D. and S.R.). Yes, they should.

		D. (“Bolsheviks”). Not only must they be elected, but every step of every officer and general must be supervised by persons specially elected for the purpose by the soldiers. 

	13) IS IT DESIRABLE FOR THE SOLDIERS, ON THEIR OWN DECISION, TO DISPLACE THEIR SUPERIORS?

		A. (to the right of the C.D.) and B. (C.D.). It is distinctly harmful. Guchkov has already forbidden it. He has already threatened to use force. Guchkov must be supported.

		C. (S.D. and S.R.). It is. But it is not clear whether they should be replaced before the matter is taken up with the Contact Commission, or vice versa.

		D. (“Bolsheviks”). It is desirable and essential in every way. The soldiers will obey and respect only elected authorities. 


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/oct/09.htm
	The "peaceful" hopes of the petty bourgeoisie that there might be a "coalition" with the bourgeoisie and agreements with them, that it will be possible to wait "calmly" for the "speedy" convocation of the Constituent Assembly, etc., have been mercilessly, cruelly, implacably destroyed by the course of the revolution. The Kornilov revolt was the last cruel lesson, a lesson on a grand scale, supplementing thousands upon thousands of small lessons in which workers and peasants were deceived by local capitalists and landowners, in which soldiers were deceived by the officers etc., etc. 

	...Besides, there is no doubt that Kornilovite generals and officers remaining in power will deliberately open the front to the Germans, as they have done in Galicia and Riga. This can be prevented only by the formation of a new government on a new basis, as expounded below. To continue any kind of agreements with the bourgeoisie after all that we have gone through since April 20 would be, on the part of the Socialist-Revolutionaries and Mensheviks, not only an error but a direct betrayal of the people and of the revolution. 

	...The entire course of development of the revolution, from the movement of April 20 to the Kornilov revolt, shows that there is bound to be the bitterest civil war between the bourgeoisie and the proletariat if this opportunity is missed. Inevitable catastrophe will bring this war nearer. It must end, as all data and considerations accessible to human reason go to prove, in the full victory of the working class, in that class, supported by the poor peasantry, carrying out the above programme; it may, however, prove very difficult and bloody, and may cost the lives of tens of thousands of landowners, capitalists, and officers who sympathise with them. The proletariat will not hesitate to make every sacrifice to save the revolution, which is possible only by implementing the programme set forth above. On the other hand, the proletariat would support the Soviets in every way if they were to make use of their last chance to secure a peaceful development of the revolution. 



https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/mar/15.htm
	Comrades, a revolution has taken place in Russia.

	The Petrograd and Moscow workers were again in the vanguard of the great freedom movement. They staged a political strike. They demonstrated in the streets under the Red Flag. They fought like lions against the tsarist police, gendarmerie and the small section of the army that did not immediately side with the people. More than 2,000 were killed and wounded in Petrograd alone. The Russian workers bought our country’s freedom at the price of their blood.

	The workers’ demands were: bread, freedom, peace.

	Bread—because, as in nearly every other country involved in this robber war, the Russian people are suffering from hunger.

	Freedom—because the tsarist government, taking advantage of the war, finally turned the whole of Russia into one big prison.

	Peace—because the Russian workers, like class-conscious workers in all other countries, do not want to go on dying for the interests of a handful of the rich, do not want to continue this criminal war, started by crowned and uncrowned freebooters.

	The insurgent workers were joined by most of the men of the Petrograd and Moscow garrisons. The workers and peasants in soldier’s uniform extended a hand of brother hood to the workers and peasants not in uniform. The honest-minded part of the officer corps joined the revolution. Officers who tried to go against the people were shot down by the soldiers. 


------

https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/sep/01.htm
	First of all, Martov’s vacillation over the transfer of power to the Soviets is quite typical. Prior to July 4 Martov was against this slogan. After July 4, he was for it. Early in August, he was once more against it, and note his   monstrously illogical and amusing, from a Marxist point of view, argumentation. He is against it because, he says, “the actual balance of forces does not at present warrant the demand for power to be transferred to the Soviets. This could come only in the course of a civil war, which at the moment is impermissible”.

	What a muddle.


Lenin arguing for civil war?


------

https://archive.org/stream/russianturmoilme00deniuoft/russianturmoilme00deniuoft_djvu.txt
	In the distance something between a mob 
and a column marched along the road towards the regimental 
staff quarters, carrying crimson flags. Before them went a huge 
banner bearing the inscription, in white letters, visible in the 
distance: " Down with War! " 

These were reinforcements coming up. At once, all the 
soldiers drilling on the green, as if at a signal, broke their ranks 
and ran towards the column. 

11 Hey, countrymen! What province are you from? " 

An animated conversation began on the usual anxious 
themes: how did matters stand with the land; would peace 
be concluded soon ?


doesn't sound right for army to act that way


https://archive.org/stream/russianturmoilme00deniuoft/russianturmoilme00deniuoft_djvu.txt
	During the preceding week a stormy meeting, which nearly 
ended in a riot, had been held in connection with the complaint 
of one of the companies that the soldiers had to eat lentils, which 
they hated, and thin soup, simply because all the groats and 
butter were taken for the officers' mess. This was clearly non- 
sense. Nevertheless, it was resolved to appoint a Committee for 
investigation, which would report to a general meeting of the 
regiment.


...The Chairman of the Commission ceased reading and suggested 
that " those comrades who wished " should express their 
opinions. A tall, stout soldier ascended the platform, and began 
speaking in a loud, hysterical voice : 

" Comrades, you have heard? That is where the soldiers' pro- 
perty goes. We suffer, our clothes are worn out, we are covered 
with lice, we go hungry, while they pull the last piece of food out 
of our mouths." 

As he spoke a spirit of nervous excitement kept growing in 
the crowd, muffled murmurs ran through it, and shouts of approval 
burst from it here and there. 

" When will there be an end to all this ? We are worn out, 
weary to death." 

Suddenly 2nd Lieut. Yassny's deep voice was heard from 
the rear ranks, drowning the voices both of the speaker and of the 
crowd. 

" What is your Company ? " 

Some confusion took place. The orator was dumb. Shouts 
of indignation were flung at Yassny. 

" What is your Company, I ask you ? " 
" The Seventh! " 

Voices were heard in the ranks : 

" We have no such man in the Seventh Company." 

" Wait a bit, my friend," boomed Yassny, " was it not you 
that came in to-day with the new lot . . . you were carrying 
a large placard ? When have vou had time to get worn out, poor 
fellow ? " 



The Condition of the Army at the July Advance 223 

The spirit of the crowd changed in an instant. It began to 
hiss, laugh, shout, and crack jokes. The unsuccessful orator 
disappeared in the crowd.


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/jun/03.htm
	“But beware of those who, posing as Bolsheviks, will try to provoke you to riots and disturbances as a screen for their own cowardice! Know that though they are with you now, they will sell you out to the old regime at the first hint of danger.

	“The real Bolsheviks call you to conscious revolutionary struggle, and not to riots. 


	Having thus outlined the process of the formation of the 
Coalition Ministry, Comrade Sklianka passed in greater detail to 
the fascinating prospects of rural and factory anarchy, where 
" the wrath of the people sweeps away the yoke of capital " and 
where " Bourgeois property gradually passes into the hands of its 
real masters — the workmen and the poorer peasants." 

" The soldiers and the workmen still have enemies," he con- 
tinued. " These are the friends of the overthrown Czarist 
Government, the hardened admirers of shooting, the knout, and 
blows. The most bitter foes of freedom, they have now donned 
crimson rosettes, call you ' comrades ' and pretend to be friends, 
but cherish the blackest intentions in their hearts, preparing to 
restore the rule of the Romanovs. 

" Soldiers, do not trust these wolves in sheep's clothing! 
They call you to fresh slaughter. Well, follow them if you like ! 
Let them pave the path for the return of the bloody Czar with 
your corpses. Let your orphans, your widows and children, 
deserted by all, pass again into slavery, hunger, beggary, and 

disease ! " 

The speech undoubtedly had a great success. The atmosphere 
grew red-hot, the excitement increased — that excitement of the 
" molten mass," in the presence of which it is impossible to fore- 
see either the limits or the tension, or the tracks along which the 
torrent will pour. The crowd was noisy and agitated, accompany- 
ing with shouts of approval or curses against " the enemies of 
the people " those parts of the speech which especially touched its 
instincts, its naked, cruel egotism. 


...


	Everyone in the regiment knows already of that morning's 
event in Albov's Company. He is questioned about details. A 
Lieutenant-Colonel sitting next him wagged his head. 

" Well done, our old man. There was something in the Fifth 
Company, too. But I am afraid it will end badly. Have you 
heard what was done to the Commander of the Doubov Regi- 
ment, because he refused to confirm an elected Company Com- 
mander and put three agitators under arrest ? He was crucified. 
Yes, my boy ! They nailed him to a tree and began, in turn, to 
stick their bayonets into him, to cut off his ears, his nose, his 
fingers." 

He seized his head in his hands. 

" My God! Where do these men get so much brutality, so 
much baseness ? " 


...

	He spoke with deep sincerity and pain in his voice. There were 
moments when it seemed as if his words were breaking through 
the withered crust of those hardened hearts, as if a break would 
again take place in the attitude of the crowd. 

" He, your ' new friend,' is calling you to mutiny, to violence, 
to robbery. Do you understand who will benefit when, in Russia, 
brother rises against brother, so as to turn to ashes, in sack and 
fire, the last property left not only to the ' capitalists,' but to the 
poverty-stricken workers and peasants ? No, it is not by violence, 
but by law and right, that you will acquire land and liberty and 
a tolerable existence. Your enemies are not here, among the 
officers, but there — beyond the barbed wire. And we shall not 
attain either to freedom or to peace by a dishonourable, cowardly 
standing in one and the same place, but in the general mighty 
rush of an advance/' 

Was it that the impression of Sklianka's speech was still too 
vivid or that the regiment took offence at the word " cowardly " 
— for the most arrant coward will never forgive such a reminder 
— or, finally, was it the fault of the magic word " advance," which 
for some time past had ceased to be tolerated in the Army ? But 
anyhow Albov was not allowed to continue his speech. 


------


https://archive.org/details/russianturmoilme00deniuoft

	The Russian Advance in the Summer of 1917

	...At the moment of writing I do not possess a complete list of the Russian Armies, but I may confidently assert that on all sectors upon which the advance had been planned we had a numerical and a technical superiority over the enemy, more especially in guns, of which we had larger quantities than ever. It fell to the lot of the South-Western Front to test the fighting capacity of the Revolutionary Army.


should have won?


	...Since the Germans had occupied the Cherviche " Place d'armes " on the Stokhod, Hindenburg's Headquarters had given orders that no operations should be conducted, as it was hoped that the disruption of the Russian Army and of the country would follow its natural course, assisted by German propaganda. The Germans estimated the fighting capacity of our Army very low. Nevertheless, when Hindenburg realised in the beginning of June that a Russian advance was a contingency to be reckoned with, he moved six divisions from the Western-European front and sent them to reinforce the group of Armies of Bohm-Ermolli.


Bolsheviks funded by Germans, maybe he saw them as just "German propaganda?"

the Bolshevik funding and perception around Lenin seems like an effective way to contribute to demoralization of the army. The soldiers might buy their propaganda but the officers would think it was a German plot--naturally pits the officers against the soldiers.


	...On June 19th the attack was renewed on a front of forty miles, between the Upper Strypa and the Narauvka. In this heavy and glorious battle the Russian troops took three hundred officers and eighteen thousand men prisoners in two days, twenty-nine guns, and other booty. The enemy positions were captured on many sectors, and we penetrated the enemy lines to an average depth of over two miles, driving him back to the Strypa in the direction of Zlochev.

	The news of our victory spread all over Russia, evoked universal rejoicings, and raised the hopes for the revival of the former strength of the Russian Army. Kerensky reported to the Provisional Government as follows: " This day is the day of a great triumph for the Revolution. On June 18th the Russian Revolutionary Army, in very high spirits, began the advance and has proved before Russia and before the world its ardent devotion to the cause of the Revolution and its love of Country and Liberty.


initial success raises hope that army morale not shattered


	. . . The Russian warriors are inaugurating a new discipline based upon feelings of a citizen's duty. . . . An end has been made to-day of all the vicious calumnies and slander about the organisation of the Russian Army, which has been rebuilt on Democratic lines. . . ." The man who wrote these words had afterwards the courage to claim that it was not he who had destroyed the Army, because he had taken over the organisation as a fatal inheritance !


does he blame Kerensky for destroying the army?


	...On the 28th the left column overcame the stubborn resistance of the Austro-Germans and captured Kalush. In the next two or three days, the 8th Army was in action on the river Lomnitza and finally established itself on the banks of the river and in front of it. In the course of this brilliant operation Kornilov's Army broke through the 3rd Austrian Army on a front of over twenty miles and captured 150 officers, 10,000 men, and about 100 guns. The capture of Lomnitza opened to Kornilov the road to Dolina-Stryi and to the communications of Botmer's Army. German Headquarters described the position of the Commander-in-Chief of the Western Front as *critical*.


initial success, Germans worried

	...Hindenburg's plan was to deal the Russian Army local blows, without straining his own resources or spending large reserves, so urgently needed, on the Western-European Front. By these tactics he intended to contribute to the natural course of the collapse of the Russian front, for it was upon this collapse that the Central Powers based all their calculations in regard to operations and even in regard to the possibility of continuing the campaign in 1918.


says Germans relying on collapse of Russian army while sending troops to Western front

	...Our efforts at advancing on other Fronts also ended in complete failure. On the 7th of July operations began on the Western Front, which I commanded. The details will be given in the next chapter. Of this operation Ludendorf wrote: " Of all the attacks directed against the former Eastern front of General Eichhorn, the attacks of July 9th, South of Smorgom, and at Krevo were particularly fierce. . . . For several days the position was extremely difficult until our reserves and our gunfire restored the front. The Russians left our trenches; they were no longer the Russians of the old days."

	On the Northern Front, in the 5th Army, everything was over in one day. The Stavka wrote: " South-West of the Dvinsk our troops, after strong artillery preparation, captured the German position across the railway Dvinsk-Vilna. Subsequently, entire divisions, without pressure from the enemy, deliberately retreated to their own trenches." The Stavka noted the heroic behaviour of several units, the prowess of the officers and the tremendous losses which the latter had suffered. This fact, however unim- portant from the strategical point of view, deserves to be specially noted. As a matter of fact, the 5th Army was commanded by General Danilov (afterwards a member of the Bolshevik Dele- gation at Brest-Litovsk. He served in 1920 in the Russian Army in the Crimea). He enjoyed exceptional prestige with the Re- volutionary Democracy. According to Stankevitch, the Commissar of the Northern Front, Danilov " was the only General who had remained, in spite of the Revolution, full master in the Army and had succeeded in so dealing with the new institutions — the Com- missars and the Committees — that they strengthened his authority instead of weakening it. . . . He knew how to make use of these elements, and he overcame all obstacles in a spirit of complete self-control and firmness. In the 5th Army everyone was working, learning and being educated. ... As the best and the most cultured elements of the Army were working to that end." This is a striking proof of the fact that even when the Commanding Officer becomes thoroughly familiar with Revolutionary institu- tions, this does not serve as a guarantee of the fighting capacity of his troops.


Russian troops retreating without orders (or with orders?)

	...For as early as on the 9th of July the Com- mittees and Commissars of the 11th Army were telegraphing to the Provisional Government: " The truth and nothing but the truth about the events." " The German offensive on the front of the nth Army, which began on July 6th, is growing into an immeasurable calamity which threatens perhaps the very existence of Revolutionary Russia. The spirit of the troops, that were prompted to advance by the heroic efforts of the minority, has undergone a decisive and fatal change. The impetus of the advance was soon spent. Most of the units are in a condition of increasing disruption. There is not a shadow of discipline or obedience; persuasion is likewise powerless and is answered by threats and sometimes by shootings. Cases have occurred when orders to advance immediately to reinforce the line were debated for hours at meetings, and reinforcements were twenty-four hours late. Some units arbitrarily leave the trenches without even wait- ing for the enemy to advance. . . . For hundreds of miles strings of deserters — healthy, strong men who thoroughly realise their impunity — are to be seen moving along with rifles or without. . . . The country should know the whole truth. It will shudder and will find the strength to fall with all its might upon all those whose cowardice is ruining and bartering Russia and the Revolution."


"Committees and Commissars" say German offensive an "immeasurable calamity"

	The Stavka wrote: " In spite of its enormous numerical and technical superiority, the nth Army was retreating uninterruptedly. On the 8th of July it had already reached the Serenth, never halting at the very strong fortified position to the West of the river, which had been our starting point in the glorious advance of 1916. Bohm- Ermolli had detached some of his forces for the pursuit of the Russian troops in the direction of Tarnapol and had moved his main forces southwards between the Serenth and the Strypa, threatening to cut off the communication of the 7th Army, to throw them into the Dniester and, perhaps, cut off the retreat of the 8th Army. On July 9th the Austro-Germans had aready reached Mikulinze, a distance of one march south of Tarnapol.

	...On July 10th the Austro-Germans advanced to the line Mikulinze-Podgaitze-Stanilavov. On the nth the Germans occupied Tarnapol, abandoned without fighting by the 1st Guards Army Corps. On the next day they broke through our position on the rivers Gniezno and Sereth, South of Trembovlia, and developed their advance in the Eastern and South-Eastern direc- tions. On the same day, pursuing the 7th and 8th Armies, the enemy occupied the line from the Sereth to Monsaterjisko- Tlumatch.

	On the 12th July, seeing that the position was desperate, the Commander-in-Chief issued orders for a retreat from the Sereth, and by the 21st the Armies of the South-Western Front, having cleared Galicia and Bukovina, reached the Russian frontier. Their retreat was marked by fires, violence, murders and plunder. A few units, however, fought the enemy stubbornly and covered the retreat of the maddened mob of deserters by sacrificing their lives. Among them were Russian officers, whose bodies covered the battlefields. The Armies were retreating in disorder; the same Armies that, only a year ago, had captured Lutsk, Brody-Stanis- lavov, Chernovetz in their triumphal progress . . . were retreating before the same Austro-German troops that only a year ago had been completely defeated and had strewn with fugitives the plains of Volynia, Galicia and Bukovina, leaving hundreds of thousands of prisoners in our hands.


retreat even though they had numerical and technical superiority, won before, some brave soldiers sacrificing themselves for retreat


	...On July nth Kornilov, upon his appointment to the Chief Command of the South-Western Front, sent to the Provisional Government his well-known telegram, of which he forwarded a copy to the Supreme Commander-in-Chief. In that telegram, already quoted above, Kornilov demanded the reintroduction of capital punishment, and wrote : ". . . I declare that the country is on the verge of collapse and that, although I have not been consulted, I demand that the offensive be stopped on all Fronts in order that the Army may be saved, preserved and re-organised on the basis of strict discipline, and in order that the lives may not be sacrificed of a few heroes who are entitled to see better days." In spite of the peculiar wording of this appeal, the idea of stopping the advance was immediately accepted by the Supreme Command, the more so that the operations had practically come to a standstill irrespective of orders as a result of the reluctance of the Russian Army to fight and to advance, as well as of the schemes of the German Headquarters.

	Capital punishment and Revolutionary courts-martial were introduced at the front. Kornilov gave an order to shoot deserters and robbers and to expose their bodies with corresponding notices on the roads and in other prominent places. Special shock bat- talions were formed of cadets and volunteers to fight against desertion, plunder and violence. Kornilov forbade meetings at the Front and gave an order to stop them by the force of arms. These measures — which were introduced by Kornilov at his own risk and peril, his manly, straightforward utterances, and the firm tone in which, disregarding discipline, he began to address the Provisional Government, and last, but not least, his resolute action — consider- ably enhanced his authority with the wide circles of Liberal Democracy and with the officers. Even the Revolutionary Democracy within the Army, stunned and depressed as it was by the tragic turn of events, saw in Kornilov, for some time after the debacle, the last resource and the only possible remedy in the desperate position. It may be stated that the date of July 8th, on which Kornilov took command of the South-Western Front and addressed his first demand to the Provisional Government, sealed his fate : in the eyes of many people he bacame a national hero and great hopes were centred upon him — he was expected to save the country.


Kornilov releases problems with army, demands end to advance, "expected to save the country"

	...The tragedy of July undoubtedly had a sobering effect upon the men. In the first place, they were ashamed because things had happened that were so shameful and so disgraceful that even the dormant conscience and the deadened spirit of the men could not find excuses for these happenings. Several months later, in November, after fleeing from the captivity of Bykhov, I spent several days under an assumed name and in civilian clothes among the soldiers who had flooded all the railways. They were dis- cussing the past. I never heard a single man confessing openly or cynically his participation in the treachery of July. They all tried to explain away the matter and chiefly attributed it to some- body's treason, especially, of course, the treason of the officers. None spoke of his own treachery. In the second place, the men were frightened. They felt that a kind of power, a kind of authority had arisen, and they were quietly waiting for develop- ments. Lastly, operations had ended and nervous tension had been relieved — which caused a certain reaction, apathy and indifference. 


soldiers reduced to apathy



The Conference at the Stavka

	...So sad was the plight of the country and the Army that I decided to disclose to the Conference the full truth on the condition of the Army in all its hideous nakedness, and in disregard of all conventionalities. I reported myself to the Supreme Commander- in-Chief. Brussilov surprised me. He said: " I have come to the conclusion that this is the limit and we must put the question squarely. All these Commissars, Committees and Democratisa- tions are driving the Army and Russia to ruin. I have decided categorically to demand that they should cease to disorganise the Army. I hope that yo.u will back me ? " I answered that this was in full accord with my intentions and that the object of my visit was to put the question squarely of the future destinies of the Army. I must confess that Brussilov's words reconciled me with him and I therefore decided to eliminate from my speech all the bitter things which I had intended to say against the Supreme Command.


what did Brussilov do?

	...General Brussilov addressed the Conference in a short speech, which struck me as being very vague and commonplace. In fact, he said nothing at all. I had hoped that Brussilov would keep his word and would sum up the situation and draw conclusions. I was mistaken. Brussilov did not speak again.


what's up with that?


	...The Commanding Officers did all they could in extremely difficult and painful surroundings, but the Supreme Commander-in-Chief is unaware of the fact that the meeting of the 1st Siberian Corps, where his speech was most enthusiastically received, continued after his departure. New speakers came forward and appealed to the men not to listen to the ' old Bourgeois ' (forgive me, that is so. . . . Brussilov interjected: " I do not mind ") and they heaped vile abuse upon his head. These appeals were also enthu- siastically greeted. The War Minister, who visited the troops and by his fiery eloquence incited them to deeds of valour, was enthusiastically received by the 28th Division. Upon his return to the train he was met by a regimental deputation which announced that half an hour after the Minister had gone the regiment, as well as another one, had decided not to advance. The picture was particularly moving and evoked great enthusiasm when, in the 29th Division, the Commanding Officer of the Poti Infantry Regi- ment knelt to receive the Red Banner. The men swore — there were three speakers and passionate cheering — to die for the country. On the first day of the advance the regiment did not reach our trenches, but turned round in a disgraceful manner and retreated six miles behind the battlefield.


troops considered officers "old Bourgeois" -- didn't Lenin say something like that?


	...Moral preparations for the advance were proceeding apace. On June 8th the Committee of the Front passed a resolution against the advance, but changed its mind on the 18th. The Com- mittee of the 2nd Army decided against the offensive on June 1st, but cancelled its decision on June 20th. In the Minsk Soviet 123 votes against yq decided against the advance. All the Committees of the 169th Infantry Division passed a vote of censure on the Provisional Government, and described the offensive as " treason to the Revolution." The campaign against the authorities mani- fested itself in a series of dismissal of Senior Commanders, in which the Committees almost invariably participated. Shortly before the opening of the operations an Army Corps Commander,


	...the Chief-of-Staff, and a Divisional Commander of the most important sector occupied by the shock troops, had to resign, and the same fate was shared by about 60 Commanding Officers, from Army Corps Commander to Regimental Commander. It is im- possible to estimate the amount of harm done by the Committee. They have no proper discipline of their own. If the majority passes a reasonable resolution, that does not suffice. It is put into practice by individual members of the Committee. Taking advantage of their position as members of Army Committees, the Bolsheviks have more than once spread mutiny and rebellion with impunity. As a result, authority is undermined instead of being strengthened, because so many different individuals and institutions are supposed to exercise that authority. And the Commander in the Field, who is being discredited, dismissed, controlled and watched from all sides, is nevertheless expected to lead the troops into action with a strong hand. Such was the moral preparation.

	...The troops have not yet been deployed. But the South-Western Front required immediate assistance. The enemy had already removed from my Front to the South- West three or four divisions. I decided to attack with the troops which presented at least a semblance of loyalty. In three days our guns had smashed the enemy trenches and wrought havoc among them, had inflicted heavy losses among the Germans, and had opened the way for our infantry. The first line had been almost entirely broken, and our men had already visited the enemy batteries. That breach of the Front promised to, develop into a great victory, for which we had been hoping for so long. . . . I now revert to descriptions of the battle. ' The units of the 28th Infantry Division took up their positions only four hours before the attack; of the 109th Regiment only two and a half companies, with four machine-guns and 30 officers, reached the appointed line; only one-half of the 110th came up. Two bat- talions of the 1 nth Regiment, who had occupied the defiles, refused to advance; men of the 112th Regiment retired to the rear in batches. Units of the 28th Division were met by a strong artillery fire, machine-gun and rifle fire, and remained behind their barbed wire, as they were incapable of advancing. Only a few shock troops and volunteers of the Volga Regiment, with a company of officers, succeeded in capturing the first line, but the fire was so strong that they failed to keep the position, and towards the afternoon units of the 29th Division returned to their original lines after suffering heavy losses, especially in officers. On the sector of the 51st Division the attack began at five minutes past seven. The 202nd Gori Regiment and the 204th Ardagan-Michailovsky Regiment, as well as two companies of the Sukhum Regiment, with a shock company of the Poti Regi- ment, made a dash across two lines of trenches, bayoneted the enemy, and began to storm the third line at half-past seven. The break was so rapid and so unexpected that the enemy failed to establish a barrage. The 201st Poti Regiment, which was follow- ing the advance troops, approached our first line of trenches, but refused to go any further, so that our troops who had broken through were not reinforced in time. The units of the 134th Division, which followed, could not carry out their orders because the men of the Poti Regiment had crowded in the trenches, while the enemy had opened a very strong gun fire. These units, therefore, partly dispersed and partly lay in our trenches. Seeing that no reinforcements were forthcoming from the rear and from the flanks, the men of the Gori and Ardagan Regiments lost heart, and some of the companies, in which all the officers had been killed, began to retire. They were followed by the remainder of the troops without, however, any pressure from the Germans, who did not put their batteries and machine-guns into action until the retreat had begun.


Bolshevik committees vote against rescuing their comrades

	...Everything was ready for the advance : the plan had been worked out in detail; we had a powerful and efficient artillery; the weather was favourable because it did not allow the Germans to take advantage of their superiority in aircraft; we had superior numbers, our Reserves were drawn up in time, we had plenty of ammunition, and the sector was well chosen for the advance, because we were in a position to conceal strong artillery forces in the close neighbourhood of our trenches. The undulations of ground also afforded many hidden approaches to the Front; the distance between ourselves and the enemy was small, and there were no natural obstacles between us which would have had to have been forced under fire. Finally, the troops had been prepared by the Committees, the Commanding Officers and the War Minister, Kerensky, and their efforts induced the troops to take the first, the most arduous steps. We attained considerable success without suffering appreciable losses. Three fortified lines had been broken through and occupied, and there remained only separate defensive positions. The fighting might soon have reached the phase of bayonet fighting; the enemy artillery was silenced, over 1,400 Germans, many machine-guns and other booty had been captured. Also, our guns had inflicted heavy casualties in killed and wounded upon the enemy, and it may be confidently stated that the forces that were opposing our Corps had been temporarily knocked out. Along the entire front of our Corps only three or four enemy batteries and occasionally three or four machine-guns were firing, and there were isolated rifle shots. But — night came. Immediately I began to receive anxious reports from officers commanding sectors at the Front to the effect that the men were abandoning the unattacked Front Line en tnasse, entire companies deserting. It was stated in some of the reports that the firing line in places was only occupied by the Commanding Officer, his staff, and a few men. The operations ended in an irretrievable and hopeless failure. In one day we had lived through the joy of victory, which had been won in spite of the low spirits of the men, as well as the horror of seeing the fruits of victory deliberately cast away by the soldiery. And yet the country needed that victory for its very life. I realised that we, the Commanding Officers, are powerless to alter the elemental psychology of the men, and I wept long and bitterly.


soldiers abandon a victory as the Germans advance


	...I have never yet gone into battle with such superiority in numbers and technical means. Never had the conditions been more full of such brilliant promise. On a front of about 14 miles I had 184 battalions against 29 enemy battalions; 900 guns against 300 German: 138 of my batta- lions came into action against 17 German battalions of the 1st line. All that was wasted. Reports from various Commanders indicate that the temper of the troops immediately after the opera- tion was just as indefinite as before. Three days ago I summoned the Army Commanders and addressed to them the question : ' Could their Armies resist a strong enemy attack, provided reserves were forthcoming ? ' The answer was in the negative. ' Could the Armies resist an organised German offensive in their present condition, numerical and technical ? ' Two of the Army Commanders gave indefinite replies, and the Commanding Officer of the 10th Army answered in the affirmative. They all said : ' We have no infantry.' I will go further, and I will say: " We have no Army. It is necessary immediately , and at all costs to create that Army. The new Government regulations, which are supposed to raise the spirit of the Army, have not yet penetrated into its depths, and the impression they have produced cannot yet be defined. One thing is certain — that repression alone cannot drag the Army out of the morass into which it has fallen. It is repeated every day that the Bolsheviks have caused the dis- ruption of the Army, but I disagree. It is not so. The Army has been disrupted by others, and the Bolsheviks are like worms which have bred in the wounds of the Army. The Army has been disrupted by the regulations of the last four months, and it is the bitter irony of fate that this has been done by men who, however honest and idealistic, are unaware of the historical laws govern- ing the existence of the Army, of its life and routine. At first this was done under pressure from the Soviet, which was primarily an Anarchist institution. Later it developed into a fatal, mistaken policy. Soon after the War Minister had taken up his duties he said to me : ' The process of revolutionising the country and the Army has been completed. Now we must proceed with creative work. . . .' I ventured to reply: ' The process is completed, but it is too late.'


"revolutionising the army"


	...The Declaration of the Soldiers' Rights has been issued. Every one of the Commanding Officers has stated that it would bring about the ruin of the Army. The late Supreme C.-in-C, General Alexeiev, telegraphed that the Declaration was the last nail which was being driven into the coffin prepared for the Russian Army. The present Supreme C.-in-C, when in command of the South- Western Front, declared here, at Moghi- lev, at the Conference of Commanders-in-Chief, that the Army may yet be saved and may advance, but on one condition — if the Declaration is not issued. Our advice, however, was unheeded.

	...Paragraph 6 stipulates that all literature should be delivered to the addressees, and the Army was flooded with criminal Bolshevik and Defeatist litera- ture. The stuff upon which our Army was fed — and apparently at the expense of Government funds and of the people's treasure — can be gauged from the report of the Moscow Military Bureau, which alone supplied to the Front the following publications: 

		From March 24th to May 1st —
			7,972 copies of the Pravda
			2,000  "    "   Soldiers' Pravda
			30,375 "    "   Social Democrat

		From May 1st to June 11th —
			61,522 copies of the Soldiers' Pravda
			32,711   "    "  Social Democrat
			6,999 11 "    "  Pravda

	and so on. The same kind of literature was sent to the villages by the soldiers.


funding, distributing propaganda to soldiers, who distribute to populace.


	" And here is another story. I well remember January, 1915, near Lutovisko. There was a heavy frost. Colonel Noskov, the gallant one-armed hero, up to the waist in snow, was leading his regiment to the attack under a heavy fire against the steep and impregnable slopes of Height 804. . . . Death spared him then. And now two companies came, asked for General Noskov, surrounded him, killed him and went away. I ask the War Minister, did he condemn these foul murderers with the whole might of his fiery eloquence, of his wrath and of his power, and did he send a telegram of sympathy to the hapless family of the fallen hero ?

	' When we were deprived of power and authority, when the term Commanding Officer ' was sterilised, we have once again been insulted by a telegram from the Stavka to the effect that : ' Com- manding Officers who will now hesitate to apply armed force will be dismissed and tried.' No, gentlemen, you will not intimidate those who are ready to lose their lives in the service of their country.


troops murdering officers and getting away with it


	It is easy to destroy the Army, but time is needed for its reconstruction. The measures I suggest would at least lay the foundations for the creation of a strong Army. In spite of the disruption of the Army, we must continue the struggle, however arduous it may be, and we must even be prepared to retreat into the depths of the country. Our Allies should not count upon immediate relief through our advance. Even in retreating and remaining on the defensive, we are drawing upon us enormous enemy forces, which, were they relieved, would be sent to the Western Front and would crush the Allies and then turn against us. Upon this new Calvary the Russian people and the Russian Army may yet shed rivers of blood and endure privations and misfortunes. But at the end of the Calvary a bright future is in store.

	" There is another way. The way of treason. It would give a respite to our martyred country. . . . But the curse of treachery cannot give us happiness. At the end of that path there is political, moral and economic slavery. The destinies of the country are in the hands of the Army. I now appeal to the Provisional Government represented here by two Ministers :

	" You must lead Russia towards truth and enlightenment under the banner of Liberty, but you must give us a real chance of leading the troops in the name of that same Liberty under our old banners. You need have no fear. The name of the autocrat has been removed from these banners as well as from our hearts. It is no longer there. But there is a Mother Country; there is a sea of blood; and there is the glory of our former victories. You have trampled that banner into the dust. The time has now come. Raise the banners and bow to them if your conscience is still within you."


Believed army could not fight, country in danger of slavery, wanted to retreat and re-build army, make a stand.


Shows how disastrous Kerensky's decision to advance was. The army wasn't in a condition to advance--neither people nor army wanted war, and the army was demoralized and chain of command broken. The advance would have pulled taught all these forces tugging on them.


	...Kerensky made the closing speech of the Conference. He tried to justify himself — spoke of the elemental character of the inevitable " Democratisation " of the Army. He blamed us for seeing in the Revolution, and in its influence upon the Russian soldier, the only cause of the debacle of July, and he severely condemned the old regime. Finally, he gave us no definite directions for future work. The members of the Conference dispersed with a heavy feeling of mutual misunderstanding. I was also discouraged, but at the bottom of my heart I was pleased to think — alas ! I was mistaken — that our voices had been heeded.


Kerensky blows it all off.


	My hopes were confirmed by a letter from Kornilov which I received soon after his appointment to the Supreme Command :

	" I have read the Report you made at the Stavka on July 16th with deep and sincere satisfaction. I would sign such a Report with both hands ; I take off my hat to you, and I am lost in admiration before your firmness and courage. I firmly believe that, with the help of the Almighty, we will succeed in accomplishing the task of reconstructing our beloved Army and of restoring its fighting power."


If Kornilov a spy, this could be one way he could be used: Bolsheviks would expect officers would be pissed after propaganda targeting them, and Kornilov could peel them off and into a group that could be discredited.


	...Under what conditions Kornilov made his rounds we have already shown in Chapter XXIII. I hardly think that he managed to arouse the mass of soldiers to consciousness. The Kalush of June 28th and the Kalush of July 8th show the 8th Army equally as heroes and as beasts. The officers and a small part of the real soldiers, however, were more than ever under the spell of Kornilov's personality.


kindof sounds like a spy...


	...As a chronicler, however, I must add that the military leaders had no other means of stopping this disintegration of the Army, proceeding from above. And had the Government actually possessed the power, and in full panoply of right and might had been able to assert itself, there would have been no ultimatums either from the Soviet or from the military leaders. Furthermore, there would have been no need for the events of the 27th of August, and those of the 25th of October would have been impossible.


did they want a military coup?




	...A characteristic episode had already taken place on the 8th of July, at Kamenets-Podolsk. Here, in Kornilov's entourage, there occurred the first conflict between Savinkov and Zavoiko, the former being the most prominent Russian Revolutionary, leader of the Terrorist fighting group of the Social-Revolutionary Party, organiser of the most notorious political assassinations — those of Plehve, Minister of the Interior, of the Grand Duke Serge, etc. Strong-willed and cruel by nature, completely lack- ing in the controlling influences of " conventional morality," despising both the Provisional Government and Kerensky, sup- porting the Provisional Government from motives of expediency, as he understood it, ready at any moment to sweep them aside — he saw in Kornilov merely a weapon in the fight for Revolutionary power, in which he must have a dominant interest. Zavoiko was one of those peculiar personages who afterwards clustered closely round Kornilov and played such a prominent part in the August days.


Kornilov surrounded by sketchy people.


Talks about morality often I guess in his book. Seems like he gets that Bolsheviks were basically against ethics


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1920/oct/02.html
	But is there such a thing as communist ethics? Is there such a thing as communist morality? Of course, there is. It is often suggested that we have no ethics of our own; very often the bourgeoisie accuse us Communists of rejecting all morality. This is a method of confusing the issue, of throwing dust in the eyes of the workers and peasants.

	In what sense do we reject ethics, reject morality?

	In the sense given to it by the bourgeoisie, who based ethics on God's commandments. On this point we, of course, say that we do not believe in God, and that we know perfectly well that the clergy, the landowners and the bourgeoisie invoked the name of God so as to further their own interests as exploiters. Or, instead of basing ethics on the commandments of morality, on the commandments of God, they based it on idealist or semi-idealist phrases, which always amounted to something very similar to God's commandments.

	We reject any morality based on extra-human and extra-class concepts. We say that this is deception, dupery, stultification of the workers and peasants in the interests of the landowners and capitalists.

	We say that our morality is entirely subordinated to the interests of the proletariat's class struggle. Our morality stems from the interests of the class struggle of the proletariat.

	The old society was based on the oppression of all the workers and peasants by the landowners and capitalists. We had to destroy all that, and overthrow them but to do that we had to create unity. That is something that God cannot create.

	This unity could be provided only by the factories, only by a proletariat trained and roused from its long slumber. Only when that class was formed did a mass movement arise which has led to what we have now -- the victory of the proletarian revolution in one of the weakest of countries, which for three years has been repelling the onslaught of the bourgeoisie of the whole world. We can see how the proletarian revolution is developing all over the world. On the basis of experience, we now say that only the proletariat could have created the solid force which the disunited and scattered peasantry are following and which has withstood all onslaughts by the exploiters. Only this class can help the working masses unite, rally their ranks and conclusively defend, conclusively consolidate and conclusively build up a communist society.

	That is why we say that to us there is no such thing as a morality that stands outside human society; that is a fraud. To us morality is subordinated to the interests of the proletariat's class struggle. 

	...The class struggle is continuing; it has merely changed its forms. It is the class struggle of the proletariat to prevent the return of the old exploiters, to unite in a single union the scattered masses of unenlightened peasants. The class struggle is continuing and it is our task to subordinate all interests to that struggle. Our communist morality is also subordinated to that task. We say: morality is what serves to destroy the old exploiting society and to unite all the working people around the proletariat, which is building up a new, communist society. 


Lenin against ethics? ideology seems designed for psychopaths.

Lenin's "all that matters is class interests" take on ethics reminds me of Kissinger's views on foreign policy.


...

	CHAPTER XXXI.
	My Service as Commander-in-Chief of the South-Western
	Front — The Moscow Conference — The Fall of Riga.


-------


https://books.google.com/books?id=pupQzihbfPMC&pg=PA435&lpg=PA435&dq=Ludendorff+Bolsheviks&source=bl&ots=bCfcX3Hhbx&sig=fwkKVMFLwcjCfEipwb7YMS91cWY&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwiQ1onahNTWAhWDVyYKHZVtC7A4ChDoAQg8MAQ#v=onepage&q=Ludendorff%20Bolsheviks&f=false


Trotsky admits war and Kerensky push led to collapse of provisional government


------

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Alexander_Parvus
	However, German counter-intelligence had penetrated part of the socialist revolutionary network and upon reading his writing in the socialist press during the Russo-Japanese War, found Parvus had predicted that Russia would lose the war, resulting in unrest and revolution. When this proved to be the case, Parvus' prestige among his socialist and other German comrades increased. Thus, German intelligence soon estimated he would be useful in efforts against the Russian Empire.

	During this time he developed the concept of using a foreign war to provoke an internal revolt within a country.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/1905_Russian_Revolution
	With the unsuccessful and bloody Russo-Japanese War (1904–1905) there was unrest in army reserve units.

	...Tsar Nicholas II agreed on 18 February [O.S. 5 February] to the creation of a State Duma of the Russian Empire but with consultative powers only. When its slight powers and limits on the electorate were revealed, unrest redoubled. The Saint Petersburg Soviet was formed and called for a general strike in October, refusal to pay taxes, and the withdrawal of bank deposits.


Russo-Japanese war contribute to 1905 revolution?


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Alexander_Parvus
	Soon afterwards Parvus moved to Istanbul in Turkey, where he lived for five years.[16] There he set up an arms trading company which profited handsomely during the Balkan War. He became the financial and political advisor of the Young Turks.


wtf is he doing starting an arms dealing company

seems out of character for a marxist


	...Arms dealings with Vickers Limited at war time gave basis to the theory that Alexander Parvus was also a British intelligence asset.


Did this perception help him in any way? Could be that he wanted to be seen as a sellout (Taylor basically calls him that) with Marxist cred, so he could deliver his Russia revolution plan to the Germans

	
	...While in Turkey, Parvus became close with German ambassador Hans Freiherr von Wangenheim who was known to be partial to establishing revolutionary fifth columns among the allies. Consequently, Parvus offered his plan via Baron von Wangenheim to the German General Staff: the paralyzing of Russia via general strike, financed by the German government[18] (which, at the time, was at war with Russia and its allies). Von Wangenheim sent Parvus to Berlin where the latter arrived on the 6 March 1915 and presented a 20-page plan titled A preparation of massive political strikes in Russia to the German government.[19]

	Parvus' detailed plan recommended the division of Russia by sponsoring the Bolshevik faction of the Russian Social Democratic Labor Party, encouraging ethnic separatists in various Russian regions, and supporting various writers whose criticism of Tsarism continued during wartime. Basing himself on his 1905 experiences, Parvus theorised that the division of Russia and its loss in the First World War was the best way to bring about a socialist revolution.


can he be credited with giving the Germans this idea? maybe Hollweg had this idea since 1912


	Some accuse Parvus of having funded Lenin while in Switzerland. Historians, however, are skeptical. A biography of Parvus by the authors Scharlau and Zeman have concluded that there was no cooperation between the two. It declared that "Lenin refused the German offer of aid." Parvus's bank account shows that he only paid out a total of 25,600 francs in the period between his arrival in Switzerland in May 1915 and the February Revolution of 1917. Parvus did little in Switzerland, historians conclude.


hmmm


	Parvus placed his bets on Lenin, as the latter was not only a radical but willing to accept the sponsorship of the Tsar's wartime enemy, Germany. The two met in Bern in May 1915 and agreed to collaboration through their organizations, though Lenin remained very careful never to get associated with Parvus in public. There is no certain proof that they ever met face to face again, although there are indications that such a meeting may well have occurred on April 13, 1917 during Lenin's stop-over in Stockholm.


did Parvus direct Germans to Lenin? Met with him during his trip?


	...Parvus assiduously worked at keeping Lenin's confidence, however Lenin kept him at arms length to disguise the changing roles of both men, Parvus involvement with German intelligence and his own liaisons with his old ally, who was not respected anymore among the socialists after his years in Turkey and after becoming a millionaire entrepreneur.[23] German intelligence set up Parvus' financial network via offshore operations in Copenhagen, setting up relays for German money to get to Russia via fake financial transactions between front organizations. A large part of the transactions of these companies were genuine, but those served to bury the transfer of money to the Bolsheviks, a strategy made feasible by the weak and overburdened fiscal and customs offices in Scandinavia, which were inadequate for the booming black market in these countries during the war.


saying Parvus and German intel helped set up some kind of money laundering network to fund the Bolsheviks.


	Parvus' reputation with the German ministry of foreign affairs came into question when in the winter of 1916 a Parvus planned financial catastrophe in St. Petersburg (akin to Parvus' provocation against the Russian banks in 1905) failed to produce a massive uprising. As a result, financing for Parvus' operations were frozen. Parvus went for support to the German Navy, briefly working as their advisor. He managed to help prevent Russian naval Admiral Aleksandr Kolchak from taking on his offensive against the Turko-German Fleet in the Bosphorus and Dardanelles by planning the sabotage of a major Russian warship. This success gave him more credibility, once again, in the eyes of the Germans.


Germans distrust Parvus but he gains cred with them but some kind of operation in Russia

	
	...Surprisingly, Parvus has left no documents after his death and all of his savings disappeared. Both of his surviving sons became Soviet diplomats.


huh


so what was Parvus' role? seems like he was supposed to be Germany's contact with the Bolsheviks, like a way in for them. Presumably any "intel network" he'd claim to have contacts with would just be the Okhrana. Could do the familiar tactic of provide accurate intel at first to gain credibility before feeding them lies.

https://books.google.com/books?id=XtE54LuhFzEC&pg=PA381&lpg=PA381&dq=Parvus+%22Bethmann+Hollweg%22&source=bl&ots=Gwlna7f8d-&sig=iBpWhwn9Bah1FddjxP7u7eyE7B8&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwig_papydfWAhUHTSYKHaY3AV0Q6AEIOzAF#v=onepage&q=Parvus%20%22Bethmann%20Hollweg%22&f=false

Pipes says Keskula also an important link between German intel and Lenin


https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=de&u=http://www.spiegel.de/spiegel/spiegelspecialgeschichte/d-54841257.html&prev=search
	The unholy German-Russian alliance of common opponents was held together, according to the ancient motto of the Realpolitik, that the enemy of my enemy is my friend. A comfortable logic, which is usually to conceal its own shortcomings, so also in the First World War. If the Germans had revised their maddening war aims in the East, Lenin's services would not have been necessary. 


an interesting observation that it would be impossible to justify supporting people like the Bolsheviks without the backdrop of desperation and war. Another way the war helped put the Bolsheviks in power.

The same pattern of putting people into conflict to get them to do things they wouldn't otherwise do.


	... For four years Berlin supported the Bolsheviks and other revolutionaries in Russia with [money], ammunition, and weapons, thereby contributing to the end of the tsar monarchy. The German Foreign Office alone spent at least 26 million marks, according to today's value of around 75 million euros, by the end of 1917. 


sent them money, guns, ammo


	...Wilhelm even dreamed of a "kind of alliance or friendships" - together against the West, like Hitler and Stalin 20 years later.


Willhelm thinking of alliance with Soviets?


	... The SPIEGEL has done this and has discovered, on searches in more than a dozen archives all over Europe, unpublished or unexamined material: analyzes and papers of the security authorities of Sweden, Switzerland and Great Britain, documents of the Prussian police, notes in the archive of the Federal Foreign Office and in Russian archives. 


So Speigel looking at a lot of different sources to piece together support for Bolsheviks


	It soon became clear that the course of events would be different from all previous ones. The generals attacked the whole force of industrial dynamics to kill human beings. Thus the classic separation between front and home fell. No wonder the strategists were trying not only to defeat the enemy in the trenches but also to weaken them from within. The application of "every means which is capable of damaging the enemy" is a duty, wrote the head of the German General Staff Helmuth von Moltke.

	The Treasury Office, then called the Treasury of Treasury, and thus provided hundreds of millions of marks to stir up Moroccans, Indians, and other peoples of the colonial empire against Paris and London, which in turn caused restlessness in the Habsburgs and the Ottoman Empire.

	The backward czar empire also offered a starting point for a "disintegration of the host country from within" (Reichskanzler Theobald von Bethmann Hollweg). Time and again before the war famine had driven the peasants to revolts. In the Russian cities people lived under miserable conditions; the introduction of the 79-hour week was regarded as progress. As early as 1905 there had been a revolution, which the Tsar had had a bloody suppression. 


WW1 belligerents thinking of subverting each other.


	...Thus a money-boom went down to the numerous political adventurers who reported themselves to the German authorities after the outbreak of war. Supposed and actual tsarist adversaries boasted that they could incite mutiny on the Russian Black Sea Fleet, provoke uprisings in the Ukraine, or stir up social unrest.

	It was a lucrative business also for possible braggers. For a "general revolution against Russia", the Foreign Office paid in September 1914 to two men of "great influence" 50,000 marks in gold. Another 2 million in cash should follow at the insurrection - until today no one knows who received the funds. Later the premiums even rose; German diplomats and secret service agents offered millions for a rebellion in a single government of the Tsar empire alone. 


German intel get suckered out of money?

	
	For it had become narrow for Wilhelm II and his men: The generals of His Majesty had gone out of a lightning-storm in the west, which was to spare them the double war. When the triumph against France ceased, the Emperor and his ministers tried to make the tsars irresponsible; a fall of the monarchy was not, however, initially on the agenda.

	Thus, it was rather by chance that the German revolutionary forces were attracted to the professional revolutionary (and lawyer) Lenin in the autumn of 1914. The small-grown man with the reddish Haarkranz had lived in the western exile since the turn of the century; at the beginning of the war he moved from Austria to neutral Switzerland to Bern. 


So did failure of Shclieffen plan (e.g. Moltke fucking it up) drive them to choosing to support Lenin and Bosheviks?

in some ways seems like a set-up: Hollweg, others preaching doom and gloom about Russia, decide their only hope is to crush france in 6 weeks before Russian bear awakens, plan is a gamble to begin with, then it doesn't work. So presumably putting their faith into Shclieffen plan combined with their fear of a growing Russian military would set them up for panic, desperation when the plan fails. Then I guess Parvus and Lenin come in with a solution...


	The reference to Lenin came from Alexander Kesküla, a former Bolshevik from Estonia and one of the many figures in the Grauzone between revolutionary Russians and the Germans. Kesküla offered himself to the German embassy in Berne as a propagandist for the Emperor's cause. He hoped that the Germans would use a connection of the Russian-dominated Estonia to Sweden.

	Kesküla however wavered in his judgment on Lenin, as now searches of the SPIEGEL result. Sometimes he complained that Lenin was doing too little for the revolution in the czarist empire. Then he drummed again, "immediately to join the Leninist movement in Russia," and swarmed the German diplomats that the Bolshevik enjoyed "the greatest respect" among the revolutionaries in Petrograd and Moscow. He is "unscrupulous" and has "the most brutal and ruthless energy".

	Later, when Kesküla had understood that the Germans were pursuing their own interests in the Baltics, he moved to the Entente side and warned them against Lenin - with the same arguments as emerged from previously unknown British acts.

	Kesküla received a total of 250,000 marks for his services, only a small part of which was found by the Bolsheviks.

	The fact that Berlin did not use Kesküla in a large scale to support Lenin had a simple reason, as German documents show. Despite his Bolshevik past, Kesküla was a theoretical head. For the logistics of the revolution, however, the Germans needed experts of other caliber. And in January 1915, Alexander Helphand, one of the most important political adventurers of the twentieth century.


says Keskula first reccomended Lenin to Germans, but they didn't think he was of much use to them. Keskula goes on to warn allies that Lenin is dangerous.

	The man with the powerful head and the "stature of a Michelangelo slave with somewhat too short legs" (biographer Winfried Scharlau) lived at the beginning of the war as a prosperous businessman in Constantinople, apparently rich by the help he gave to the ailing Ottoman Empire during the preparations for war had done. The Sultan had entered the war with the Central Powers in November 1914.

	Helphand's past spoke of the revolutionary qualities of the salonist. Even as a youth, the Jew, who was born in Minsk in 1867, had committed the overthrow of the Czar because his regime suppressed people of Mosaic faith. Helphand found himself in Marxism in Switzerland, where he studied like many other oppositional Russians of his generation. In 1891 he moved to Germany and joined the SPD, who was at that time admired by socialists for their political successes - Lingua franca among revolutionaries of many countries was German.

	Helphand quickly attracted attention with radical and verbose articles, which gave him the reputation of becoming a second Marx. In ironic allusion to his considerable physical fulfillment, he was called Parvus ("the Little One"). 


Parvus (helphand) has marxist street cred (although lost later in some circles by becoming arms dealer, german spy), gained reputation of being a "second Marx." (wikipedia says he made "contributions to Marxist theory"). Lived in Switzlernad than in Germany for awhile while being Marxist.


	...In Munich, at the beginning of the century, he first met Lenin, three years younger; he met Helga's apartment, Rosa Luxemburg, a friend of Helphand. Lenin also published the printer press for the party service in the apartment.

	However, his vision of a tightly organized cadre party of professional revolutionaries, who alone should have the ideological authority to interpret, remained helpless in his time. He preferred to associate with Leo Bronstein, Trotsky Trotsky, the brilliant organizer and later father of the Bolsheviks' victory in the Russian Civil War. Trotsky learned from Helphand that the conquest of the proletariat was not an "astronomical goal," but "a practical task of our time."

	When the revolution broke out in Russia in 1905, both of them hurried to the old homeland; Trotsky sat at the head of the Petersburg soviet, Helphand took over a part of the press. He wanted to "break the revolutionary proletariat in Russia to strengthen the revolutionary energy of the proletariat in the West." At that time, however, there were only about two million industrial workers in Russia as a whole. 


Parvus met Lenin in Munich, also Luxemburg and Trotsky. Involved in 1905 Russian revolution.

Him and Trotsky got captured and sent to Siberia.


	...In the SPD Helphand never had many friends. The German comrades were disturbed by his radical views, his weakness for women and his recklessness towards his own children, to whom he denied the alimony. 


"weakness for women" and his children are whom he denied the alimony


	When he also had to face a party, because the writer Maxim Gorky accused him of having made a profit, Helphand left the empire and went to Constantinople. There he would probably "study the polygamy at the best source," mocked the comrades.


fell out with Marxists for liking money, went to Constantinople to sell guns and study polygamy


	Helphand's hatred for the Czar empire must have become overpowering during the years on the Bosporus, for although he was still Persona non grata in Germany, he stood on the side of the Central Powers at the beginning of the war in 1914. To the German ambassador in Constantinople, Helphand proposed an end-alliance: "The interests of the German government are identical with those of the Russian revolutionaries." The diplomat gave Helphand an entry at the Foreign Office in Berlin.


so does he still claim to be pro-Russian revolution when working for Germans? would make sense I guess to claim he's for the cause while showing a weakness for money. Some in German intel might think they can exploit him.


	He had thought of just about anything: the agitation among the workers in the industrialized countries, the connections to potential strike committees, the revulsion of national minorities. He wanted to break up important bridges and set fire to the oil sources at Baku, free political prisoners in Siberia, fly flyers and brochures abroad, and organize their transport to Russia. Helphand even demanded "understandable instruction (s) on the handling" of explosives.

	The paper ended with a list of the most important tasks; in the first place: "Financial support for the Social Democratic majority of the Russian majority (the Bolsheviks -Red.) ... The leaders are to be visited in Switzerland."

	Only a few weeks later, Helphand received the explosive he had requested, a German police passport, which made it easier for him to travel, and ample money: a million marks.


So Parvus basically approaches them with a large request for assistance while saying Germany and Russian revolution have mutual interests.


	No one in the government center seems to have come to the idea that a tsar's overthrow could also have repercussions on the German monarchy whose democratization was overdue.


Funny that Holweg talked about exactly that.


	If one had emerged victorious from the world war, the Minister in Copenhagen, Count Ulrich von Brockdorff-Rantzau, with a view to the workforce, could also be called "elements of co-operation and the throne" which had so far stood apart. Lenin as a reform substitute.

	Brockdorff-Rantzau, from the old nobility and never without a seal-ring, even later brought him to the Foreign Minister in the Weimar Republic. 


Brockdorff-Rantzau involved somehow, not really sure what this is saying.


	...At the end of May 1915, Helphand arrived in Berne to speak with Lenin, as announced. He appeared in one of the Russian restaurants of the city, where the Bolsheviks also frequented, and took his place at his table. Together they went to Lenin's apartment. Both then reported on the four-eye talk that they could not have agreed.

	Helphand asserted that he had urged Lenin to advance the revolution in Russia, but "dreamed of the publication of a Communist magazine, with which he immediately believed the European proletariat could be driven out of the trenches and into the revolution."

	Lenin, on the other hand, wants to insult the visitor as a German social chauvinist, and have "turned his tail between his legs".

	But is that true?

	The Bolshevik had reason to deny a connection with Helphand. This was considered among comrades as a speculator and deceiver; Rosa Luxemburg had already denounced him the friendship, Trotsky too. Rumors turned around, he was a German agent - and no Russian politician could afford to take this suspicion. 


different accounts of Parvus' meeting with Lenin in Berne. Parvus says he offered cooperation, Lenin says he rejected it. Author points out that Lenin had reasons to be dishonest.


	...Some indications speak for Lenin's version. After the meeting he lived in modest circumstances; Money shortage was a constant theme of his letters. And Helphand, on the other hand, explained to his German clients that Lenin's support was only possible when "the existing tension had balanced itself" between them.


Parvus also tells his handlers there was tension between Lenin and Parvus


	...On the other hand, these documents show that there were Bolsheviks who took money from Helphand, but only a few thousand Swiss francs. Also, in retrospect, Walter Nicolai, the German secret service chief, wrote that Lenin had "provided my news service with valuable information about the conditions in ... Tsarist Russia."


Walter Nicolai (later head of Aufbau intel iirc) says Lenin provided valuable intel on Tsarist Russia.


	...Above all, the network that Helphand raised after the conversation with Lenin speaks against the theory of Bolshevik innocence. For at the junctions there are always leading revolutionaries of the Lenin party. Moissej Urizki, later head of the Petrograd secret police (Cheka), worked for Helphand; also Jakob Fürstenberg, one of the closest confidants of Lenin, and after the October Revolution head of the Soviet National Bank, or the discreet attorney Mieczyslaw Koslowski, who co-founded the Cheka. They knew each other and Parvus from the exile, and were often related to each other, which increased the willingness to loyalty and secrecy.


people later to become top-dogs in Cheka were a part of Parvus' intel network.


Parvus ran trading company, smuggling ops, and other shady things


	...It is hard to believe that Lenin did not use this network to bring money to Petrograd, or even to channel some of the revenues generated in Russia into the party class. Significantly, the company address of the Helphan company was later found in Lenin's narrow address book. And managing director Fürstenberg, which is clear from Swedish investigations, traveled regularly to Russia.

	It is certain that the Bolsheviks needed money for revolutionary work. Like an ugly scar, the eastern front from the Baltic then stretched across Europe to the Mediterranean. The revolutionaries from Stockholm had to travel northwards to Haparanda, a small village on the Swedish-Russian border, close to the Polarkreis. 


Parvus raising money for the revolution


	...The tsarist secret police also showed astonishingly well-informed information as it emerged from documents discovered by the publicist Elisabeth Heresch in Moscow, and published under the title "Secrets of Parvus, The Revolution Purchased." It is therefore disputed among historians to what extent German payments to the Bolsheviks destabilized the tsarist empire.


Okhrana knew about a lot of it


	...The most important German contribution to the end of Nikolai II, however, was not provided by agents, but by the military. In the autumn of 1916, the German army lay deep in the territory of the Tsar empire. Hundreds of thousands of Russian soldiers had fallen. And under the ongoing pressure of the war, the Russian economy collapsed.

	At the end of 1916, companies had to stop production because there was a lack of raw materials. In the country there was a lack of peasants and horses. In Petrograd and Moscow the flour stocks were running out.

	First, the workers demonstrated; On March 8, 1917 - the International Women's Day - thousands of women were queuing up in Petrograd. According to the historian Heiko Haumann, this was the "breakthrough to revolution". Like a steppe fire, the protest spread to the whole empire. The tsar, who was completely exhumed, had to give up the throne. 


credits war with Germany to collapse of Tsar


	...The new rulers established the most liberal regime in the history of Russia: coalition, assembly, press freedom. The Reich was "on the way to a democratic form of government," says historian Manfred Hildermeier. The war, however, was not intended to end as long as the price for the German hegemony was in Eastern Europe.


then Kerensky decides to continue war and push, even when it's clear his army is in no shape to do so and the Germans are eager to stop the war in the east by any means


	...A return to France or England was excluded; the Entente powers had no interest in letting Lenin go to Russia, which demanded the immediate withdrawal of his country from the war. Apart from this, Lenin and comrades were afraid that they would be accidentally torpedoed by German submarines on a trip across the Baltic and the North Sea.

	Once, Lenin considered spending his time as a taubstummer Swede and traveling incognito through Germany, sometimes by plane secretly flying over the eastern front. In the end, he agreed with the proposal of other left-wing emigrants from Russia and Poland, who pleaded for the railroad to travel through Germany and Scandinavia. A risky undertaking, for this step could only be done with the consent of the imperial authorities, and Lenin and the others were afraid to compromise. 


a good point--why did he decide to go by train, which required cutting a deal with the German monarchs, when he could have traveled there incognito?


	...Already from well-intentioned self-interest: The entrance of the United States was imminent; peace on the eastern front was immediately needed. This was a peace which was not yet secured by the military, because it gave the Germans almost the whole of Eastern Europe. For such a peace - without annexations - the German leadership would have had to give up the dream of world power, and it was not ready for it. Instead, Berlin continued to choose the easy way: the alliance with the enemy of the enemy.


another failure of diplomacy that both Kerensky and Ludendorff didn't see the February revolution as an opportunity to end hostilities (or end the war entirely).


	...Still the same night, Lenin announced a new course: the defense of the fatherland was "petty bourgeois" and a "deception of the bourgeoisie in the masses." No to the war, no to the provisional government, continuation of the revolution. If the dictatorship of the proletariat was established in Russia, Lenin believed that world revolution would follow. A month later, he had brought his party on course.


Lenin does his anti-war anti-Kerensky combo schtick


	...For Helphand, the change of direction must have been a later triumph, for Lenin assumed a position which Helphand had once brought near to Trotsky with the demand that power be immediately "put into the hands of the proletariat."

	From a German perspective, the transfer of Lenin proved to be the most important revolutionary measure. It alone justifies the thesis that the Bolsheviks would not have come to power without German help in the autumn of 1917. 


how much of a big player was Parvus? not as famous as Lenin, but how powerful was he by comparison? being in control of key funding for the revolution would put him up there


	 The party leader understood faster than all rivals that the dissolution of Russian society could not be stopped by pushing the big questions: the land reform, the regulation of nationality problems, the peace question.

	Signs of anarchy were already obvious. In the despatches of the Foreign Office, reports of slaughtered landlords and gruesome cases of Lynchjustiz were collected. At the beginning of July, German diplomats in Stockholm recorded what they had learned about the situation in Petrograd: "The shops are in a very bad shape, and the city faces bankruptcy greater."

	The broth was 200 grams per day; At the same time, industrial production collapsed, and prices exploded. At the front the soldiers, mostly peasants, increasingly took their fate into their own hands. Weakened by the hunger and trench war, hundreds of thousands, often lured by the news that the country is divided in the homeland.

	The Berlin government welcomed the fact that Lenin's demands for peace and land distribution were very popular. "Lenin's propaganda is of the kind most effective in the masses," a situation report from July 5, 1917. A few days later, the envoys in Stockholm, according to reports from Russia, were "no longer in time far away, where the Lenin group comes to the helm, and with it the peace. "


Bolshevik activities undermining economy, army, Berlin welcomes the change


	Shortly before Lenin's return the Reichsschatzamt had granted the Foreign Office another five million marks. The Secretary of State of the Foreign Office, Richard von Kühlmann, bragged against Hindenburg and the Emperor that the Bolshevik movement could never have "assumed the extent and the influence it possesses today, without the continual, broad support" of the Foreign Office.


German SoS brags that Foreign Office made Bolsheviks possible


	...Among historians there is broad agreement that it was easier for the Bolsheviks to overthrow the rotten Provisional Government than to assert the power and to enforce it throughout Russia. The state administration collapsed after the October Revolution, but there was a shortage of all necessities: grain, coal, clothing. In northern Russia, also in Siberia and in the southern parts of the former czar empire, opponents of the new regime were gathering. Soon the once great power of Anarchy and the Civil War sank.

	The imperial empire under William II, on the one hand, contributed to the chaos, for German troops occupied considerable parts of the former tzar empire. But at the same time the diplomats of His Majesty invested millions to keep the Bolsheviks in Central Russia in power, because only these were ready to accept a German victory-peace, and because no one in Berlin believed that a real socialism would come to its feet.

	"The Bolsheviks are great fellows, and have made everything very beautiful and well done so far," wrote Diplomat Kurt Riezler, who at that time decisively determined the German policy on Russia.

	It is unlikely to be clear how much money the imperial Germany at the end of 1917 gave the Bolsheviks. There was no doubt that there were considerable amounts. In the archive of the Federal Foreign Office you can find an amazing document. On November 25, 1917, the Foreign Minister's liaison officer telegraphed to Berlin at the headquarters in Bad Kreuznach:

		"The current Petersburg government is struggling with great difficulties, banks denying it any financial support that their government needs urgently to obtain the food for the people and the army ... Is it possible for her to meet the urgently needed money of the difficulties and her slogan in the people and the army, it will be able to hold itself until the armistice is closed, which is what Lenin has recognized, so he turns to us ... Supreme Army leadership considers it highly desirable if the Lenin government succeeds in making money. "

	The Federal Foreign Office backed out: "Further financial support for the Bolsheviks is needed." A few days later, Riezler maintained that the Bolsheviks "now have money". 


what were they thinking they'd buy-off Brest-Litovsk?


	...At the same time, the Germans pursued their interests in a manner which was extremely painful to the Bolsheviks: during the peace negotiations in Brest-Litovsk, they took Lenin's proclamation of the right of self-determination of the peoples at the word and proposed to split off Poland and the Baltic States. In fact, these areas should be added to the German sphere of influence.

	The Russian delegation was beaten and asked for a time-out. Trotsky suggested to his comrades that the war was simply declared to be over, and that they refused to sign an "annexationist peace." And so it happened first.

	From an alliance with Lenin, now becoming more and more radical, the Emperor did not want to hear any more. "Bolsheviks want revolution, want to make great workers' massions," cursed Wilhelm and pleaded for "killing".

	On February 18, 1918, Generalfeldmarschall Paul von Hindenburg began the "Operation Faustschlag". In less than two weeks the German troops advanced in a giant arch, which stretched from the Baltics in the north over Belarus and the Ukraine to the Don. The operation involved about a million soldiers who were badly needed on the West Front. But Hindenburg reached his goal. On March 3, the Bolsheviks signed the Peace Dictate of Brest-Litovsk.

	Russia had to surrender an area almost as large as Argentina; a third of the population, almost the entire coal and oil production and half of the industry were lost. And despite the peace, Hindenburg had his troops marched to the Crimea and the Donets basin to secure resources.

	But, from Lenin's point of view, there was no alternative in stating the reluctant comrade: "You must sign this shame peace in order to save the world revolution in order to preserve her only bridgehead-the Republic of the Soviets."


Germans launch a huge operations ("a million soldiers who were badly needed on the West Front") to force Brest-Litovsk. Called "Operation Faustschlag"


	...German diplomats were now able to get information on the ground. They noted with concern that in May 1918 Lenin's position was sharpened. The head of government still did not have the full power of the later years. There were left opposition parties like the social revolutionaries. Indignant at the peace treaty of Brest-Litovsk and the advance of the German army, they demanded a resumption of the fighting on the side of the Entente, or at least a partisan war against the imperial soldiers.

	According to the German files, bribes from the treasury of the Reich played a decisive role in keeping everything as it was. "The Bolsheviks were prevented from moving into the Entente water," said Secretary of State Kühlmann on June 5, 1918 in Berlin. However, "bigger sums" had to be spent on this. 


Intel network says Soviets pissed about Brest-Litovsk, thinking of joining entente again, so Germans decide to bribe them with "bigger sums"

seems like Bolsheviks cared more about political power, "soft power" than territory.


	...The German ambassador in Moscow, Wilhelm Count von Mirbach, was an aristocrat of old school. He did not escape the fact that the Allies also distributed millions to various dark men, in order to draw Russia back into the war against Germany. He estimated his monthly demand for bribes to be about three million marks: "Never was the purchase of Russia more readily available than now."


started a bribery war between Allies and Central powers?

seems like they got a lot out of the war. Bolsheviks iirc captured the weapons the allies sent for the Whites too.


	...On the 6th of July, two social revolutionaries spoke in the Embassy, ​​asked the nobles to speak in a personal affair, and showed a letter of recommendation. Mirbach went to his study with the visitors and sat down at the wide marble table. After a few sentences about an alleged distant relative of the Ambassador, the men suddenly pulled pistols out of their brief pockets. The diplomat leaped to his feet, but after a few yards a shot hit the back of the head.

	Still on the day of the assassination, Lenin appeared at the scene. His condolences seemed to the Germans "cold as a dog's nose".

	Soviet Russia was now a "besieged fortress": in the north near Murmansk the British and Americans had landed, in the south the Red Army defended against counter-revolutionary Cossacks, Samara on the Volga had established a counter-government and troops marched against Baku the Turks.

	Kaiser Wilhelm now drummed for a change of course: "It is dangerous to unite our lot even further with the dying Bolsheviks!" Even in the Foreign Office the skepticism grew as to whether the Bolsheviks could hold up. During this period, their opponents, such as the Don Cossacks or monarchist circles, received millions from German coffers, as the historian Winfried Baumgart had already demonstrated decades ago in a spectacular study. Berlin wanted to weal potential Lenin successors and keep alternatives open. 


German ambassador in Moscow gets assassinated, Wilhelm decides to fund both sides and keep options open.


	In the end, however, the advocates of a continuation of the tactical alliance with the Bolshevik Russia prevailed. The Germans gave Lenin a pledge not to march on Petrograd, which enabled him to withdraw troops in the most oppressed position and deploy them on his eastern front.


but decided to keep funding Bolsheviks after this


	That the Bolsheviks, apparently standing before the fall, then overcame the country after an assassination attempt on Lenin with terrible terror, did not escape their German allies. On September 13, 1918, for example, a German chief of Eylers from Petrograd reported:

		"The conditions in Petersburg and the rest of Russia mock every description ... People are cruelly slaughtered without any legal proceedings." Drunken Red Guards would use prisoners "as targets for revolving" and not even protect women and children. 


Germans maybe weirded out that Lenin could do all that then act even worse than a Monarch


	The former terrorist of the summer of 1918 also lost the former Czar and his family in their exile Yekaterinburg, 1700 kilometers away from Moscow. Lenin did not want them to be released from his opponents in the event of his fall. As early as July, a commando of the Chekists had therefore shot Nikolai II, the Tsarina, the five children as well as the family doctor and three servants - in the cellar of a dwelling-house.

	To this day, experts are debating whether Wilhelm II could have saved his cousin. That the two for each other had never much left is no secret. Nevertheless, in March 1917 Wilhelm had threatened the Prime Minister of the Provisional Government that he would personally blame him if the tsar's family were to be curled.

	Against the Bolsheviks, Wilhelm was not so determined. The request to grant asylum to the tsar refused Wilhelm with the argument that the Russians could see in it an attempt to reintroduce the monarchy into Russia. He sent only "urgent reminders" to the Bolsheviks not to kill the Tsar. There is nothing known about long-term demands, or even a junta, that is, a link with other political questions.

	Significantly, Wilhelm remarked the news of the murder of his relative alone with a cold look at the political situation, as a report from the Legation Council, Werner Freiherr von Grünau, emerges from the special train of Wilhelmin:

	"His Majesty has remarked that ... we are now in a difficult position to face the rest of Russia, and that Entente should not be blamed for assassination, and that the attempt will be made secure."

	Only for Czarina Alexandra, born Alice of Hesse-Darmstadt, and her sister, German diplomats were emphatically related. They demanded from the Bolsheviks "to meet the ladies" with the greatest possible consideration. " Since the German authorities did not have their own sources of information, they had no choice but to believe in the Bolsheviks' information that everything was in order.

	These still held up the years after the murder, the tsar was dead, but the Nikolai family was alive. Lenin's subcontractors even owned the chutzpah and told the Germans that they could talk about the release of the Czarina and their children if, in return, the Germans permitted "a similar Russian use" for "uncomfortable personalities in Germany." Lenin thus aimed at people like Karl Liebknecht, later co-founder of the Communist Party, who, because of high treason in Luckau in the Lausitz.

	This was in September 1918, the Czarina had been dead for two months, and so slowly did the German strategists realize that they would ultimately be the losers of the purpose-union between Lenin and the Hohenzollernreich. 


death of Tsar and family might have been relevant to German-Bolshevik relations, since they were family of Kaiser. Bolsheviks try to hide it from Germans for awhile. Lenin proposed prisoner swap for Tsar family even though they were dead.


	In the end, Wilhelm's generals did not even dare to move soldiers from the Ukraine or the Baltic to the Western Front because the men were now regarded as unreliable: they sympathized with Lenin's revolution.


that's interesting--ended up not freeing up that many troops for Western front anyway. Seems like a dumb move, maybe sabotage?


	...For Lenin, as cool as the Foreign Office, calculated, and while he was working with the Kaiser in Moscow during the summer, he did not hesitate to support those comrades who wanted a German Soviet Republic.

	The Germans should have been warned - it was the same revolutionization policy they had supported in the years before, when it was against the Czar.

	On November 5, 1918, Wilhelm II broke off relations with Soviet Russia, which was no longer needed. Six days later, a German delegation signed the armistice terms of the Allies, which annulled the peace of Brest-Litovsk. Instead of gaining territory, Germany lost a seventh of its territory in the peace of Versailles. Wilhelm, too, was no longer to be kept, and escaped to exile in Doorn, the Netherlands. Wilhelm lived there until 1941. 


ended up getting screwed over and losing everything


there an English version of this article? Der Speigal "The German and the Revolution" or "Lenin and the Emperors"


------

https://books.google.com/books?id=Y4pLQ1jC1JIC&pg=PA474&lpg=PA474&dq=Bethmann+Hollweg+resignation&source=bl&ots=ikyOrvaw47&sig=zSRs_EpEsS15sH_KRbjyobWNyJ0&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwiNz6mcr9rWAhWB5oMKHe6iDVg4ChDoAQgsMAI#v=onepage&q=Bethmann%20Hollweg%20resignation&f=false
	Count Czernin (1872-1932), the foreign minister, warned the German statesmen that Austria-Hungary would not be able to survive a fourth war winter. Unless peace was concluded within a few months, a revolution of the people would overthrow the monarchies. Even a bad peace wuld at least ave the social order. CCzernin cautioned the Germans that their own conditions were only slightly etter than those of Austria and that the tide was running against them.



------


https://archive.org/stream/LeninCompulsiveRevolutionaryPossony1964_201606/Lenin%20Compulsive%20Revolutionary%20Possony%201964_djvu.txt
	Another feature of this Bolshevik conference merits attention. Maxim 
Litvinov, who had been a weapons smuggler during the 1905 revolution, 
was a participant who represented the Bolsheviks of London. Litvinov 
was living in London with another revolutionary, Nikolai Klyachko, 
who, ironically, worked as a technician at Vickers- Armstrong, Britain’s 
foremost gun manufacturer. The Okhrana repeatedly reported at later 
dates that Litvinov possessed expert knowledge of weapons, obtained a 
great deal of information from Klyatchko, made many bicycle trips to 
British military camps, and reported the data to Lenin who, in turn, 
transmitted the intelligence to the Germans. The Okhrana may or may 
not have informed British authorities ; in any event, no action was taken 
against Litvinov. There exists a document in the German file that 
indicates that Lenin made intelligence available, but it contains no 
suggestion of British data being involved. 11 ^ 1 Interestingly enough, 
Litvinov on March 8, 1906, received at Dresden a German passport in 
the name of “Gustav Graf.” The implication of this Okhrana 
information is that the passport issued was genuine ; a direct tie with 
German intelligence is clearly a possibility. But, for the period of 1915- 
1916, the Okhrana file contains no precise information beyond the 
observations of Litvinov’s behavior. 1221 

weird


	...In the meantime, the Bolshevik conference was being held, through 
February and March. It was attended not only by the Okhrana but also 
by spies of Parvus and Keskula, both of whom transmitted their 
intelligence to the Germans. But on one key problem the reports do not 
entirely agree : the Okhrana related that the Bolsheviks intended to 
unify the extreme left elements of all belligerent countries, and were 
anticipating a German mutiny to be organized by Liebknecht and his 
followers. If Lenin wished to aid Liebknecht, this news was surely 
welcomed by Petrograd. The German legation at Berne received no 
such information. The unrealistic belief that the revolution was to be 
instigated everywhere often appeared in Bolshevik arguments ; it 
represented one of the very reasons why Keskula had been so skeptical 
about Lenin and his policies : for if the revolution in Germany preceded 
Russia’s, the autocracy would emerge victorious. 


Okhrana record said Lenin planning an aiding the German revolution, but the German record said no such thing.


	The Okhrana also reported that the Bolsheviks wanted to unify the 
various revolutionary elements operating in Russia. Parvus had received 
the same information ; he noted that heretofore Lenin had been opposed 
to unification. But Keskula found that Lenin had now adopted the new 
policy of working for the defeat of Russia as the lesser evil under current 
conditions. This policy may not have been “new”; it had been declared 
earlier. But Keskula and Parvus, independently, concluded that Lenin 
had finally decided to persue this policy actively. 


but both were able to find out this


	...As suggested by General Moltke, the military had established prisoner- 
of-war indoctrination programs (which in 1916 led to a protest by 
Petrograd). There is evidence from the Okhrana that this operation was 
gradually following more radical and Bolshevik lines, with Malinovsky 
playing a significant role.^ This operation influenced events far more 
than is generally recognized. A recent Soviet publication has shown the 
extent to which Lenin and Krupskaya were involved.^ 1 Lenin’s efforts 
extended to fourteen camps in Germany and seven camps in Austria. He 
knew the number of prisoners in each camp and was well informed on 
camp conditions. Packages were sent, literature was distributed (mostly 
during 1916), and contacts were maintained, especially through 
Krupskaya, with forty-six prisoners and three libraries and study circles. 
In one instance, Lenin sent money for book purchases. A total of 1 19 
letters were dispatched, including five to Malinovsky at the camp of Alt- 
Grabow. 


this is one thing that's weird. Malinovsky was an Okhrana agent, but the Germans were planning propagandizing the POWs.


	...The Okhrana, already on July 22 and 30, reported that Parvus had rented an office for 1,100 
crowns and had leased a private apartment in a wealthy suburb. “7/ est homme de moyens .” He 
has with him a “ dame de compagnie allemande ,” Marie Schillinger, twenty-two, from Munich, 
and a Danish “ gouvernante ” (probably they meant she was a “bonne”). They stated he started a 
big library and the institute on war, a “ compagnie de commerce et d’ exportation” and a publicity 
outfit, “ colonizes d’affiches de Copenhague ,” with Jacob Furstenberg (Hanecki) as director. 
(Flirstenberg, they said, was born on March 15, 1879, in Warsaw). In addition to all this, Parvus 
was doing literary work. The reports indicated Parvus’ political objectives — overthrow of the 
Tsar and a more liberal constitution — and added it could not be proven he received money from 
the Germans. Otherwise, this was fairly sound reporting. 


Okhrana records said July 22 30 "it could not be proven [Parvus] received money from the Germans."


	...In Zurich, Lenin studied for two hours each morning and two hours each 
afternoon. During February and March, he studied the problems of 
national self-determination — another political line which the Germans 
were strongly advocating and the importance of which, Keskula stated in 
1961, Siefeld was told to impress upon Lenin. Strangely enough, at this 
time almost every one must have been happy with Vladimir. The 
Okhrana, on February 9, 1916, belatedly reported that the German left- 
socialists expected support from Russian revolutionaries. Lenin is said 
to have replied that the situation in Russia depended in large measure 
upon the revolutionary development in Germany : the Russian 
proletariat, he believed, would follow a revolution in Germany. In what 
Parvus described as a sentimental policy, Liebknecht advocated 
immediate peace with Russia — on the grounds that Russia had already 
been defeated. 11 ^ 1 It was fortunate for Lenin that the Germans did not 
read the mail of the Russian Okhrana. 


Was there a tenancy of Okhrana records to report on Lenin's plans for Germany, and German records to ignore them?



	...These notes were later included in one of his best 
known books, State and Revolution , which was published in an 
incomplete form in December of 1917. At that time, the Russian 
legation at Berne received a report that Lenin had visited the German 
legation. Probably the claim was false ; no corroboration of the 
denunciation exists in the Okhrana file. Nevertheless, the Russian 
legation complained about Lenin, apparently describing him as a 
deserter — perhaps an attempt to have him arrested or extradited.


???

author is weird


	...The allies knew that there existed no military reason that would justify 
Russia’s quitting the war : both army morale and war production had 
been improving. There were economic difficulties, but they could be 
managed. The issue was political : the country lacked an efficient 
government able to inspire public confidence.


doesn't sound right


this was around Feb revolution

	...There were good reasons for the Tsar to fear a separate peace which 
might lead to uprisings and also might deliver him to the mercies of his 
cousin, Wilhelm II.


???



https://archive.org/stream/fallofthedynasti012755mbp/fallofthedynasti012755mbp_djvu.txt
	A senior police official 
named Stephen Beletsky, who for a while was one of the key figures in the 
band, put Rasputin on the secret payroll of the Okhrana for a salary of 
3000 rubles a month about $800 and with the Czarina's authorization 
assigned an Okhrana general to supervise the starets* personal bodyguard. 



https://archive.org/stream/LeninCompulsiveRevolutionaryPossony1964_201606/Lenin%20Compulsive%20Revolutionary%20Possony%201964_djvu.txt
	Sazonov, the pro-Entente Foreign 
Minister, was dismissed and a new Minister, Boris V. Sturmer, who was 
generally deemed to be pro-German, was installed. His confidential 
secretary, Ivan L. Manasevich-Manuilov, was soon arrested. He was an 
old hand at the most devious phases of intelligence and political warfare 
and had often been used by the Germans for the press activities inside 
Russia.^ 1 Sturmer placed him in charge of controlling Rasputin’s 
activities. 

	...The Grand Duke, the poet of the Romanov family under the pseudonym “K.R.” was the 
protector of the Russian capital’s foremost “fixer,” Prince Mikhail Andronikov, who also was 
Rasputin’s main financial agent and his contact with pro-German Jewish bankers.

	...Actually, Protopopov 
had attempted to negotiate with the Germans at Stockholm. The 
figurehead of Volya Rossii, a newspaper whose German attachments 
were notorious^ 1 , he was close to the Rasputin clique and the mystics at 
the court. The latter connections and his Stockholm discussions rather 
than his Duma membership are the clues that disclose the more 
important intentions of his appointment. 



Same deal with Rasputin as with Malinovsky?


------


https://books.google.com/books?id=FbcGAQAAIAAJ&pg=PA257&lpg=PA257&dq=Okhrana+%22Beletskii%22+OR+Beletsky+Bolsheviks+OR+%22Lenin%27s+party%22&source=bl&ots=rxdkcl-IQB&sig=2V6wuRJBrTiYPlO0KODOJgW-jso&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwjDuarT-NrWAhVq4oMKHba8CrUQ6AEIODAD#v=onepage&q=Okhrana%20%22Beletskii%22%20OR%20Beletsky%20Bolsheviks%20OR%20%22Lenin%27s%20party%22&f=false

interesting I guess

how did she feel about Beltsky being killed?

Zuckerman book:


https://books.google.com/books?id=6BAWCgAAQBAJ&pg=PA209#v=onepage&q&f=false
    Upon assuming the directorship of Fontanka, Beletskii ordered a massive penetration of Russian society by his field bureaus especially among the peasantry, railway workers, high school students and Russia's military and naval forces 'without delay' ...Like Plehve, he wished no nook nor cranny of possible dissent to escape his attention. However, Beletskii was not satisfied with simply spying on society, he wanted to control it as well. The relationship between public opinion (the Duma and the press) and the workers' movement became the focus of Beletskii's experiment in social control.

	...Fontanka devised a stategy to manipulate the Bolshevik movement into disrupting moderate social democracy. Bolshevism by its very nature offered the perfect vehicle for this strategy. Historians have noted that the decision to adopt this strategy was a grossly ill-considered one. After all what did Beletskii and the Special Section accomplish? As Laura Engelstein and Victoria Bonnell (among others) have pointed out, Fontanka's strategy ensured the demise of moderate social democracy in Russia by producing frustration and anger amongst young workers, the potential leaders of their class. Beletskii's strategy drove these young men and women into the arms of the radical intelligentsia, who promised that by rejecting moderation in favour of extremism the workers would attain the economic and political goals they so desired. The end result contributed, therefore, to placing Lenin and his Bolsheviks at the forefront of the labour movement.


details on Okhrana support for Lenin would be illuminating. What exactly did they do?

report on Lenin's involvement says he was supported "first by the Okhrana, then by the Kaiser."


http://commons.lib.jmu.edu/cgi/viewcontent.cgi?article=1016&context=mhr

this just cites Zuckerman


Zuckerman quotes saying the Okhrana and Bolshevik thought alike:

	For, although Fontanka and Bolshevism represented, as Marc Raeff has put it, the
'two opposite poles of Russian society' - the monarchy and the radical intelli-
gentsia - they held critical attitudes in common concerning the process and form
of Russian political development. As Raeff has explained:

		In fact, neither the intelligentsia nor bureaucracy wished to see the country
develop without its aid. Neither wished to see progress and organic develop-
ment based on rising productivity and increased prosperity. Paradoxically,
those two sworn enemies, the radical intelligentsia and the imperial bureau-
cracy were linked together by hostility to the real civil society, to pluralism,
administrative autonomy, common law, and liberalism in politics and culture....
After 1861, a constant concern of both the intelligentsia and the government
was the need to regiment the Russian people, out of fear for its anarchic and
destructive potential


------

from pipes book:


	There were 10,000 to 15,000 gendarmes in the Empire. Each city had a Gendarme official, clad in a familiar light blue uniform, whose responsibility it was to gather information on all matters affecting internal security. The force was very thinly distributed. Hence in time of massive unrest the government had to call in the regular army, the force of last resort: and when the army was engaged in war, as happened in 1904–5 and again in 1917, the regime was unable to cope.


a part of Lenin's thinking?


	...As soon as it became known that Bogrov had entered the theater on a police pass, rumors spread that he had acted on behalf of the government. These rumors have not died to this day. The leading suspect was and remains General P. G. Kurlov, the chief of the Corps of Gendarmes, who took charge of Kievan security during the Imperial visit and was known to have had bureaucratic differences with the Prime Minister.111 This theory, however, rests on very slender evidence.


what on earth was Kurlov up to anyway


	...after all, the greatest double agent of all, Evno Azef, also occasionally had had to betray his employers in order to maintain credibility with the terrorists—to the point of arranging for the murder of his chief, Plehve. As for the fact that the police gave Bogrov an admission ticket to the theater, that, too, makes good sense in view of the scenario which he had managed to foist on them. In his memoirs, Kurlov recalled that five years earlier, under similar circumstances, the Kiev Okhrana had allowed a double agent into the Municipal Theater to forestall a terrorist attack on the governor-general.112 On closer scrutiny, the conspiratorial theories of Stolypin’s death do not hold up. 


is Pipes right?


from Taylor:


	The evils of the system were dramatically underscored by the assassination of Prime Minister Peter Stolypin in 1911, who was shot down under the eyes of the Czar during a gala performance in the opera house of Kiev. The Kiev branch office of the Okhrana had received warning of a plot to assassinate Stolypin from one of its former agents, a man named Dimitri Bogrov, who had remained in touch with revolutionary circles. The Okhrana held off arresting the terrorists identified by Bogrov in the hopes of learning through him the complete details of their plan, but it passed on the warning to the Ministry of the Interior, which ordered drastic re-enforcement of the security arrangements for the protection of the Czar and of the high government officials scheduled to arrive in Kiev. Police threw an impenetrable cordon around the opera house and packed it with detectives, while passes and invitation cards were subjected to expert scrutiny. It seemed inconceivable that a terrorist could slip into the building—until Bogrov, who had been admitted in order to brief the chief of the local Okhrana on the last-minute arrangements of his confederates, pulled out a pistol as soon as he caught sight of the Prime Minister, and shot him dead.


Pipes is supicious


http://www.nytimes.com/1990/10/07/books/seventy-years-on-the-road-to-nowhere.html?pagewanted=all

dunno why Higley likes Pipes book it seems bad

Pipes seems to go over German support for Bolsheviks but ignores Okhrana; Malinovksy only in footnotes.


------


https://books.google.com/books?id=V3IeAQAAMAAJ&pg=PA418&lpg=PA418
	...The charge that the Bolshevik movement was secretly encouraged by the Russian Government before the war is confirmed by Serge Persky in the latest volume of his journalistic articles, From Nicholas II to Lenin. He has a photograph of notes of a speech delivered by Malinovsky in the Duma which had been OK'd and annotated by the Minister Maarof. Pravda ("Truth"), the official organ of the Bolshevists, was subsidzed by the Okhrana (secret politce), and Lenin himself in 1910 or 1911 had relations with them. When this was exposed Lenin defended himself in the same fashion as when charged with receiving German aid:

	It was not eh Okhrana that made use of us but on the contrary we that made use of the Okhrana. Without doubt the Okhrana has rendered great services to our party without ever obtaining anything from us.



https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Georgy_Gapon

Okhrana spy who was instrumental in starting Russian revolution, although they later killed him.



https://www.marxists.org/archive/cliff/works/1975/lenin1/chap19.htm#n16
	The experience of 1910 and 1911 shows that literature that had been brought in lay around by the puds [4*] in store houses and there are no addresses, no meeting places for their distribution.” [15] This was not surprising, as the person in charge of the distribution of literature brought into Russia until 1912 was Brendinsky, an okhrana agent.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Roman_Malinovsky
	In November 1912, he visited Lenin in Krakow and was urged not to unite with the Mensheviks. Malinovsky ignored that by reading a conciliatory speech in the Duma.[5] On December 28, 1912, he attended a Central Committee meeting in Vienna. He persuaded Lenin to appoint an Okhrana agent, Miron Chernomazov, as editor of Pravda as opposed to Stalin's candidate Stepan Shahumyan, who was too soft on the Mensheviks. The tsarist regime was determined to keep the RSDLP split so conciliators were targeted.



https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/mar/30.htm
	Rosenfeld (Kamenev) was instructed to remove Chernomazov, and he did remove him from all the affairs of the paper. Chernomazov was dismissed. Our Central Committee ordered an investigation, but since it was impossible to find accurate evidence to substantiate the suspicions against Chernomazov, the St. Petersburg comrades did not venture openly to brand him as a provocateur. We had to confine ourselves to discharging him from Pravda. 


http://www.newworldencyclopedia.org/entry/Pravda
	Vyacheslav Molotov was the de facto editor who controlled the paper from 1912 to 1914 while other prominent Bolsheviks, including, briefly, Joseph Stalin (until his arrest and exile in March 1913) served on the board as circumstances permitted. As it later turned out, one of the editors, Miron Chernomazov, was an undercover police agent.

	In order to avoid disruption in case of arrest, the real Bolshevik editors were not officially responsible for the paper. Instead, Pravda employed about 40 nominal "editors," usually workers, who would be arrested and go to jail whenever the police closed the paper.[3]

	During this period, the editorial board of Pravda often tried to avoid government fines or an outright ban by moderating its content. This stance led to repeated clashes between Lenin and the editors, the latter sometimes altering Lenin's articles or even refusing to publish Lenin's works. These clashes were used by Nikita Khrushchev in late 1961 when he was trying to discredit Molotov.


https://books.google.com/books?id=lGNjCwAAQBAJ&pg=PA173&lpg=PA173&dq=Lenin+Chernomazov&source=bl&ots=qJRiZQMOrx&sig=XI6mDXPkEr3mL7Rh1MKkjtXaHV8&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwjKwYClldvWAhXCYSYKHUtuA0cQ6AEIPjAF#v=onepage&q=Lenin%20Chernomazov&f=false


says under Chernomazov Pravda published illegal works and was frequently censored by the Tsar.



https://archive.org/stream/Elwood--LeninAndPravda1912-1914.pdf/Elwood--LeninAndPravda1912-1914_djvu.txt
	During Lenin's six- week absence a new problem developed within Pravda 
which required his hasty return for a meeting with Zinoviev and Malinovsky 
on July 27. Malinovsky, according to a police report which he himself probably 
filed, told of a strange meeting he had had with the new editor of Pravda, 
Miron Chernomazov. Chernomazov had for several years been active in the 
publishing of the party's central organ, Sotsial-demokrat, in Paris. In May he 
had returned to Russia to assume the editorship of Pravda and had promptly 
been arrested. Upon being released from custody, he told Malinovsky that 
"five days after his arrest [he had been] invited to the Okhrana where, 
during questioning, they began to suggest that he take on the duty of being a 
secret informer for the investigatory body. The interrogator said that though 
the Okhrana 'knew all/ they wanted to obtain information 'firsthand' with the 
help of Chernomazov. In an effort to persuade him to take on [this] role . . . 
the interrogator proceeded to demonstrate the Okhrana's thorough knowledge 
of recent party developments." The meeting concluded that "all these circum- 
stances merely confirmed the fact that near to the 'six' [Bolshevik Duma 
deputies] there was a person tied to the investigatory branch of the govern- 
ment." 90 

	In all likelihood Chernomazov did indeed become an Okhrana agent as a 
result of his arrest, perhaps under the inducement of a monthly salary of 200 
rubles. 97 Nevertheless, it is difficult to accept the frequently stated conclusion 
that Malinovsky told this story to shift suspicion from himself to Chernomazov. 
Few people suspected Malinovsky as early as July 1913, and, more to the point, 
Chernomazov was retained in his new position for another six months, during 
which time he did immense harm to the paper and to Social Democracy. More 
than likely Malinovsky was merely trying to prove his own value to the party 
and at the same time find out how much Lenin and Zinoviev suspected about 
police infiltration of their ranks.


what exactly is this saying? Malinovsky told Bolsheviks Chernomazov was a spy and they let him stay for 6 months?

wording is confusing

did they want to out Chernomazov on purpose? blackmail?


https://books.google.com/books?id=N9mbl_xbWpkC&pg=PT269&lpg=PT269&dq=Lenin+Chernomazov&source=bl&ots=p60DhjYnWx&sig=dC3Z1S6yu_QxTstv3yXsVJ4xD1M&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwjKwYClldvWAhXCYSYKHUtuA0cQ6AEIODAD#v=onepage&q=Lenin%20Chernomazov&f=false
	Chernomazov acted as an obediet Leninist. The reason for this, however, was that Chernomazov was an Okhrana agent and the Okhrana wished Pravda to become more violent in its editorials so that the autorities wuld have the necessary pretext to close the newspaper down. The result was the recurrent disruption of PRavda's publication. Lenin, of course, did not now about the Okhrana's role. The signs were there if only he had been alert, and no doubt he was disabled by not being able to see Chernomazon at work in St Petersburg. Even so, he had been remarkabl naive.


why write this?


https://books.google.com/books?id=ucsMAQAAQBAJ&pg=PA476&lpg=PA476&dq=Lenin+Chernomazov&source=bl&ots=Y8hej_RUK6&sig=3nhtD_XC45GDsahCulhDJTbf-ZE&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwjKwYClldvWAhXCYSYKHUtuA0cQ6AEIRzAH#v=onepage&q=Lenin%20Chernomazov&f=false

Zhitomirsky close to Lenin in Paris after 1908, Roman Malinovsky close to Lenin in Cracow after 1912.

	...there is also no doubt that [Lenin] directly benefited from the Okhrana's campaign to prevent unification of the Social Democrat party. The Okhrana's arrest of the leading Bolshevik champion of reunification with the Menshevisk, Alexis Rykov, was useulf to Lenin in preparing the way for Malinovksy's elevation in 1912 to the BOlshevik Central Committee as Lenin's key ally in resisting unifciation.



Billington book:

	Alexander III's antirevolutionary campaign was initially led by an
emergency organization formed directly within the imperial court : the
Sacred Brotherhood ( sviashchennaia druzhina) . It published a journal
of provocation in Geneva called Pravda (Truth) in an effort to discredit
the revolutionaries by its extremism. The Brotherhood planned to as­
sassinate prominent revolutionaries abroad even while negotiating with
others for their agreement not to disrupt the new tsar's coronation.
But this organization was dissolved in November 1882 when the emer­
gency had passed; and its files were turned over to a new foreign section
( zagranichnaia agentura) of the Police Department, which became in
effect the overseas branch of the Okhrana.


Butterworth:

	Members of the Holy Brotherhood must have been intoxicated by
its promise of state-sanctioned conspiracy but the con?dence
instilled by the supposed fraternal support of twenty thousand
kindred spirits, the unseen members of nearly 4,000 cells, was
wholly illusory. That the Brotherhood numbered scarcely more than
700, even at its peak, most of who were drawn from the idle rich of
St Petersburg, including many members of the city’s Yacht Club, was
one secret it guarded with particular care. Nevertheless, lavishly
funded by state and private donations, the Brotherhood launched a
torrent of initiatives, mostly illegal and ill-judged, that were in
reality little more than the superannuated adolescent fantasies of
men who should have known better. There was the swashbuckling
plan to challenge both Kropotkin and Rochefort to duels, that the
former denounced to the press in London, and another to dispatch
femmes fatales to marry and then eliminate such troublesome
?gures as Lev Hartmann. And then there was the revolutionary
journal it founded in Switzerland to disseminate provocative
falsehoods, brazenly titled Pravda, or ‘Truth’. The inclusion of an
article advocating the eradication of the landowning class, but
speci?cally urging activists to blow up their cattle with explosives
as an initial practical step towards revolution, however, took
nobody in.


says Rachkovsky got caught up with them, maybe "internalized their principles"



------


https://books.google.com/books?id=UFka6QM3i9QC&pg=PA36&lpg=PA36&dq=%22Kerensky%22+Malinovsky&source=bl&ots=Omo6EFr7Il&sig=En9kRT2SG9AQNQlXm65_u7JvBwI&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwj9_MSc4t3WAhXEMSYKHY7gCgIQ6AEIOjAE#v=onepage&q=Malinovsky&f=false

here Lenin trashes Malinovksy in 1920 as a "provocateur", later has him executed

also trashes him June 10 1917:

https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/may/28b.htm
	In reply to our suggestion that the bloc with Yedinstvo was a disgrace, Rabochaya Gazeta quotes the example of—whom would you think?—of the agent provocateur Malinovsky and of his being smuggled into the Duma by the secret police! 


https://books.google.com/books?id=4jtUAAAAIAAJ&pg=PA385&lpg=PA385&dq=%22Kerensky%22+Malinovsky&source=bl&ots=WHsG9DpzHS&sig=RQbewSyTODr8ryW71e2BcOz2-jw&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwi9j_yl5d3WAhXE1CYKHQqpD384ChDoAQg7MAU#v=onepage&q=%22Kerensky%22%20Malinovsky&f=false
	The Bolsheviki had representatives in the Russian Duma under the Czar's regime, and their leader was Malinovksy, an intimate friend of Lenine's. Shortly after the outbreak of the war it was established that while being a member of the executive committee of the Bolsheviki Malinovksy was also an agent provacateur in the pay of the Tsar's government. When this was revealed, Lenine tried to defend and whitewash him. During the war Malinovksy was in Germany conducing Bolshevist propaganda for the German Government among the RUssian prisoners of war.


apparently according to Herman Bernstein

Bernstein doesn't seem credible, though

was Berstein trying to pin Malinovsky on the Germans?


https://books.google.com/books?id=1KO8DgAAQBAJ&pg=PT165&lpg=PT165&dq=Malinovsky+Germany+prisoners+of+war&source=bl&ots=vQxK0NNAYt&sig=UGbULBeRYWL5KLviL_HNzDAhmns&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwiDz8m3kuHXAhXRYt8KHZdXA8YQ6AEIVTAL#v=onepage&q=Malinovsky%20Germany%20prisoners%20of%20war&f=false

Possony says Malinovsky was taken prisoner in Germany, and particpated in Bolshevik propaganda campaign on POWs, a campaign which was sponsored by the German government

https://books.google.com/books?id=PY2RAgAAQBAJ&pg=PA95&lpg=PA95&dq=Malinovsky+Germany+prisoners+of+war&source=bl&ots=XWcH6GQ-Ha&sig=RXLTVDIK1Nuf310ln6lURFDBZko&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwiDz8m3kuHXAhXRYt8KHZdXA8YQ6AEIKDAA#v=onepage&q=Malinovsky%20Germany%20prisoners%20of%20war&f=false

Brackman says Lenin sent Malionvsky to propagandize Russian POWs in Germany



https://books.google.com/books?id=_Z46AQAAMAAJ&pg=PA138&lpg=PA138&dq=Malinovsky+Germany+prisoners+of+war&source=bl&ots=sGPsuTx3Cv&sig=3zIrQ7k7gLJZ65RoW3BO5T6tIbQ&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwid99_lkuHXAhUFMd8KHVuPB9k4ChDoAQglMAA#v=onepage&q=Malinovsky%20Germany%20prisoners%20of%20war&f=false

Burtsev on this

so basically Malinovsky was simultaneously:

a Bolshevik
a police spy
a German agent

same goes for Parvus? Lenin? kindof a theme...


------


I think this is the supreme investigation committee questioning Kerensky:

https://translate.google.ru/translate?hl=en&sl=ru&u=http://www.runivers.ru/doc/d2.php%3FSECTION_ID%3D6790%26CENTER_ELEMENT_ID%3D150807%26PORTAL_ID%3D7163&prev=search
	I know the contents of the document announced by Burtsev in his "General Delo" newspaper on December 10, 1919, in issue 62. This document is indeed an official document that is a summary of the investigative material that, at the request of the Minister of Justice Pereverzev, the prosecutor of the Petrograd Judicial Chamber Karchevsky for the press. The entire factual side set forth in this document is indisputable. On this question, that is, on the question of the role of the Germans in an attempt to make a coup in July of 1918 and in the coup of October 25, I must say the following.

	The role of Lenin as a person connected in July and October 1917 with the Germans, their plans and their money is beyond any doubt. But I must also admit that he is not their agent in a "vulgar" sense - he has his goals, while denying at the same time every meaning of morality in the matter of the means leading him to the goal. As a person who in those days belonged to power in its broadest scope and application, I will say that the role of the Germans was not so simple as it seemed, perhaps even to the investigating judge Aleksandrov, who carried out a preliminary investigation of the events of July 1917 . They worked simultaneously both at the front and in the rear, coordinating their actions. Pay attention to the front offensive (Tarnopol), in the rear - an uprising. I myself was at the front, I was in this offensive. That's what was discovered then. In Vilna, the German headquarters issued at that time Bolshevik newspapers for our soldiers in Russian and distributed them along the front. During the offensive, approximately 2-4 July in the newspaper "Tovarisch", published in Vilna by the Germans and published, at about the end of June,

	As was already happening, such facts were reported about the Bolsheviks speaking in Petrograd (the first speech of Lenin), which happened later. So the Germans, in agreement with the Bolsheviks and through them fought with Russia. Similarly, the fact of the October 25th coup is not so simple either. Germany itself was compelled in the course of the war to fight the Entente with the methods of Bolshevism. She chose Russia for this purpose, as the rival, the weakest in this respect. In her alliance was in 1917 is not at all satisfactory. Austria was ready to withdraw from the alliance with Germany and seek a separate peace. Germany, therefore, and was in a hurry to make a coup in the autumn of 1917, trying to prevent the withdrawal from the war of Austria. I state to you the following fact. October 24, 1917, we, the Provisional Government, received an offer from Austria about a separate peace. October 25 there was a Bolshevik coup. So the Germans "forced" the course of events. Of course, in carrying out this revolution, they were made through the Bolsheviks in Russia by the masters of the situation. 

also

https://translate.google.ru/translate?hl=en&sl=ru&u=https://scepsis.net/library/id_1935.html&prev=search
	Burtsev admitted at the same time that he did not have information about Lenin's receipt of money from German agents, although he was convinced that this was the case. As Burtsev believed, Lenin "could not help but know" that his party was enjoying financial support "from Germany and German friends" 


https://translate.googleusercontent.com/translate_c?depth=1&hl=en&prev=search&rurl=translate.google.ru&sl=ru&sp=nmt4&u=http://rushist.com/index.php/katkov-kornilov/1864-general-alekseev-i-delo-kornilova&usg=ALkJrhjbVCLN4dHYLDdTu-7dWYfvPCmtJg
	Another member of the Investigation Commission - Ukrainians - also lived in Germany before the Second World War, was "liberated" by Soviet troops and spent 10 years in a Soviet concentration camp. On his return to the West, he published a series of articles in New York's New Russian Word and in the Renaissance in Paris, describing the relationship between the commission and Kerensky, whom he describes as a picky and unreliable witness. The chairman of the commission Shablovsky never disclosed anything from what he could learn about the "Kornilov affair" in his official position.



------


https://archive.org/stream/in.ernet.dli.2015.276141/2015.276141.Three-Who_djvu.txt
	Lenin was cruel by nature— he writes.— As a boy he liked 
to shoot at stray cats, or to break a crow s wing with his 
air gun. 

	That Lenin went hunting as a boy, we already know. Rut a 
curious coincidence makes the above “memory” a bit suspect. In 
a novel written by Eugene Chirikov ( schoolmate of Vladimir Ilyich 
in Kazan) we find the following passage: 

	He— Ulyanov— always had moist hands! And yesterday 
he killed a little cat with a rifle shot. . . . 


Lenin cruel to animals?



------


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1904/feb/03.htm

https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1905/jan/14.htm


Lenin doing similar things basically rooting for Japanese in Russo-Japanese War

called it a "trial run" for the Bolshevik revolution--more to that quote than meets the eye? (or was it Trotsky who said that?)

had a war, Okhrana starting protests with Gapon, and propaganda using the war to turn the public against the government


------


https://web.archive.org/web/20150225230446/http://elib.spbstu.ru/dl/327/Theme_10/Literature/Krivova.htm
	July 18, 1921 VTsIK created a structure designed to solve the problem of fighting hunger at the state level - the Central Commission for Assistance to the Hungry at the Central Executive Committee (Pomgol Central Committee), chaired by MI Kalinin, which existed until September 1922. 2. Now, when the authorities concentrated the business of helping the starving in their hands, leaving no opportunity for public organizations to participate in it, destroying the eyelids, putting the order on themselves. Russian Orthodox Church. The active participation of the church in the fight against hunger was traditional. But this tradition was later subjected to destruction.


Kalinin seems like a bad person to put in charge of combating famine


	...VI Lenin, L.D.Trotsky, I.V.Stalin, G.E. Zinoviev, P. A. Krasikov, E.M. Yaroslavsky and some other prominent members of the party sharply spoke against the participation of the church in helping the starving. Attempts by Patriarch Tikhon to introduce the activities of the church in this direction into a legal framework, to approve the "Regulations on the Church Committee" came across a dead Kremlin wall, which it was not immediately able to break through. The formal grounds for refusing to affirm the provision was the prohibition of charitable activities to all religious organizations by the instruction of the People's Commissariat of August 30, 1918. There was no response to the repeated appeal of Patriarch Tikhon addressed directly to Kalinin on August 31, 1921. The delay in replying to the patriarch was connected with a stubborn the struggle for the participation of the church in helping the starving population of Russia.


Lenin didn't want church to help starving for some reason


	...Contrary to the aspirations of the authorities to limit or even ban churches from helping the starving people by February 1922, it collected more than 8 million 926 thousand rubles, not counting jewelry, gold coins and food aid for the hungry.

	So, all the attempts of the church to find variants of a compromise with the state in the joint struggle against hunger were met by the resistance of the authorities, based on the principles of the relationship of the proletarian state with the church proclaimed in 1918. Gradually, the church's initiatives were rejected, it lost one position after another. The next step was the closure of the Church Committee and the transfer of all collected valuables to the Pomgol Central Committee.

	Thus, the foundation of voluntary cooperation with the state in the fight against hunger created by the church was destroyed. The authorities did not need an ally church, but an opponent church. Then, obviously, the idea was born to use hunger as an excuse for defeating the church. It is difficult to agree with those researchers who still believe that the seizure of church values ​​was conceived as one of the ways to solve the problem of hunger. Playing on the people's disaster, you could blame the church for concealing the means that could save thousands of lives, provoke anger towards the church and lead to the need to expropriate its values ​​for people's needs. In this sense, hunger was the best reason. Realizing that the people will not allow to rob churches and avoid bloodshed, it will be possible to blame the church for bloodshed and use it to destroy it. Therefore shots in Shuya will sound like a signal to the beginning of a new "class battle". Only in this way does the meaning of the prohibitions of the church itself become clear in the fight against hunger.


wanted to use the famine to destroy the church somehow? not exactly clear


	...At the same time, the media continued to be aggravated, the horrors of hunger were described. The press was called upon to set up public opinion against the church, with the obvious purpose of presenting it almost as a defendant for the suffering of millions of hungry people. This prepared a double blow-not only confiscating from the church all the values ​​that had been collected and stored for centuries, but also blaming it for the famine, for the inability of the authorities to cope with the disaster.

	The reaction of Patriarch Tikhon to the adoption of the decree was obvious. As early as February 19, 1922, at the time of the preparation of the decree, Patriarch Tikhon addressed an appeal in which he proposed a solution that would ensure the collection of necessary funds for hunger and the preservation of church objects necessary for the worship, representing values ​​of general cultural significance: , who do not have liturgical use "24.


had a media campaign blaming the church for the famine



https://www.thenation.com/article/food-fights/

Stalin also doing things that cause starvation in addition to holodomor, Lysenkoism


https://www.marxists.org/archive/roy-evelyn/articles/1922/famine.htm
	IN agonised Russian mother writes to the Moscow newspaper, Pravda, as follows:

		“I am a widow with four children, and no one in the world to help me. My oldest child is fourteen, the youngest seven. We have had nothing to eat for days, and I see my children growing weaker and weaker. There is no food to be had. The youngest lay sick in bed, dying. In the night my eldest child came to me and said that we must kill the little one for the sake of the rest, and give them something to eat. I told her it could not be, but then I saw the pinched faces of the three starving little ones, and I thought that in any case, the youngest must die soon, for we had no means to save her. I consented, and in the night my oldest girl and I went quietly while the others slept, and with a knife we killed and cut up the body of my youngest. Now there is food for the other children, but I cannot eat, knowing what it is. I write to you to ask if I have done wrong, and to offer myself for punishment.”

	This is but one of a hundred similar instances occurring daily in the famine region of Russia, where for nine months hunger has raged, supplemented by bitter cold and virulent epidemics. Nineteen million people have been affected by this great catastrophe, which will rank among the worst in history. And, to add to the horror of hunger, cold, disease, pestilence and suffering of every description—cannibalism! A civilized people, once the gentlest, most laughter-loving and happiest in the family of nations, has reverted to barbarism. Mothers are secretly killing their children; families are feeding on the flesh of those who have died; human ghouls are digging up the frozen corpses that have been interred, to save themselves from death.

	Who is responsible for these horrors?

	The thousand-throated enemies of Russia will cry “the Bolsheviks.”

	But those who know the truth will reply, “Capitalism.” 


------

https://books.google.com/books?id=cP8WX2URpbsC&pg=PA56&lpg=PA56&dq=The+devastations+of+the+Thirty+Years%E2%80%99+War+compressed+into+three+or+four+years,+and+spread+over+the+whole+Continent;+famine,+pestilence,+general+demoralisation+both+of+the+armies+and+of+the+mass+of+the+people+produced+by+acute+distress&source=bl&ots=ZyDyaUWsPQ&sig=jv_KoDEygzjyEtyRPeEkdai0JyI&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwj_-Li-1-HWAhUX3YMKHfrwCj4Q6AEILDAB#v=onepage&q=Lenin&f=false

Rosa Luxemberg seems happy about war

https://www.marxists.org/history/etol/newspape/fi/vol06/no02/greece03.htm
	For the masses there is no way out of the present catastrophe except through socialist revolution. Capitalism, after building up Europe as the center of affluence, culture, political democracy and progress, is today engaged in literally destroying the continent, tearing down brick by brick its great metropolitan cities and reducing its people to beggary and starvation. Europe, ridden with famine, pestilence and death, is in a blind alley. The working class has been driven down to inhuman levels. The middle classes are ruined by the war inflation. Under capitalism these masses have nothing to look forward to except further ruination and enslavement.


seems like they liked to return to this theme



https://www.marxists.org/archive/hansen/1941/01/military.htm
	Degenerated, distorted, suffering from the totalitarian grip of the monstrous Stalinist bureaucratic growth, the USSR nevertheless remains the only nation in the world where the bourgeoisie are expropriated, where the means of production have been taken out of the hands of a small exploiting minority and nationalized. As such it remains a conquest of the workers. When the flames of World War II have engulfed the entire planet, when the imperialists scourge the face of the earth with famine, pestilence, and death, the war weary workers will turn to the example set by the October revolution. They will rise with unconquerable strength and launch the new socialist society. Their revolution will at the same time end the Stalinist bureaucracy. A new era of peace and plenty will open. The first glimmerings are already perceptible among the oppressed who have been dragooned to fight by the capitalist class of Japan, Italy, Great Britain, France and – the United States.



https://www.marxists.org/reference/archive/mao/selected-works/volume-4/mswv4_70.htm
	T. R. Malthus (1766-1834), Anglican clergyman and reactionary economist. In his Essay on Population (1798), he wrote that "population unchecked . . . increases in geometrical ratio . . . [while] the means of subsistence . . . could not possibly be made to increase faster than in an arithmetical ratio". Basing himself on this arbitrary assumption, he came to the conclusion that all poverty and all evils in human society are permanent phenomena of nature. According to him, the only ways to solve the problem of poverty of the working people were to shorten their life-span, reduce the population or stop its increase. He regarded famine, pestilence and war as means to cut down population. 


that's creepy


https://www.marxists.org/archive/marx/works/1875/letters/75_11_12.htm
	(3) Without disputing the merits of your method of attack, which I might call a psychological one, I should myself have chosen a different method. Each of us is more or less influenced by the intellectual medium in which he chiefly moves. For Russia, where you know your public better than I do, and for a propagandist journal appealing to the bond of sentiment, to moral feeling, your method is probably the better one. For Germany, where false sentimentality has done and is still doing such enormous harm, it would be unsuitable, and would be misunderstood and distorted sentimentally. What we need is hate rather than love – to begin with, at any rate – and, above all, to get rid of the last remnants of German idealism and instate material facts in their historic rights.


the fuck is this


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/George_Bernard_Shaw
	Shaw's expressed views were often contentious; he promoted eugenics and alphabet reform, and opposed vaccination and organised religion. 


who the fuck is this guy

i mean i know who he is but wtf was he doing


https://www.marxists.org/reference/archive/shaw/works/pop.htm
	...Human beings can multiply very fast under favorable conditions. A single pair, if their posterity managed their affairs well enough to avoid war, pestilence, and premature death, might have twenty million descendants alive at the end of four hundred years. If all the couples now alive were to multiply at that rate there would soon not be standing room on the earth, much less fields to grow wheat in. There is a limit to the quantity of food the earth can yield to labor; and if there were no limit to the increase of population we should at last find that instead of increasing our shares of food by breeding more human beings, we should diminish them.


is that what they think they are doing? (at least some of them)


https://www.marxists.org/history/usa/unions/iww/1934/unemployment.htm
	This progressive slump into the slough of idleness, poverty, pauperism and misery has been going on for four years. It is world-wide. It cannot be explained upon an assumption of local national causes. It extends from pole to pole and from London to the Ganges. Nor can it be dated from the beginning of the panic in 1929 or the World War. The same forces that produced the World War and its immolation of over 40 million lives in violent death or death from famine and pestilence, are the causes of this post-war desolation and social disintegration.


i'll take them at their word
